
Chapter 12
Magic is Might

As August wore on, the square of unkempt grass in the middle of
Grimmauld Place shriveled in the sun until it was brittle and
brown. The inhabitants of number twelves were never seen by
anybody in the surrounding houses,and nor was the number twelve itself. The
Muggles who lived in Grimmauld Place had long since accepted the amusing
mistake in the numbering that had caused number eleven to sit beside number
thirteen.
And yet the square was now attracting a trickle of visitors who seemed to
find the anomaly most intriguing. Barely a day passed without one or two
people arriving in Grimmauld Place with no other purpose, or so it seemed,
than to lean against the railing facing numbers eleven and thirteen, watching
the join between the two houses. The lurkers were never the same two days
running, although they all seemed to share a dislike for normal clothing. Most
of the Londoners who passed them were used to eccentric dressers and took
little notice, though occasionally one of them might glance back, wondering
why anyone would wear such long cloaks in the heat.
The watchers seemed to be gleaning little satisfaction from their vigil. Occasionally one of them started forward excitedly, as if they had seen something
interesting at last, only to fall back looking disappointed.
193
194 CHAPTER 12. MAGIC IS MIGHT
On the first day of September there were more people lurking in the square
than ever before. Half a dozen men in long cloaks stood silent and watchful,
gazing as ever at houses eleven and thirteen, but the thing for which they
were waiting still appeared elusive. As evening drew in, bringing with it an
unexpected gust of chilly rain, for the first time in weeks, there occurred one
oft hose inexplicable moments when they appeared to have seen something
interesting. The man with the twisted face pointed and his closest companion,
a podgy pallid man, started forward, but a moment later they had relaxed into
their previous state of inactivity, looking frustrated and disappointed.
Meanwhile, inside number twelve, Harry had just entered the Harry had
just entered the hall. He had nearly lost his balance as he Apparated onto the
top step just outside the front door, and thought that the Death Eaters might
have caught a glimpse of his momentarily exposed elbow. Shutting the front
door carefully behind him, he pulled off the Invisibility Cloak, draped it over
his arm, and hurried along the gloomy hallway toward the door that led to the
basement, a stolen copy of the Daily Prophet clutched in his hand.
The usual low whisper of “Severus Snape” greeted him, the chill wind swept
him, and his tongue rolled up for a moment.
“I didn’t kill you,” he said, once it had unrolled, then held his breath as the
dusty jinx-figure exploded. He waited until he was halfway down the stairs
into the kitchen, out of earshot of Mrs. Black and clear of the dust cloud, before
calling, “I’ve got news, and you won’t like it.”
The kitchen was almost unrecognizable. Every surface now shone; Copper
pots and pans had been burnished to a rosy glow; the wooden tabletop gleamed;
the goblets and plates already laid for dinner glinted in the light from a merrily blazing fire, on which a cauldron was simmering. Nothing in the room,
however, was more dramatically different than the house-elf who now came
hurrying toward Harry, dressed in a snowy-white towel, his ear hair as clean
and fluffy as cotton wool, Regulus’s locket bouncing on his thin chest.
“Shoes off, if you please, Master Harry, and hands washed before dinner,”
croaked Kreacher, seizing the Invisibility Cloak and slouching off to hang it
195
on a hook on the wall, beside a number of old-fashioned robes that had been
freshly laundered.
“What’s happened?” Ron asked apprehensively. He and Hermione had been
poring over a sheaf of scribbled notes and hand, drawn maps that littered the
end of the long kitchen table, but now they watched Harry as he strode toward
them and threw down the newspaper on top of their scattered parchment.
A large picture of a familiar, hook-nosed, black-haired man stared up at
them all, beneath a headline that read:
SEVERUS SNAPE CONFIRMED AS HOGWARTS HEADMASTER
“No!” said Ron and Hermione loudly.
Hermione was quickest; she snatched up the newspaper and began to read
the accompanying story out loud.
“‘Severus Snape, long-standing Potions master at Hogwarts School of Witchcraft
and Wizardry, was today appointed headmaster in the most important of several
staffing changes at the ancient school. Following the resignation of the previous
Muggle Studies teacher, Alecto Carrows will will take over the post while her
brother, Amycus, fills the position of Defense Against the Dark Arts professor.
“‘I welcome the opportunity to uphold our finest Wizarding traditions and
values—’ Like committing murder and cutting off people’s ears, I suppose!
Snape, headmaster! Snape in Dumbledore’s study—Merlin’s pants!” she shrieked,
making both Harry and Ron jump. She leapt up from the table and hurtled
from the room shouting as she went, “I’ll be back in a minute!”
“‘Merlin’s pants’?” repeated Ron, looking amused. “She must be upset.” He
pulled the newspaper toward him and perused the article about Snape.
“The other teachers won’t stand for this. McGonagall and Flitwick and
Sprout all know the truth, they know how Dumbledore died. They won’t accept Snape as headmaster. And who are these Carrows?”
“Death Eaters,” said Harry. “There are pictures of them inside. They were
at the top off the tower when Snape killed Dumbledore, so it’s all friends together. And,” Harry went on bitterly, drawing up a chair, “I can’t see that the
196 CHAPTER 12. MAGIC IS MIGHT
other teachers have got any choice but to stay. If the Ministry and Voldemort
are behind Snape it’ll be a choice between staying and teaching, or a nice few
years in Azkaban—and that’s if they’re lucky. I reckon they’ll stay to try and
protect the students.”
Kreacher came bustling to the table with a large tureen in his hands, and
ladled out soup into pristine bowls, whistling between his teeth as he did so.
“Thanks, Kreacher,” said Harry, flipping over the Prophet so as not to have
to look at Snape’s face. “Well, at least we know exactly where Snape is now.”
He began to spoon soup into his mouth. The quality of Kreacher’s cooking had improved dramatically ever since he had been given Regulus’s locket:
Today’s French onion was as good as Harry had ever tasted.
“There are still a load of Death Eaters watching the house,” he told Ron as
he ate, “more than usual. It’s like they’re hoping we’ll march out carrying our
school trunks and head off for the Hogwarts Express.”
Ron glanced at his watch.
“I’ve been thinking about that all day. It left nearly six hours ago. Weird,
not being on it, isn’t it?”
In his mind’s eye Harry seemed to see the scarlet steam engine as he and
Ron had once followed it by air, shimmering between fields and hills, a rippling
scarlet caterpillar. He was sure Ginny, Neville, and Luna were sitting together
at this moment, perhaps wondering where he, Ron, and Hermione were, or
debating how best to undermine Snape’s new regime.
“They nearly saw me coming back in just now,” Harry said. “I landed badly
on the top step, and the Cloak slipped.”
“I do that every time. Oh, here she is,” Ron added, craning around in his
seat to watch Hermione reentering the kitchen. “And what in the name of
Merlin’s most baggy Y Fronts was that about?”
“I remembered this,” Hermione panted.
She was carrying a large, framed picture, which she now lowered to the
floor before seizing her small, beaded bag from the kitchen sideboard. Opening it, she proceeded to force the painting inside, and despite the fact that it
197
was patently too large to fit inside the tiny bag, within a few seconds it had
vanished, like so much else, into the bag’s capricious depths.
“Phineas Nigellus,” Hermione explained as she threw the bag onto the kitchen
table with the usual sonorous, clanking crash.
“Sorry?” said Ron, but Harry understood. The painted image of Phineas
Nigellus Black was able to flit between his portrait in Grimmauld Place and
the one that hung in the headmaster’s office at Hogwarts: the circular towertop room where Snape was no doubt sitting right now, in triumphant possession
of Dumbledore’s collection of delicate, silver magical instruments, the stone
Pensieve, the Sorting Hat and, unless it had been moved elsewhere, the sword
of Gryffindor.
“Snape could send Phineas Nigellus to look inside this house for him,” Hermione
explained to Ron as he resumed her seat. “But let him try now, all Phineas
Nigellus will be able to see is the inside of my handbag.”
“Good thinking!” said Ron, looking impressed.
“Thank you,” smiled Hermione, pulling her soup toward her. “So, Harry,
what else happened today?”
“Nothing,” said Harry. “Watched the Ministry entrance for seven house. No
sign of her. Saw you dad, though, Ron. He looks fine.”
Ron nodded his appreciation of this news. They had agreed that it was far
too dangerous to try and communicate with Mr. Weasley while he walked in
and out of the Ministry, because he was always surrounded by other Ministry
workers. It was, however, reassuring to catch these glimpses of him, even if he
did look very strained and anxious.
“Dad always told us most Ministry people use the Floo Network to get to
work,” Ron said. “That’s why we haven’t seen Umbridge, she’d never walk,
she’d think she’s too important.”
“And what about that funny old witch and that little wizard in the navy
robes?” Hermione asked.
“Oh yeah, the bloke from Magical Maintenance,” said Ron.
“How do you know he works for Magical Maintenance?” Hermione asked,
198 CHAPTER 12. MAGIC IS MIGHT
her soup spoon suspended in midair.
“Dad said everyone from Magical Maintenance wears navy blue robes.”
“But you never told us that!”
Hermione dropped her spoon and pulled toward her the sheaf of notes and
maps that she and Ron had been examining when Harry had entered the
kitchen.
“There’s nothing in here about navy blue robes, nothing!” she said, flipping
feverishly through the pages.
“Well, doe sit really matter?”
“Ron, it all matters! If we’re going to get into the Ministry and not give
ourselves away when they’re bound to be on the lookout for intruders, every
little detail matters! We’ve been over and over this, I mean, what’s the point of
all these reconnaissance trips if you aren’t even bothering to tell us—”
“Blimey, Hermione, I forget one little thing—”
“You do realize, don’t you, that there’s probably no more dangerous place in
the whole world for us to be right now than the Ministry of—”
“I think we should do it tomorrow,” said Harry.
Hermione stopped dead, her jaw hanging; Ron choked a little over his soup.
“Tomorrow?” repeated Hermione. “You aren’t serious, Harry?’
“I am,” said Harry. “I don’t think we’re going to be much better prepared
than we are now even if we skulk around the Ministry entrance for another
month. The longer we put it off, the farther away that locket could be. There’s
already a good chance Umbridge has chucked it away; the thing doesn’t open.”
“Unless,” said Ron, “she’s found a way of opening it and she’s now possessed,”
“Wouldn’t make any difference to her, sh e was so evil in the first place,”
Harry shrugged.
Hermione was biting her lip, deep in thought.
“We know everything important,” Harry went on, addressing Hermione.
“We know they’ve stopped Apparition in and out of the Ministry. We know
only the most senior Ministry members are allowed to connect their homes to
199
the Floo Network now, because Ron heard those two Unspeakables complaining about it. And we know roughly where Umbridge’s office is, because of what
you heard that bearded bloke saying to his mate—”
“‘I’ll be up on level one, Dolores wants to see me,”’ Hermione recited immediately.
“Exactly,” said Harry. “And we know you get in using those funny coins, or
tokens, or whatever they are because I saw that witch borrowing one from her
friend—”
“But we haven’t got any!”
“I the plan works, we will have,” Harry continued calmly.
“I don’t know, Harry, I don’t know. . . . There are an awful lot of things that
could go wrong, so much relies on chance. . . . ”
“That’ll be true even if we spend another three months preparing,” said
Harry. “It’s time to act.”
He could tell from Ron’s and Hermione’s faces that they were scared, he was
not particularly confident himself, and yet he was sure the time had come to
put their plan into operation.
They had spent the previous four weeks taking it in turns to don the Invisibility Cloak and spy on the official entrance to the Ministry, which Ron, thanks
to Mr. Weasley, had known since childhood. They had tailed Ministry workers
on their way in, eavesdropped on their conversations, and learned by careful
observation which of them could be relied on upon to appear, alone, at the same
time every day. Occasionally there had been a chance to sneak a Daily Prophet
out of somebody’s briefcase. Slowly they had built up the sketchy maps and
notes now stacked in front of Hermione.
“All right,” said Ron slowly, “let’s say we go for it tomorrow. . . . I think it
should just be me and Harry.”
“Oh, don’t start that again!” sighed Hermione. “I thought we’d settled this.”
“It’s one thing hanging around the entrances under the Cloak, but this is
different, Hermione.” Ron jabbed a finger at a copy of the Daily Prophet dared
ten days previously. “You’re on the list of Muggle-borns who didn’t present
200 CHAPTER 12. MAGIC IS MIGHT
themselves for interrogation!”
“And you’re supposed to be dying of spattergroit at the Burrow! If ayone
shouldn’t go, it’s Harry, he’s got a ten-thousand-Galleon price on his head—”
“Fine, I’ll stay here,” said Harry. “Let me know if you ever defeat Voldemort,
won’t you?”
As Ron and Hermione laughed, pain shot through the scar on Harry’s forehead. His hand jumped to it: He saw Hermione’s eyes narrow; and he tried to
pass off the movement by brushing his hair out of his eyes.
“Well, if all three of us go we’ll have to Disapparate separately,” Ron was
saying. “We can’t all fit under the Cloak anymore.”
Harry’s scar was becoming more and more painful. He stood up. At once,
Kreacher hurried forward.
“Master has not finished his soup, would Master prefer the savory stew, or
else the treacle tart to which Master is so partial?”
“Thanks, Kreacher, but I’ll be back in a minute-er-bathroom.”
Aware that Hermione was watching him suspiciously, Harry hurried up the
stairs to the hall and then to the first landing, where he dashed into the bathroom and bolted the door again. Grunting with pain, he slumped over the black
basin with its taps in the form of open-mouthed serpents and closed his eyes. . . .
He was gliding along a twilit street. The buildings on either side of him had
high, timbered gables; they looked like gingerbread houses.
He approached one of them, then saw the whiteness of his own long-fingered
hand against the door. He felt a mounting excitement. . . .
The door opened: A laughing woman stood there. Her face fell as she looked
into Harry’s face, humor gone, terror replacing it. . . .
“Gregorovitch?” said a high, cold voice.
She shook her head: She was trying to close the door. A white hand held it
steady, prevented her shutting him out. . . .
“I want Gregorovitch.”
“Er wohnt hier nicht mehr!” she cried, shaking her head. “He no live here!
He no live here! I know him not!”
201
Abandoning the attempt to close the door, she began to back away down the
dark hall, and Harry followed gliding toward her, and his long-fingered hand
had drawn his wand.
“Where is he?”
“Das welfs ich nicht! He move! I know not, I know not!”
He raised the wand. She screamed. Two young children came running into
the hall. She tried to shield them with her arms. There was a flash of green
light—
“Harry! HARRY!”
He opened his eyes; he had sunk to the floor. Hermione was pounding on
the door again.
“Harry, 9open up!”
He had shouted out, he knew it. He got up and unbolted the door; Hermione
toppled inside at once, regained her balance, and looked around suspiciously.
Ron was right behind her, looking unnerved as he pointed his wand into the
corners of the chilly bathroom.
“What were you doing?” asked Hermione sternly.
“What d’you think I was doing?” asked Harry with feeble bravado.
“You were yelling your head off?” said Ron.
“Oh yeah . . . I must’ve dozed off or—”
“Harry, please don’t insult our intelligence,” said Hermione, taking deep
breaths. “We know your scar hurt downstairs, and you’re white as a sheet.”
Harry sat down on the edge of the bath.
“Fine, I’ve just seen Voldemort murdering a woman. By now he’s probably
killed her whole family. And he didn’t need to. It was Cedric all over again,
they were just there. . . . ”
“Harry;, you aren’t supposed to let this happen anymore!” Hermione cried,
her voice echoing through the bathroom. “Dumbledore wanted you to use Occlumency! He thought the connection was dangerous—Voldemort can use it,
Harry! What good is it to watch him kill and torture, how can it help?”
“Because it means I know what he’s doing,” said Harry.
202 CHAPTER 12. MAGIC IS MIGHT
“So you’re not even going to try to shut him out?”
“Hermione, I can’t. You know I’m lousy at Occlumency, I never got the hang
of it.”
“You never really tried!” she said hotly. “I don’t get it, Harry—do you like
having this special connection or relationship or what—whatever—”
She faltered under the look he gave her as he stood up.
“Like it?” he said quietly. “Would you like it?”
“I—no—I’m sorry, Harry, I didn’t mean—”
“I hate it, I hate the fact that he can get inside me, that I have to watch him
when he’s most dangerous. But I’m going to use it.”
“Dumbledore—”
“Forget Dumbledore. This is my choice, nobody else’s. I want to know why
he’s after Gregorovitch.”
“Who?”
“He’s a foreign wandmaker,” said Harry. “He made Krum’s wand and Krum
reckons he’s brilliant.”
“But according to you,” said Ron, “Voldemort’s got Ollivander locked up
somewhere. If he’s already got a wandmaker, what does he need another one
for?”
“Maybe he agrees with Krum, maybe he thinks Gregorovitch is better . . . or
else he thinks Gregorovitch will be able to explain what my wand did when he
was chasing me, because Ollivander didn’t know.”
Harry glanced into the cracked, dusty mirror and saw Ron and Hermione
exchanging skeptical looks behind his back.
“Harry, you keep talking about what your wand did,” said Hermione, “but
you made it happen! Why are you so determined not to take responsibility for
your own power?”
“Because I know it wasn’t me! And so does Voldemort, Hermione! We both
know what really happened!”
They glared at each other; Harry knew that he had not convinced Hermione
and that she was marshaling counterarguments, against both his theory on his
203
wand and the fact that he was permitting himself to see into Voldemort’s mind.
To his relief, Ron intervened.
“Drop it,” he advised her. “It’s up to him. And if we’re going to the ministry
tomorrow, don’t you reckon we should go over the plan?”
Reluctantly, as the other two could tell, Hermione let the matter rest, though
Harry was quite sure she would attack again at the first opportunity. In the
meantime, they returned to the basement kitchen, where Kreacher served
them all stew and treacle tart.
They did not get to bed until late that night, after spending hours going
over and over their plan until they could recite it, word perfect, to each other.
Harry, who was now sleeping in Sirius’s room, lay in bed with his wandlight
trained on the old photograph of his father, Sirius, Lupin, and Pettigrew, and
muttered the plan to himself for another ten minutes. As he extinguished his
wand, however, he was thinking not of Polyjuice Potion, Puking Pastilles, or
the navy blue robes of Magical Maintenance; he thought of Gregorovitch the
wandmaker, and how long he could hope to remain hidden while Voldemort
sought him so determinedly.
Dawn seemed to follow midnight with indecent haste.
“You look terrible,” was Ron’s greeting as he entered the room to wake
Harry.
“Not for long,” said Harry, yawning.
They found Hermione downstairs in the kitchen. She was being served
coffee and hot rolls by Kreacher and wearing the slightly manic expression
that Harry associated with exam review.
“Robes,” she said under her breath, acknowledging her presence with a nervous nod and continuing to poke around in her beaded bag, “Polyjuice potion
. . . Invisibility Cloak . . . Decoy Detonators . . . You should each take a couple just
in case. . . . Puking Pastilles, Nosebleed Nougat, Extendable ears . . . ”
They gulped down their breakfast, then set off upstairs, Kreacher bowing
them out and promising to have a steak-and-kidney pie ready for them when
they returned.
204 CHAPTER 12. MAGIC IS MIGHT
“Bless him,” said Ron fondly, “and when you think I used to fantasize about
cutting off his head and sticking it on the wall.”
They made their way onto the front step with immense caution. They could
see a couple of puffy-eyed Death Eaters watching the house from across the
misty square.
Hermione disapparated with Ron first, then came back for Harry.
After the usual brief spell of darkness and near suffocation, Harry found
himself in the tiny alleyway where the first phase of their plan was scheduled
to take place. It was as yet deserted, except for a couple of large bins; the first
ministry workers did not usually appear here until at least eight o’clock.
“Right then,” said Hermione, checking her watch. “She ought to be here in
about five minutes. When I’ve Stunned her—”
“Hermione, we know,” said Ron sternly. “And I thought we were supposed
to open the door before she got here?”
Hermione squealed.
“I nearly forgot! Stand back—”
She pointed her wand at the padlocked and heavily graffitied fire door beside them, which burst open with a crash. The dark corridor behind it led, as
they knew from their careful scouting trips, into an empty theater. Hermione
pulled the door back toward her, to make it look as though it was still closed.
“And now,” she said, turning back to face the other two in the alley way, “we
put on the Cloak again—”
“—and we wait,” Ron finished, throwing it over Hermione’s head like a blanket over a birdcage and rolling his eyes at Harry.
Little more than a minute later, there was a tiny pop and a little Ministry
witch with flyaway gray hair Apparated feet from them, blinking a little in the
sudden brightness: the sun had just come out from behind a cloud. She barely
had time to enjoy the unexpected warmth, however, before Hermione’s silent
Stunning Spell hit her in the chest and she toppled over.
“Nicely done, Hermione,” said Ron, emerging from behind a bin beside the
theater door as Harry took off the Invisibility Cloak. Together they carried the
205
little witch into the dark passageway that led backstage. Hermione plucked a
few hairs from the witch’s head and added them to a flask of muddy Polyjuice
Potion she had taken from the beaded bag. Ron was rummaging through the
little witch’s handbag.
“She’s Mafalda Hopkirk,” he said, reading a small card that identified their
victim as an assistant in the Improper Use of Magic Office. “You’d better take
this, Hermione, and here are the tokens,”
He passed her several small golden coins, all embossed with the letters
M.O.M., which he had taken from the witch’s purse.
Hermione drank the Polyjuice Potion, which was now a pleasant heliotrope
color, and within seconds stood before them, the double of Mafalda Hopkirk. As
she removed Mafalda’s spectacles and put them on, Harry checked his watch.
“Were running late, Mr. Magical Maintenance will be here any second.”
They hurried to the close the door on the real Mafalda; Harry and Ron
threw the Invisibility Cloak over themselves but Hermione remained in view,
waiting. Seconds later there was another pop, and a small, ferrety—looking
wizard appeared before them.
“Oh, hello, Mafalda.”
“Hello!” said Hermione in a quavery voice. “How are you today?”
“Not so good, actually,” replied the little wizard, who looked thoroughly
downcast.
As Hermione and the wizard headed for the main road, Harry and Ron crept
along behind them.
“I’m sorry to hear you’re under the heather,” said Hermione, talking firmly
over the little wizard as he tried to expound upon his problems; it was essential
to stop him from reaching the street.
“Here, have a sweet.”
“Eh? Oh, no thanks—”
“I insist!” said Hermione aggressively, shaking the bag of pastilles i his face.
Looking rather alarmed, the little wizard took one.
The effect was instantaneous. The moment the pastille touched his tongue,
206 CHAPTER 12. MAGIC IS MIGHT
the little wizard started vomiting so hard that he did not even notice as Hermione
yanked a handful of hairs from the top of his head.
“Oh dear!” she said, as he splattered the alley with sick. “Perhaps you’d
better take the day off!”
“No—no!” He choked and retched, trying to continue on his way despite
being unable to walk straight. “I must—today—must go—”
“But that’s just silly!” said Hermione, alarmed. “You can’t go to work in this
state—I think you ought to go to St. Mungo’s and get them to sort you out!”
The wizard had collapsed, heaving, onto all fours, still trying to crawl toward the main street.
“You simply can’t go to work like this!” cried Hermione.
At last he seemed to accept the truth of her words. Using a repulsed Hermione
to claw his away back into a standing positions, he turned on the spot and vanished, leaving nothing behind but the bag Ron had snatched from his hand as
he went and some flying chunks of vomit.
“Urgh,” said Hermione, holding up the skirts of her robe to avoid the puddles of sick. “It would have made much less mess to Stun him too.”
“Yeah,” said Ron, emerging from under the cloak holding the wizard’s bag,
“but I still think a whole pile of unconscious bodies would have drawn more
attention. Keen on his job, though, isn’t he? Chuck us the hair and the potion,
then.”
Within two minutes, Ron stood before them, as small and ferrety as the sick
wizard, and wearing the navy blue robes that had been folded in his bag.
“Weird he wasn’t wearing them today, wasn’t it, seeing how much he wanted
to go? Anyway, I’m Reg Cattermole, according to the label in the back.”
“Now wait here,” Hermione told Harry, who was still under the Invisibility
Cloak, “and we’ll be back with some hairs for you.”
He had to wait ten minutes, but it seemed much longer to Harry, skulking
alone in the sick-splattered alleyway beside the door concealing the Stunned
Mafalda. Finally Ron and Hermione reappeared.
“We don’t know who he is,” Hermione said, passing Harry several curly
207
black hairs, “but he’s gone home with a dreadful nosebleed! Here, he’s pretty
tall, you’ll need bigger robes. . . . ”
She pulled out a set of the old robes Kreacher had laundered for them, and
Harry retired to take the potion and change.
Once the painful transformation was complete he was more than six feet
tall, and from what he could tell from his well-muscled arms, powerfully built.
He also had a beard. Stowing the Invisibility Cloak and his glasses inside his
new robes, he rejoined the other two.
“Blimey, that’s scary,” said Ron, looking up at Harry, who now towered over
them.
“Take one of Mafalda’s tokens,” Hermione told Harry, “and let’s go, it’s
nearly nine.”
They stepped out of the alleyway together. Fifty yards along the crowded
pavement there were spiked black railings flanking two flights of steps, one
labeled GENTLEMEN, the other LADIES.
“See you in a moment, then,” said Hermione nervously, and she tottered off
down the steps to LADIES. Harry and Ron joined a number of oddly dressed
men descending into what appeared to be an ordinary underground public toilet, tiled in grimy black and white.
“Morning, Reg!” called another wizard in navy blue robes as he let himself
into a cubicle by inserting his golden token into a slot in the door. “Blooming
pain in the bum, this, eh? Forcing us all to get to work this way! Who are they
expecting to turn up, Harry Potter?”
The wizard roared with laughter at his own wit. Ron gave a forced chuckle.
“Yeah,” he said, “stupid, isn’t it?”
And he and Harry let themselves into adjoining cubicles.
To Harry’s left and right came the sound of flushing. He crouched down and
peered through the gap at the bottom of the cubicle, just in time to see a pair
of booted feet climbing into the toilet next door. He looked left and saw Ron
blinking at him.
“We have to flush ourselves in?” he whispered.
208 CHAPTER 12. MAGIC IS MIGHT
“Looks like it,” Harry whispered back; he voice came out deep and gravelly.
They both stood up. Feeling exceptionally foolish, Harry clambered into the
toilet.
He knew at once that he had done the right thing; though he appeared to be
standing in water, his shoes, feet, and robes remained quite dry. He reached up,
pulled the chain, and next moment had zoomed down a short chute, emerging
out a fireplace into the Ministry of Magic.
He got up clumsily; there was a lot more of his body than he was accustomed
to. The great Atrium seemed darker than Harry remembered it. Previously a
golden fountain had filled the center of the hall, casting shimmering spots of
light over the polished wooden floor and walls. Now a gigantic statue of black
stone dominated the scene. It was rather frightening, this was sculpture of
a witch and a wizard sitting on ornately carved thrones, looking down at the
Ministry workers toppling out of fireplaces below them. Engraved in foot-high
letters at the base of the statue were the words MAGIC IS MIGHT.
Harry received a heavy blow on the back of the legs: Another wizard had
just flown out of the fireplace behind him.
“Out of the way, can’t y—oh, sorry, Runcorn!”
Clearly frightened, the balding wizard hurried away. Apparently the man
whom Harry was impersonating, Runcorn, was intimidating.
“Psst!” said a voice, and he looked around to see a wispy little witch and the
ferrety wizard from Magical Maintenance gesturing to him from over beside
the statue. Harry hastened to join them.
“You got in all right, then?” Hermione whispered to Harry.
“No, he’s still stuck in the bog,” said Ron.
“Oh, very funny . . . It’s horrible, isn’t it?” she said to Harry, who was staring
up at the statue. “Have you seen what they’re sitting on?”
Harry looked more closely and realized that what he had though were decoratively carved thrones were actually mounds of carved human: hundreds and
hundreds of naked bodies, men, women, and children, all with rather stupid,
ugly faces, twisted and pressed together to support the weight of the hand-
209
somely robed wizards.
“Muggles,” whispered Hermione. “In their rightful place. Come on, let’s get
going.”
They joined the stream of witches and wizards moving toward the golden
gates at the end of the hall looking around as surreptitiously as possible, but
there was no sign of the distinctive figure of Dolores Umbridge. They passed
through the gates and into a smaller hall, where queues were forming in front
of twenty golden grilles housing as many lifts. They had barely joined the
nearest one when a voice said, “Cattermole!”
They looked around: Harry’s stomach turned over. One of the Death Eaters
who had witnessed Dumbledore’s death was striding toward them. The Ministry workers beside them fell silent, their eyes downcast. Harry could feel fear
rippling through them. The man’s scowling, slightly brutish face was somehow
at odds with his magnificent, sweeping robes, which were embroidered with
much gold thread. Someone in the crowd around the lifts called sycophantically, “Morning, Yaxley!” Yaxley ignored them.
“I requested somebody from Magical Maintenance to sort out my office, Cattermole. It’s still raining in there.”
Ron looked around as though hoping somebody else would intervene, but
nobody spoke.
“Raining . . . in your office? That’s—that’s not good, is it?”
Ron gave a nervous laugh. Yaxley’s eyes widened.
“You think it’s funny, Cattermole, do you?”
A pair of witches broke away from the queue for the list and bustled off.
“No,” said Ron, “no, of course—”
“You realize that I am on my way downstairs to interrogate your wife, Cattermole. In fact, I’m quite surprised you’re not down there holding her hand
while she waits. Already given her up as a bad job, have you? Probably wise.
Be sure and marry a pureblood next time.”
Hermione had let out a little squeak of horror. Yaxley looked at her. She
coughed feebly and turned away.
210 CHAPTER 12. MAGIC IS MIGHT
“I—I—” stammered Ron.
“But if my wife were accused of being a Mudblood,” said Yaxley, “—not that
any woman I married would ever be mistaken for such filth—and the Head of
the Department of Magical Law Enforcement needed a job doing, I would make
it my priority to do that job, Cattermole. Do you understand me?’p’
“Yes,” whispered Ron.
“Then attend to it, Cattermole, and if my office is not completely dry within
an hour, you wife’s Blood Status will be in even graver doubt than it is now.”
The golden grille before them clattered open. With a nod an unpleasant
smile to Harry, who was evidently expected to appreciate this treatment of
Cattermole, Yaxley swept away toward another lift. Harry, Ron, and Hermione
entered theirs, but nobody followed them: It was as if they were infectious. The
grilles shut with a clang and the lift began to move upward.
“What am I going to do?” Ron asked the other two at once; he looked
stricken. “If I don’t turn up, my wife . . . I mean, Cattermole’s wife—”
“We’ll come with you, we should stick together—” began Harry, but Ron
shook his head feverishly.
“That’s mental, we haven’t got much time. You two find Umbridge, I’ll go
and sort out Yaxley’s office—but how do I stop it raining?”
“Try Finite Incantatem,” said Hermione at once, “that should stop the rain
if it’s a hex or curse; if it doesn’t, something’s gone wrong with an Atmospheric
Charm, which will be more difficult to fix, so as an interim measure try Impervius to protect his belongings—”
“Say it again, slowly—” said Ron, searching his pockets desperately for a
quill, but at that moment the lift juddered to a halt. A disembodied female
voice said, “Level four, Department for the Regulation and Control of Magical
Creatures, incorporating Beast, Being, and Spirit Divisions, Goblin Liason Office, and Pest Advisory Bureau,” and the grilles slid open again, admitting a
couple of wizards and several pale violet paper airplanes that fluttered around
the lamp in the ceiling of the lift.
“Morning, Albert,” said a bushily whiskered man, smiling at Harry. He
211
glanced over at Ron and Hermione as the lift creaked upward once more:
Hermione was now whispering frantic instructions to Ron. The wizard leaned
toward Harry, leering, and muttered, “Dirk Cresswell, eh? From Goblin Liaison? Nice one, Albert, I’m pretty confident I’ll get his job now!”
He winked. Harry smiled back, hoping that this would suffice. The lift
stopped; the grilles opened once more.
“Level two, Department of Magical law enforcement, including the Improper
Use of Magic Office, Auror Headquarters, and Wizengamot Administration Services,” said the disembodied witch’s voice.
Harry saw Hermione give Ron a little push and he hurried out of the lift,
followed by the other wizards, leaving Harry and Hermione alone. The moment
the golden door had closed Hermione said, very fast, “Actually, Harry, I think
I’d better go after him, I don’t think he knows what he’s doing and if he gets
caught the whole thing—”
“Level one, Minister of Magic and Support Staff.”
The golden grilles slid apart again and Hermione gasped. Four people stood
before them, two of them in deep conversation: a long-haired wizard wearing
magnificent robes of black and gold, and a squat, toad-like witch wearing a
velvet bow in her short hair and clutching a clipboard to her chest.
212 CHAPTER 12. MAGIC IS MIGHT
Chapter 13
The Muggle—born
Registration Commission
A
h, Mafalda!” said Umbridge, looking at Hermione. “Travers sent
you, did he?”
“Y—yes,” squeaked Hermione.
“Good, you’ll do perfectly well.” Umbridge spoke to the wizard in black and
gold. “That’s that problem solved, Minister, if Mafalda can be spared for recordkeeping we shall be able to start straightaway.” She consulted her clipboard.
“Ten people today and one of them the wife of a Ministry employee!! Tut, tut
. . . even here, in the heart of the Ministry!” She stepped into the lift beside
Hermione, as did the two wizards who had been listening to Umbridge’s conversation with the Minister. “We’ll go straight down, Mafalda, and you’ll find
everything you need in the courtroom.
“Good morning, Albert, aren’t you getting out?”
“Yes, of course,” said Harry in Runcorn’s deep voice.
Harry stepped out of the lift. The golden grilles clanged shut behind him.
glancing over his shoulder, Harry saw Hermione’s anxious face sinking back
out of sight, a tall wizard on either side of her, Umbridge’s velvet hair-bow
level with her shoulder.
213
214 CHAPTER 13. THE MUGGLE—BORN REGISTRATION COMMISSION
“What brings you up here, Runcorn?” asked the new Minister of Magic. His
long black hair and beard were streaked with silver, and a great overhanging
forehead shadowed his glinting eyes, putting Harry in mind of a crab looking
out from beneath a rock.
“Needed a quick word with,” Harry hesitated for a fraction of a second,
“Arthur Weasley. Someone said he was up on level one.”
“Ah,” said Pius Thickness. “Has he been caught having contact with an
Undesirable?”
“No,” said Harry, his throat dry. “No, nothing like that.”
“Ah, well. It’s only a matter of time,” said Thicknesse. “If you ask me, the
blood traitors are as bad as the Mudbloods. Good day, Runcorn.”
“Good day, Minister.”
Harry watched Thicknesse march away along the thickly carpeted corridor.
The moment the Minister had passed out of sight, Harry tugged the Invisibility
Cloak out from under his heavy black cloak, threw it over himself, and set off
along the corridor in the opposite direction. Runcorn was so tall that Harry
was forced to stoop to make sure his big feet were hidden.
Panic pulsed in the pit of his stomach. As he passed gleaming wooden door
after gleaming wooden door, each bearing a small plaque with the owner’s
name and occupation upon it, the might of the Ministry, its complexity, its
impenetrability, seemed to force itself upon him so that the plan he had been
carefully concocting with Ron and Hermione over the past four weeks seemed
laughably childish. They ha concentrated all their efforts on getting inside
without being detected. They had not given a moment’s thought to what they
would do if they were forced to separate. Now Hermione was stuck in court proceedings, which would undoubtedly last hours; Ron was struggling to do magic
that Harry was sure was beyond him, a woman’s liberty possibly depending on
the outcome; and he, Harry, was wandering around on the top floor when he
knew perfectly well that has quarry had just gone down in the lift.
He stopped walking, leaned against a wall, and tried to decide what to do.
The silence pressed upon him: There was no bustling or talk or swift footsteps
215
here; the purple-carpeted corridors were as hushed as though the Muffliato
charm had been cast over the place.
Her office must be up here, Harry thought.
It seemed most unlikely that Umbridge would keep her jewelry in her office,
but on the other hand it seemed foolish not to search it to make sure. He therefore set off along the corridor again, passing nobody but a frowning wizard who
was murmuring instructions to a quill that floated in front of him, scribbling
on a trail of parchment.
Now paying attention to the names on the doors, Harry turned a corner.
Halfway along the next corridor he emerged into a wide open space where a
dozen witches and wizards sat in rows at small desks not unlike school desks,
though much more highly polished and free from graffiti. Harry paused to
watch them, for the effect was quite mesmerizing. They were all waving and
twiddling their wands in unison, and squares of colored paper were flying in
every direction like little pink kites. After a few seconds, Harry realized that
there was a rhythm to the proceedings, that the papers all formed the same
pattern, and after a few more seconds he realized that what he was watching was the creation of pamphlets—that the paper squares were pages, which,
when assembled, folded, and magicked into place, fell into neat stacks beside
each witch or wizard.
Harry crept closer, although the workers were so intent on what they were
doing that he doubted they would notice a carpet-muffled footstep, and he slid
a completed pamphlet from the pile beside a young witch. He examined it
beneath the Invisibility Cloak. Its pink cover was emblazoned with a golden
title:
MUDBLOODS
and the Dangers They Pose to
a Peaceful Pure-Blood Society
Beneath the title was a picture of a red rose with a simpering face in the
middle of its petals, being strangled by a green weed with fangs and a scowl.
216 CHAPTER 13. THE MUGGLE—BORN REGISTRATION COMMISSION
there was no author’s name upon the pamphlet, but again, the scars on the
back of his right hand seemed to tingle as he examined it. then the young
witch beside him confirmed his suspicion as she said, still waving and twirling
her wand, “Will the old hag be interrogating Mudbloods all day, does anyone
know?”
“Careful,” said the wizard beside her, glancing around nervously; one of his
pages slipped and fell to the floor.
“what, has she got magic ears as well as an eye, now?”
the witch glanced toward the shining mahogany door facing the space full
of pamphlet-makers; Harry looked too, and rage reared in him like a snake.
Where there might have been a peephole on a Muggle front door, a large, round
eye with a bright blue iris had been set into the wood—an eye that was shockingly familiar to anybody who had known Alastor Moody.
For a split second Harry forgot where he was and what he was doing there:
He even forgot that he was invisible. He strode straight over to the door to
examine the eye. It was not moving: It gazed blindly upward, frozen. The
plaque beneath it read:
DOLORES UMBRIDGE
SENIOR UNDERSECRETARY TO THE MINISTER
Below that, a slightly shinier new plaque read:
HEAD OF THE MUGGLE-BORN
REGISTRATION COMMISSION
Harry looked back at the dozen pamphlet-makers: Though they were intent
upon their work, he could hardly suppose that they would not notice if the door
of an empty office opened in front of them. He therefore withdrew from an
inner pocket an odd object with little waving legs and a rubber-bulbed horn for
a body. Crouching down beneath the cloak, he placed the Decoy Detonator on
the ground.
It scuttled away at once through the legs of the witches and wizards in
front of him. A few moments later, during which Harry waited with his hand
217
upon the doorknob, there came a long band and a great deal of acrid black
smoke billowed from a corner. the young witch in the front row shrieked: Pink
pages flew everywhere as she and her fellows jumped up, looking around for the
source of the commotion. Harry turned the doorknob, stepped into Umbridge’s
office, and closed the door behind him.
He felt he had stepped back in time. The room was exactly like Umbridge’s
office at Hogwarts: Lace draperies, doilies, and dried flowers covered every
available surface. The walls bore the same ornamental plates, each featuring
a highly colored, beribboned kitten, gamboling and frisking with a sickening
cuteness. The desk was covered with a flouncy, flowered cloth. Behind MadEye’s eye, a telescopic attachment enabled Umbridge to spy on the workers on
the other side of the door. Harry took a look through it and saw that they were
all still gathered around the Decoy Detonator. He wrenched the telescope out of
the door, leaving a hole behind, pulled the magical eyeball out of it, and placed
it in his pocket. Then he turned to face the room again, raised his wand, and
murmured, “Accio Locket.”
Nothing happened, but he had not expected it to; no doubt Umbridge knew
all about protective charms and spells. He therefore hurried behind her desk
and began pulling open drawers. He saw quills and notebooks and Spellotape;
enchanted paper clips that coiled snakelike from their drawer and had to be
beaten back; a fussy little lace box full of spare hair bows and clips; but no sign
of a locket.
there was a filing cabinet behind the desk: Harry set to searching it. Like
Filch’s filing cabinets at Hogwarts, it was full of folders, each labeled with a
name. It was not until Harry reached the bottommost drawer that he saw
something to distract him from his search: Mr. Weasley’s file.
He pulled it out and opened it.
ARTHUR WEASLEY
218 CHAPTER 13. THE MUGGLE—BORN REGISTRATION COMMISSION
BLOOD STATUS Pureblood, but with unacceptable proMuggle leanings. Known member of the
Order of the Phoenix
FAMILY: Wife (pureblood), seven children, two
youngest at Hogwarts. NB: Youngest son
currently at home, seriously ill, Ministry
inspectors have confirmed.
SECURITY STATUS: TRACKED. All movements are being
monitored. Strong likelihood Undesirable
No. 1 will contact (has stayed with
Weasley family previously)
“Undesirable Number One,” Harry muttered under his breath as he replaced Mr. Weasley’s folder and shut the drawer. He had an idea he knew
who that was, and sure enough, as he straightened up and glanced around the
office for fresh hiding places, he saw a poster of himself on the wall, with the
words UNDESIRABLE NO. 1 emblazoned across his chest. A little pink note
was stuck to it with a picture of a kitten in the corner. Harry moved across to
read it and saw that Umbridge had written, “To be punished.”
Angrier than ever, he proceeded to grope in the bottoms of the vases and
baskets of dried flowers, but was not at all surprised that the locket was not
there. He gave the office one last sweeping look and his heart skipped a beat.
Dumbledore was staring at him from a small rectangular mirror, propped up
on a bookcase beside the desk.
Harry crossed the room and snatched it up, but realized the moment he
touched it that it was not am mirror at all. Dumbledore was smiling wistfully
out of the front cover of a glossy book, Harry had not immediately noticed the
curly green writing across his hat—The Life and Lies of Albus Dumbledore—
219
nor the slightly smaller writing across his chest: “by Rita skeeter, bestselling
author of Armando Dippet: Master or Moron?”
Harry opened the book at random and saw a full-page photograph of two
teenage boys, both laughing immoderately with their arms around each other’s
shoulders. Dumbledore, now with elbow-length hair, had grown a tiny wispy
beard that recalled the one on Krum’s chin that had so annoyed Ron. The boy
who roared in silent amusement beside Dumbledore had a gleeful, wild look
about him. His golden hair fell in curls to his shoulders. Harry wondered
whether it was a young doge, but before he could check the caption, the door of
the office opened.
If Thicknesse had not been looking over his shoulder as he entered, Harry
would not have had time to pull the Invisibility cloak over himself. As it was,
he thought Thicknesse might have caught a glimpse of movement because for
a moment or two he remained quite still, staring curiously at the place where
Harry had just vanished. Perhaps deciding that all he had seen was Dumbledore scratching his nose on the front of the book, for Harry had hastily replaced
it upon the shelf. Thicknesse finally walked to the desk and pointed his wand
at the quill standing ready in the ink pot. It sprang out and begun scribbling a
note to Umbridge. Very slowly, hardly daring to breathe, Harry backed out of
the office into the open area beyond.
The pamphlet-makers were still clustered around the remains of the Decoy
Detonator, which continued to hoot feebly as it smoked. Harry hurried off up
the corridor as the young witch said, “I bet it sneaked up here from Experimental Charms, they’re so careless, remember that poisonous duck?”
Speeding back toward the lifts, Harry reviewed his options. It had never
been likely that the locket was here at the Ministry, and there was no hope of
bewitching its whereabouts out of Umbridge while she was sitting in a crowded
court. Their priority now had to be to leave the Ministry before they were
exposed, and try again another day. The first thing to do was to find Ron, and
then they could work out a way of extracting Hermione from the courtroom.
The lift was empty when it arrived. Harry jumped in a pulled off the Invis-
220 CHAPTER 13. THE MUGGLE—BORN REGISTRATION COMMISSION
ibility Cloak as it started its descent. to his enormous relief, when it rattle to a
halt at level two, a soaking-wet and wild-eyed Ron got in.
“M-morning,” he stammered to Harry as the lift set off again.
“Ron, it’s me, Harry!”
“Harry! Blimey, I forgot what you looked like—why isn’t Hermione with
you?”
“She had to go down to the courtrooms with Umbridge, she couldn’t refuse,
and—”
But before Harry could finish the lift had stopped again. The doors opened
and Mr. Weasley walked inside, talking to an elderly witch whose blonde hair
was teased so high that it resembled an anthill.
“ . . . I quite understand what you’re saying, Wakanda, but I’m afraid I cannot be part to—”
Mr. Weasley broke off; he had noticed Harry. It was very strange to have
Mr. Weasley glare at him with that much dislike. The lift doors closed and the
four of them trundled downward once more.
“Oh, hello, Reg,” said Mr. Weasley, looking around at the sound of steady
dripping from Ron’s robes. “Isn’t your wife in for questioning today? Er—what’s
happened to you? Why are you so wet?”
“Yaxley’s office is raining,” said Ron. He addressed Mr. Weasley’s shoulder,
and Harry felt sure he was scared that his father might recognize him if they
looked directly into each other’s eyes. “I couldn’t stop it, so they’ve sent me to
get Bernie—Pillsworth, I think they said—”
“Yes, a lot of offices have been raining lately,” said Mr. Weasley. “Did you
try Meterolojinx Recanto? It worked for Bletchley.”
“Meterolojinx Recanto?” whispered Ron. “No, I didn’t. Thanks, D—I mean,
thanks, Arthur.”
The lift doors opened; the old witch with the anthill hair left, and Ron darted
past her out of sight. Harry made to follow him, but found his path blocked
as Percy Weasley strode into the lift, his nose buried in some papers he was
reading.
221
Not until the doors had clanged shut again did Percy realize he was in a lift
with his father. He glanced up, saw Mr. Weasley, turned radish red, and left
the lift the moment the doors opened again. For the second time, Harry tried
to get out, but this time found his way blocked by Mr. Weasley’s arm.
“One moment, Runcorn.”
The lift doors closed and as they clanked down another floor, Mr. Weasley
said, “I hear you laid information about Dirk Cresswell.”
Harry had the impression that Mr. Weasley’s anger was no less because of
the brush with Percy. He decided his best chance was to act stupid.
“Sorry?” he said.
“Don’t pretend, Runcorn,” said Mr. Weasley fiercely. “You down the wizard
who faked his family tree, didn’t you?”
“I—so what if I did?” said Harry.
“So Dirk Cresswell is ten times the wizard you are,” said Mr. Weasley quietly, as the lift sank ever lower. “And if he survives Azkaban, you’ll have to
answer to him, not to mention his wife, his sons, and his friends—”
“Arthur,” Harry interrupted, “you know you’re being tracked, don’t you?”
“Is that a threat, Runcorn?” said Mr. Weasley loudly.
“No,” said Harry, “it’s a fact! They’re watching your every move—”
The lift doors opened. They had reached the Atrium. Mr. Weasley gave
Harry a scathing look and swept from the lift. Harry stood there, shaken. He
wished he was impersonating somebody other than Runcorn. . . . the lift doors
clanged shut.
Harry pulled out the Invisibility Cloak and put it back on. He would try to
extricate Hermione on his own while Ron was dealing with the raining office.
When the doors opened, he stepped out into a torch-lit stone passageway quite
different from the wood-paneled and carpeted corridors above. As the lift rattled away again, Harry shivered slightly, looking toward the distant black door
that marked the entrance to the Department of Mysteries.
He set off, his destination not the black door, but the doorway he remembered on the left-hand side, which opened onto the flight of stairs down to the
222 CHAPTER 13. THE MUGGLE—BORN REGISTRATION COMMISSION
court chambers. His mind grappled with possibilities as he crept down them:
He still had a couple of Decoy Detonators, but perhaps it would be better to
simply knock on the courtroom door, enter as Runcorn, and ask for a quick
word with Mafalda? Of course, he did not know whether Runcorn was sufficiently important to get away with this, and eve if he managed it, Hermione’s
non-reappearance might trigger a search before they were clear of the Ministry. . . .
Lost in thought, he did not immediately register the unnatural chill that
was creeping over him, as if he were descending into fog. It was becoming
colder and colder with every step he took: a cold that reached right down into
his throat and tore at his lungs. And then he felt that stealing sense of despair,
of hopelessness, filling him, expanding inside him. . . .
Dementors, he thought.
As he reached the foot of the stairs and turned to his right he saw a dreadful
scene. The dark passage outside the courtrooms was packed with tall, black—
hooded figures, their faces completely hidden, their ragged breathing the only
sound in the place. The petrified Muggle-borns brought in for questioning sat
huddled and shivering on hard wooden benches. Most of them were hiding
their faces in their hands, perhaps in an instinctive attempt to shield themselves from the dementors’ greedy mouths. Some were accompanied by families, others sat alone. The dementors were gliding up an down in front of them,
and the cold, and the hopelessness, and the despair of the place laid themselves
upon Harry like a curse. . . .
Fight it, he told himself, but he knew that he could not conjure a Patronus
here without revealing himself instantly. So he moved forward as silently as
he could, and with every step he took numbness seemed to steal over his brain,
but he forced himself to think of Hermione and of Ron, who needed him.
Moving through the towering black figures was terrifying: The eyeless faces
hidden beneath their hoods turned as he passed, and he felt sure that they
sense him, sensed, perhaps, a human presence that still had some hope, some
resilience. . . .
223
And then, abruptly and shockingly amid the frozen silence, one of the dungeon doors on the left of the corridor was flung open and screams echoed out of
it.
“No, no, I’m a half-blood, I’m a half-blood, I tell you! My father was a wizard,
he was, look him up, Arkie Alderton, he’s a well-known broomstick designer,
look him up, I tell you—get your hands off me, get your hands off—”
“This is your final warning,” said Umbridge’s soft voice, magically magnified
so that it sounded clearly over the man’s desperate screams. “If you struggle,
you will be subjected to the Dementor’s Kiss.”
The man’s screams subsided, but dry sobs echoed through the corridor.
“Take him away,” said Umbridge.
Two dementors appeared in the doorway of the courtroom, their rotting,
scabbed hands clutching the upper arms of a wizard who appeared to be fainting. They glided away down the corridor with him, and the darkness they
trailed behind them swallowed him from sight.
“Next—Mary Cattermole,” called Umbridge.
A small woman stood up; she was trembling from head to foot. Her dark
hair was smoothed back into a bun and she wore long, plain robes. Her face was
completely bloodless. As she passed the dementors, Harry saw her shudder.
He did it instinctively, without any sort of plan, because he hated the sight
of her walking alone into the dungeon: As the door began to swing closed, he
slipped into the courtroom behind her.
It was not the same room in which he had once been interrogated for improper use of magic. This one was much smaller, though the ceiling was quite
as high; it gave the claustrophobic sense of being stuck at the bottom of a deep
well.
There were more dementors in here, casting their freezing aura over the
place; they stood like faceless sentinels in the corners farthest from the high
raised platform. Here, behind a balustrade, sat Umbridge, with Yaxley on one
side of her, and Hermione, quite as white-faced as Mrs. Cattermole, on the
other. At the foot of the platform, a bright-silver, long-haired cat prowled up
224 CHAPTER 13. THE MUGGLE—BORN REGISTRATION COMMISSION
and down, up and down, up and down, and Harry realized that it was there to
protect the prosecutors from the despair that emanated from the dementors:
That was for the accused to feel, not the accusers.
“Sit down,” said Umbridge in her soft, silky voice.
Mrs. Cattermole stumbled to the single seat in the middle of the floor beneath the raised platform. The moment she had sat down, chains clinked out
of the arms of the chair and bound her there.
“You are Mary Elizabeth Cattermole?” asked Umbridge.
Mrs. Cattermole gave a single, shaky nod.
“Married to Reginald Cattermole of the Magical Maintenance Department?”
Mrs. Cattermole burst into tears.
“I don’t know where he is, he was supposed to meet me here!”
Umbridge ignored her.
“Mother to Maisie, Ellie, and Alfred Cattermole?”
Mrs. Cattermole sobbed harder than ever.
“They’re frightened, they think I might not come home—”
“Spare us,” spat Yaxley. “The brats of Mudbloods do not stir our sympathies.”
Mrs. Cattermole’s sobs masked Harry’s footsteps as he made his way carefully toward the steps that led up to the raised platform. The moment he had
passed the place where the Patronus cat patrolled, he felt the change in temperature: It was warm and comfortable here. The Patronus, he was sure, was Umbridge’s, and it glowed brightly because she was so happy here, in her element,
upholding the twisted laws she had helped to write. Slowly, and very carefully,
he edged his way along the platform behind Umbridge, Yaxley, and Hermione,
taking a seat behind the latter. He was worried about making Hermione jump.
He thought of casting the Muffliato charm upon Umbridge and Yaxley, but even
murmuring the word might cause Hermione alarm. Then Umbridge raised her
voice to address Mrs. Cattermole, and Harry seized his chance.
“I’m behind you,” he whispered into Hermione’s ear.
As he had expected, she jumped so violently she nearly overturned the bot-
225
tle of ink with which she was supposed to be recording the interview, but both
Umbridge and Yaxley were concentrating upon Mrs. Cattermole, and this went
unnoticed.
“A wand was taken from you upon your arrival at the Ministry today, Mrs.
Cattermole,” Umbridge was saying, “Eight-and-three-quarter inches, cherry,
unicorn-hair core. Do you recognize that description?”
Mrs. Cattermole nodded, mopping her eyes on her sleeve.
“Could you please tell us from which witch or wizard you took that wand?”
“T—took?” sobbed Mrs. Cattermole. “I didn’t t-take it from anybody. I
b-bought it when I was eleven years old. It—it—it—chose me.”
She cried harder than ever.
Umbridge laughed a soft girlish laugh that made Harry want to attack her.
She leaned forward over the barrier, the better to observe her victim, and something gold swung forward too, and dangled over the void: the locked.
Hermione had seen it; she let out a little squeak, but Umbridge and Yaxley,
still intent upon their prey, were deaf to everything else.
“No,” said Umbridge, “no, I don’t think so, Mrs. Cattermole. Wands only
choose witches or wizards. You are not a witch. I have your responses to the
questionnaire that was sent to you here—Mafalda, pass them to me.”
Umbridge held out a small hand: She looked so toadlike at that moment
that Harry was quite surprised not to see webs between the stubby fingers.
Hermione’s hands were shaking with shock. She fumbled in a pile of documents
balanced on the chair beside her, finally withdrawing a sheaf of parchment with
Mrs. Cattermole’s name o nit.
“That’s—that’s pretty, Dolores,” she said, pointing at the pendant gleaming
in the ruffled folds of Umbridge’s blouse.
“What?” snapped Umbridge, glancing down. “Oh yes—an old family heirloom,” she said, patting the locket lying on her large bosom. “The S stands for
Selwyn. . . . I am related to the Selwyns. . . . Indeed, there are few pure blood
families to whom I am not related. . . . A pity,” she continued in a louder voice,
flicking through Mrs. Cattermole’s questionnaire, “that the same cannot be
226 CHAPTER 13. THE MUGGLE—BORN REGISTRATION COMMISSION
said for you. ‘Parents processions: greengrocers.”’
Yaxley laughed jeeringly. Below, the fluffy silver cat patrolled up and down,
and the dementors stood waiting in the corners.
It was Umbridge’s lie that brought the blood surging into Harry’s brain and
obliterated his sense of caution—that the locket she had taken as a bribe from
a petty criminal was being used to holster her own pure-blood credentials. He
raised his wand, not even troubling to keep it concealed beneath the Invisibility
Cloak, and said, “Stupefy!”
There was a flash of red light; Umbridge crumpled and her forehead hit the
edge of the balustrade: Mrs. Cattermole’s papers slid off her lap onto the floor
and, down below, the prowling silver cat vanished. Ice-cold air hit them like an
oncoming wind: Yaxley, confused, looked around for the source of the trouble
and saw Harry’s disembodied hand and wand pointing at him. He tried to draw
his own wand, but too late: “Stupefy!”
Yaxley slid to the ground to lie curled on the flood.
“Harry!”
“Hermione, if you think I was going to sit here and let her pretend—”
“Harry, Mrs. Cattermole!”
Harry whirled around, throwing off the Invisibility Cloak: down below, the
dementors had moved out of their corners: they were gliding toward the woman
chained to the chair: Whether because the Patronus had vanished or because
they sensed that their masters were no longer in control, they seemed to have
abandoned restraint. Mrs. Cattermole let out a terrible scream of fear as a
slimy, scabbed hand grasped her chin and forced her face back.
“EXPECTO PATRONUM!”
The silver stag soared from the tip of Harry’s wand and leaped toward the
dementors, which fell back and melted into the dark shadows again. The stag’s
light, more powerful and more warming than the cat’s protection, filed the
whole dungeon as it cantered around and around the room.
“Get the Horcrux,” Harry told Hermione.
He ran back down the steps, stuffing the Invisibility Cloak back into his
227
bag, and approached Mrs. Cattermole.
“You?” she whispered, gazing into his face. “But—but Reg said you were
the one who submitted my name for questioning!”
“Did I?” muttered Harry, tugging at the chains binding her arms.
“Well, I’ve had a change of heart. Diffindo!” Nothing happened. “Hermione,
how do I get rid of these chains?”
“Wait, I’m trying something up here—”
“Hermione, we’re surrounded by dementors!”
“I know that, Harry, but if she wakes up and the locket’s gone—I need to
replicate it—Geminio! There . . . That should fool her. dots”
Hermione came running downstairs.
“Let’s see. . . . Relashio!”
The chains clinked and withdrew into the arms of the chair. Mrs. Cattermole looked just as frightened as before.
“I don’t understand,” she whispered.
“You’re going to leave here with us,” said Harry, pulling her to her feet. “Go
home, grab your children, and get out, get out of the country if you’ve got to.
Disguise yourselves and run. You’ve seen how it is, you won’t get anything like
a fair hearing here.”
“Harry,” said Hermione, “how are we going to get out of here with all those
dementors outside the door?”
“Patronuses,” said Harry, pointing his wand at his own: The stag slowed and
walked, still gleaming brightly, toward the door. “As many as we can muster;
do yours, Hermione.”
“Expec—Expecto patronum,” said Hermione. Nothing happened.
“It’s the only spell she ever has trouble with,” Harry told a completely bemused Mrs. Cattermole. “Bit unfortunate, really . . . Come on, Hermione. . . .
”
“Expecto patronum!”
A silver otter burst from the end of Hermione’s wand and swam gracefully
through the air to join the stag.
228 CHAPTER 13. THE MUGGLE—BORN REGISTRATION COMMISSION
“C’mon,” said Harry, and he led Hermione and Mrs. Cattermole to the door.
When the Patronuses glided out of the dungeon there were cries of shock
from the people waiting outside. Harry looked around: the dementors were
falling back on both sides of them, melding into the darkness, scattering before
the silver creatures.
“It’s been decided that you should all go home and go into hiding with your
families.” Harry told the waiting Muggle-borns, who were dazzled by the light
of the Patronuses and still cowering slightly. “Go abroad if you can. Just get
well away from the Ministry. That’s the—er—new official position. Now, if
you’ll just follow the Patronuses, you’ll be able to leave from the Atrium.”
They managed to get up the stone steps without being intercepted, but as
they approached the lifts Harry started to have misgivings. If they emerged
into the Atrium with a silver stag, an otter soaring alongside it, and twenty
or so people, half of them accused Muggleborns, he could not help feeling that
they would attract unwanted attention. He had just reached this unwelcome
conclusion when the lift clanged to a halt in front of them.
“Reg!” screamed Mrs. Cattermole, and she threw herself into Ron’s arms.
“Runcorn let me out, he attacked Umbridge and Yaxley, and he’s told all of us
to leave the country, I think we’d better do it, Reg, I really do, let’s hurry home
and fetch the children and—why are you so wet?”
“Water,” muttered Ron, disengaging himself. “Harry, they know there are
intruders inside the Ministry, something about a hole in Umbridge’s office door.
I reckon we’ve got five minutes of that—”
Hermione’s Patronus vanished with a pop as she turned a horror struck face
to Harry.
“Harry, if we’re trapped here—!”
“We won’t be if we move fast,” said Harry. He addressed the silent group
behind them, who were all gawping at him.
“Who’s got wands?”
About half of them raised their hands.
“Okay, all of you who haven’t got wands need to attach yourself to someone
229
who has. We’ll need to be fast before they stop us. Come on.”
They managed to cram themselves into two lifts. Harry’s Patronus stood
sentinel before the golden grilles as they shut and the lifts began to rise.
“Level eight,” said the cool witch’s voice, “Atrium.”
Harry knew at once that they were in trouble. The Atrium was full of people
moving from fireplace to fireplace, sealing them off.
“Harry!” squeaked Hermione. “What are we going to—?”
“STOP!” Harry thundered, and the powerful voice of Runcorn echoed through
the Atrium: The wizards sealing the fireplaces froze. “Follow me,” he whispered to the group of terrified Muggleborns, who moved forward in a huddle,
shepherded by Ron and Hermione.
“What’s up, Albert?” said the same balding wizard who had followed Harry
out of the fireplace earlier. He looked nervous.
“This lot need to leave before you seal the exits,” said Harry with all the
authority he could muster.
The group of wizard sin front of him looked at one another.
“We’ve been told to seal all exits and not let anyone—”
“are you contradicting me?” Harry blustered. “Would you like me to have
you family tree examined, like I had Dirk Cresswell’s?”
“Sorry!” gasped the balding wizard, backing away. “I didn’t mean nothing,
Albert, but I thought . . . I thought they were in for questioning and . . . ”
“Their blood is pure,” said Harry, and his deep voice echoed impressively
through the hall. “Purer than many of yours. I daresay Off you go,” he boomed
to the Muggle-borns, who scurried forward into the fireplaces and began to vanish in pairs. The Ministry wizards hung back, some looking confused, others
scared and resentful. Then:
“Mary!”
Mrs. Cattermole looked over her shoulder. The real Reg Cattermole, no
longer vomiting but pale and wan, and just come running out of a lift.
“R-Reg?”
She looked from her husband to Ron, who swore loudly.
230 CHAPTER 13. THE MUGGLE—BORN REGISTRATION COMMISSION
The balding wizard gaped, his head turning ludicrously from one Reg Cattermole to the other.
“Hey—what’s going on? What is this?”
“Seal the exit! SEAL IT!”
Yaxley had burst out of another lift and was running toward the group beside the fireplaces into which all of the Muggle-borns but Mrs. Cattermole had
now vanished. As the balding wizard lifted his wand, Harry raised an enormous fist and punched him, sending him flying through the air.
“He’s been helping Muggle-borns escape, Yaxley!” Harry shouted.
The balding wizard’s colleagues set up an uproar, under cover of which Ron
grabbed Mrs. Cattermole, pulled her into the still-open fireplace, and disappeared. Confused, Yaxley looked from Harry to the punched wizard, while the
real Reg Cattermole screamed, “My Wife! Who was that with my wife? What’s
going on?”
Harry saw Yaxley’s head turn, saw an inkling of truth dawn in that brutish
face.
“Come on!” Harry shouted at Hermione; he seized her hand and they
jumped into the fireplace together as Yaxley’s curse sailed over Harry’s head.
They spun for a few seconds before shooting up out of a toilet into a cubicle. Harry flung open the door: Ron was standing there beside the sinks, still
wrestling with Mrs. Cattermole.
“Reg, I don’t understand—”
“Let go, I’m not your husband, you’ve got to go home!”
There was a noise in the cubicle behind them; Harry looked around: Yaxley
had just appeared.
“LET’S GO!” Harry yelled. He seized Hermione by the hand and Ron by the
arm and turned on the spot.
Darkness engulfed them, along with the sensation of compressing hands,
but something was wrong. . . . Hermione’s hand seemed to be sliding out of his
grip. . . .
He wondered whether he was going to suffocate; he could not breathe or see
231
and the only solid things in the world were Ron’s arm and Hermione’s fingers,
which were slowly slipping away. . . .
And then he saw the door of number twelves, Grimmauld Place, with its
serpent door knocker, but before he could draw breath, there was a scream and
a flash of purple light. Hermione’s hand was suddenly vicelike upon his hand
and everything went dark again.
232 CHAPTER 13. THE MUGGLE—BORN REGISTRATION COMMISSION
Chapter 14
The Thief
H
arry opened his eyes and was dazzled by gold and green: he had
no idea what had happened, he only knew that he was lying on
what seemed to be leaves and twigs. Struggling to draw breath
into lungs that felt flattened, he blinked and realized that the gaudy glare
was sunlight streaming though a canopy of leaves far above him. Then an
object twitched close to his face. He pushed himself onto his hands and knees,
ready to face some small, fierce creature, but saw that the object was Ron’s foot.
Looking around, Harry saw that they and Hermione were lying on a forest floor,
apparently alone.
Harry’s first thought was of the Forbidden Forrest, and for a moment, even
though eh knew how foolish and dangerous it would be for them to appear in
the grounds of Hogwarts, his heart leaped at the thought of sneaking through
the trees to Hagrid’s hut. However, in the few moments it took for Ron to give
a low groan and Harry to start crawling toward him, he realized that this was
not the Forbidden Forest: The trees looked younger, they were more widely
spaced, the ground clearer.
He met Hermione, also on her hands and knees, at Ron’s head. The moment
his eyes fell upon Ron, all other concerns fled Harry’s mind, for blood drenched
the whole of Ron’s left side and his face stood out, grayish-white, against the
233
234 CHAPTER 14. THE THIEF
leaf-strewn earth. The Polyjuice Potion was wearing off now: Ron was halfway
between Cattermole and himself in appearance, his hair turning redder and
redder as his face drained of the little color it had left.
“What’s happened to him?”
“Splinched,” said Hermione, her fingers already busy at Ron’s sleeve, where
the blood was wettest and darkest.
Harry watched, horrified, as she tore open Ron’s shirt. He had always
thought of Splinching as something comical, but this . . . His insides crawled
unpleasantly as Hermione laid bare Ron’s upper arm, where a great chunk of
flesh was missing, scooped cleanly away as though by a knife.
“Harry, quickly, in my bag, there’s a small bottle labeled ‘Essence of Dittany’—
”
“Bag—right—’
Harry sped tot he place where Hermione had landed, seized the tiny beaded
bag, and thrust his hand inside it. At once, object after object began presenting
itself to his touch: He felt the leather spines of books, woolly sleeves of jumpers,
heels of shoes—
“Quickly!”
“He grabbed his wand from the ground and pointed it into the depths of the
magical bag.
“Accio Dittany!”
A small brown bottle zoomed out of the bag; he caught it and hastened
back to Hermione and Ron, whose eyes were now half—closed, strips of white
eyeball all that were visible between his lids.
“He’s fainted,” said Hermione who was also rather pale; she no longer looked
like Mafalda, though her hair was still gray in places. “Unstopper it for me,
Harry, my hands are shaking.”
Harry wrenched the stopper off the little bottle, Hermione took it and poured
three drops of the potion onto the bleeding wound. Greenish smoke billowed
upward and when it had cleared, Harry saw that the bleeding had stopped.
The wound now looked several days old; new skin stretched over what had just
235
been open flesh.
“Wow,” said Harry.
“It’s all I feel safe doing,” said Hermione shakily. “There are spells that
would put him completely right, but I daren’t try in case I do them wrong and
cause more damage. . . . He’s lost too much blood already. . . . ”
“How did he get hurt? I mean”—Harry shook his head, trying to clear it,
to make sense of whatever had just taken place—“why are we here? I thought
were were going back to Grimmauld Place?”
Hermione took a deep breath. She looked close to tears.
“Harry, I don’t think we’re going to be able to go back there.”
“What d’you—?”
“As we Disapparated, Yaxley caught hold of me and I couldn’t get rid of him,
he was too strong, and he was still holding on when we arrived at Grimmauld
Place, and then—well, I think he must have seen the door, and thought we
were stopping there, so he slackened his grip and I managed to shake him off
and I brought us here instead!”
“But then, where’s he? Hang on. . . . You don’t mean he’s at Grimmauld
Place? He can’t get in there?”
Her eyes sparkled with unshed tears as she nodded.
“Harry, I think he can. I—I forced him to let go with a Revulsion Jinx, but I’d
already taken him inside the Fidelius Charm’s protection. Since Dumbledore
died, we’re Secret-Keepers, so I’ve given him the secret, haven’t I?”
There was no pretending; Harry was sure she was right. It was a serious
blow. If Yaxley could now get inside the house, there was no way that they
could return. Even now, he could be bringing other Death Eaters in there by
Apparition. Gloomy and oppressive though the house was, it had been their
one safe refuge: even, now that Kreacher was so much happier and friendlier,
a kind of home. With a twinge of regret that had nothing to do with food,
Harry imagined the house-elf busying himself over the steak-and-kidney pie
that Harry, Ron, and Hermione would never eat.
“Harry, I’m sorry, I’m so sorry!”
236 CHAPTER 14. THE THIEF
“Don’t be stupid, it wasn’t your fault! If anything, it was mine. . . . ”
Harry put his hand in his pocket and drew out Mad-Eye’s eye. Hermione
recoiled, looking horrified.
“Umbridge had stuck it to her office door, to spy on people. I couldn’t leave
it there . . . but that’s how they knew there were intruders.”
Before Hermione could answer, Ron groaned and opened his eyes. He was
still gray and his face glistened with sweat.
“How d’you feel?” Hermione whispered.
“Lousy,” croaked Ron, wincing as he felt his injured arm. ‘Where are we?”
“In the woods where they held the Quidditch World Cup,” said Hermione. “I
wanted somewhere enclosed, undercover, and this was—”
“—the first place you thought of,” Harry finished for her, glancing around
at the apparently deserted glade. He could not help remembering what had
happened the last time they had Apparated to the first place Hermione had
thought of—how Death Eaters had found them within minutes. Had it been
Legilimency? Did Voldemort or his henchmen know, even now, where Hermione
had taken them?
“D’you reckon we should move on?” Ron asked Harry, and Harry could tell
by the look on Ron’s face that he was thinking the same.
“I dunno.”
Ron still looked pale and clammy. He had made no attempt to sit up and it
looked as though he was too weak to do so. The prospect of moving him was
daunting.
“Let’s stay here for now,” Harry said..
Looking relieved, Hermione sprang to her feet.
“Where are we going?’ asked Ron.
“If we’re staying, we should put some protective enchantments around the
place,” she replied, and raising her wand, she began to walk in a wide circle
around Harry and Ron, murmuring incantations as she went. Harry saw little
disturbances in the surrounding air: It was as if Hermione had cast a heat
haze upon their clearing.
237
“Salvio Hexia . . . Protego Totalum . . . Repello Muggletum . . . Muffliato . . . You
could get out the tent, Harry . . . ”
“Tent?”
“In the bag!”
“In the . . . of course,” said Harry.
He did no bother to grope inside it this time, but used another Summoning
Charm. The tent emerged in a lumpy mass of canvas, rope, and poles. Harry
recognized it, partly because of the smell of cats, as the same tent in which they
had slept on the night of the Quidditch World Cup.
“I thought this belonged to that bloke Perkins at the Ministry?” he asked,
starting to disentangle the tent pegs.
“Apparently he didn’t want it back, his lumbago’s so bad,” said Hermione,
now performing complicated figure-of-eight movements with her wand, “so Ron’s
dad said I could borrow it. Erecto!” she added, pointing her wand at the misshapen canvas, which in one fluid motion rose into the air and settled, fully
constructed, onto the ground before Harry, out of whose started hands a tent
peg soared, to land with a final thud at the end of a guy rope.
“Cave Imunicium,” Hermione finished with a skyward flourish. “That’s as
much as I can do. At the very least, we should know they’re coming. I can’t
guarantee it will keep our Vol—”
“don’t say the name!” Ron cut across her, his voice harsh.
Harry and Hermione looked at each other.
“I’m sorry,” Ron said, moaning a little as he raised himself to look at them,
“but it feels like a—a jinx or something. Can’t we call him You-Know-Who—
please?”
“Dumbledore said fear of a name—” began Harry.
“In case you hadn’t noticed, mate, calling You-Know-Who by his name didn’t
do Dumbledore much good in the end,” Ron snapped back. “Just—just show
You-Know-Who some respect, will you?”
“Respect?” Harry repeated, but Hermione shot him a warning look; apparently he was not to argue with Ron while the latter was in such a weakened
238 CHAPTER 14. THE THIEF
condition.
Harry and Hermione half carried, half dragged Ron through the entrance
of the tent. The interior was exactly as Harry remembered it: a small flat,
complete with bathroom and tiny kitchen. He shoved aside an old armchair
and lowered Ron carefully onto the lower berth of a bunk bed. Even this very
short journey had turned Ron whiter still, and once they had settled him on
the mattress he closed his eyes again and did not speak for a while.
“I’ll make some tea,” said Hermione breathlessly, pulling kettle and mugs
from the depths of her bag and heading toward the kitchen.
Harry found the hot drink as welcome as the firewhisky had been on the
night that Mad-Eye had died; it seemed to burn away a little of the fear fluttering in his chest. After a minute or two, Ron broke the silence.
“What d’you reckon happened to the Cattermoles?”
“With any luck, they’ll have got away,” said Hermione, clutching her hot
mug for comfort. “As long as Mr. Cattermole had his withs about him, he’ll have
transported Mrs. Cattermole by Side-Along-Apparition and they’ll be fleeing
the country right now with their children. That’s what Harry told her to do.”
“Blimey, I hope they escaped,” said Ron, leaning back on his pillows. The
tea seemed to be doing him good; a little of his color had returned. “I didn’t get
the feeling Reg Cattermole was all that quick-witted, though, the way everyone
was talking to me when I was him. God, I hope they made it. . . . If they both
end up in Azkaban because of us . . . ”
Harry looked over at Hermione and the question he had wanted to ask—
about whether Mrs. Cattermole’s lack of a wand would prevent her Apparating
alongside her husband—died in his throat. Hermione was watching Ron fret
over the fate of the Cattermoles, and there was such tenderness in her expression that Harry felt as if he had surprised her in the act of kissing him.
“so, have you got it?” Harry asked her, partly to remind her that he was
there.
“Got—got what?” she said with a little start.
“What did we just go through all that for? The locket! Where’s the locket?”
239
“You got it?” shouted Ron, raising himself a little higher on his pillow. “No
one tells me anything! Blimey, you could have mentioned it!”
“Well, we were running for our lives from the Death Eaters, weren’t we?”
said Hermione. “Here.”
And she pulled the locket out of the pocket of her robes and handed it to
Ron.
It was as large as a chicken’s egg. An ornate letter S, inlaid with many
small green stones, glinted dully in the diffused light shining through the tent’s
canvas roof.
“There isn’t any chance someone’s destroyed it since Kreacher had it?” asked
Ron hopefully. “I mean, are we sure it’s still a Horcrux?”
“I think so,” said Hermione, taking it back from him and looking at it closely.
“there’d be some sign of damage if it had been magically destroyed.”
She passed it to Harry, who turned it over in his fingers. The thing looked
perfect, pristine. He remembered the mangled remains of the diary, and how
the stone in the Horcrux ring had been cracked open when Dumbledore destroyed it.
“I reckon Kreacher’s right,” said Harry. “We’re going to have to work out
how to open this thing before we can destroy it.”
Sudden awareness of what he was holding, of what lived behind the little
golden doors, hit Harry as he spoke. even after all their efforts to find it, he felt
a violent urge to fling the locket from him. Mastering himself again, he tried
to prise the locket apart with his fingers, then attempted the charm Hermione
had used to open Regulus’s bedroom door. Neither worked. He handed the
locket back to Ron and Hermione, each of whom did their best, but were no
more successful at opening it than he had been.
“Can you feel it, though?” Ron asked in a hushed voice, as he held it tight
in his clenched fist.
“What d’you mean?”
Ron passed the Horcrux to Harry. After a moment or two, Harry thought
he knew what Ron meant. Was it his own blood pulsing through his veins that
240 CHAPTER 14. THE THIEF
he could feel, or was it something beating inside the locket, like a tiny metal
heart?
“What are we going to do with it?” Hermione asked.
“Keep it safe till we work out how to destroy it.” Harry replied, and, little
though eh wanted to, he hung the chain around his own neck, dropping the
locket out of sight beneath his robes, where it rested against his chest beside
the pouch Hagrid had given him.
“I think we should take it in turns to keep watch outside the tent,” he added
to Hermione, standing up and stretching. “And we’ll need to think about some
food as well. You stay there,” he added sharply, as Ron attempted to sit up and
turned a nasty shade of green.
With the Sneakoscope Hermione had given Harry for his birthday set carefully upon the table in the tent, Harry and Hermione spent the rest of the
day sharing the role of lookout. However, the Sneakoscope remained silent and
still upon its point all day, and whether because of the protective enchantments
and Muggle-repelling charms Hermione had spread around them, or because
people rarely ventured this way, their patch of wood remained deserted, apart
from occasional birds and squirrels. Evening brought no change; Harry lit his
wand as he swapped places with Hermione at ten o’clock, and looked out upon
a deserted scene, nothing the bats fluttering high above him across the single
patch of starry sky visible from their protected clearing.
He felt hungry now, and a little light-headed. Hermione had not packed any
food in her magical bag, as she had assumed that they would be returning to
Grimmauld Place that night, so they had had nothing to eat except some wild
mushrooms that Hermione had collected from amongst the nearest trees and
stewed in a billycan. After a couple of mouthfuls Ron had pushed his portion
away, looking queasy: Harry had only persevered so as not to hurt Hermione’s
feelings.
The surrounding silence was broken by odd rustlings and what sounded like
crackings of twigs: Harry thought that they were caused by animals rather
than people, yet he kept his wand held tight at the ready. His insides, already
241
uncomfortable due to their inadequate helping of rubbery mushrooms, tingled
with unease.
He had thought that he would feel elated if they managed to steal back
the Horcrux, but somehow he did not; all he felt as he sat looking out at the
darkness, of which his wand lit only a tiny part, was worry about what would
happen next. It was as though he had been hurtling toward this point for
weeks, months, maybe even years, but now he had come to an abrupt half, run
out of road.
There were other Horcruxes out there somewhere, but he did not have the
faintest idea where they could be. He did not even know what all of them were.
Meanwhile he was at a loss to know how to destroy the only one that they
had found, the Horcrux that currently lay against the bare flesh of his chest.
Curiously, it had not taken heat from his body, but lay so cold against his skin
it might just have emerged from icy water. From time to time Harry thought,
or perhaps imagined, that he could feel the tiny heartbeat ticking irregularly
alongside his own.
Nameless forebodings crept upon him as he sat there in the dark. He tried
to resist them, push them away, yet they came at him, relentlessly, Neither can
live while the other survives. Ron and Hermione, now talking softly behind him
in the tent, could walk away if they wanted to: He could not. And it seemed
to Harry as he sat there trying to master his own fear and exhaustion, that
the Horcrux against his chest was ticking away the time he had left. . . . Stupid
idea, he told himself, don’t think that. . . .
His scar was starting to prickle again. He was afraid he was making it happen by having these thoughts, and tried to direct them into another channel.
He thought of poor Kreacher, who had expected them home and had received
Yaxley instead. Would the elf keep silent or would he tell the Death Eater everything he knew? Harry wanted to believe that Kreacher had changed toward
him in the past month, that he would be loyal now, but who knew what would
happen? What if the Death Eaters tortured the elf? Sick images swarmed
into Harry’s head and he tried to push these away too, for these was nothing
242 CHAPTER 14. THE THIEF
he could do for Kreacher. He and Hermione had already decided against trying to summon him; what if someone from the Ministry came too? They could
not count on elfish Apparition from being free of the same flaw that had taken
Yaxley to Grimmauld Place on the hem of Hermione’s sleeve.
Harry’s scar was burning now. He thought that there was so much they
did not know: Lupin had been right about magic they had never encountered
or imagined. Why hadn’t Dumbledore explained more? Had he thought that
there would be time; that he would live for years, for centuries, perhaps, like
his friend Nicolas Flamel? If so, he had been wrong. . . . Snape had seen to
that. . . . Snape, the sleeping snake, who had struck at the top of the tower. . .
And Dumbledore had fallen . . . fallen . . .
“Give it to me, Gregorovitch.”
Harry’s voice was high, clear, and cold, his wand held in front of him by a
long-fingered white hand. The man at whom he was pointing was suspended
upside down in midair, though there were no ropes holding him; he swung
there, invisibly and eerily bound, his limbs wrapped about him, his terrified
face, on a level with Harry’s, ruddy due to the blood that had rushed to his
head. He had pure-white hair and a thick, bushy beard: a trussed-up Father
Christmas.
“I have it not, I have it no more! It was, many years ago, stolen from me!”
“Do not lie to Lord Voldemort, Gregorovitch. He knows. . . . He always
knows.”
The hanging man’s pupils were wide, dilated with fear, and they seemed to
swell, bigger and bigger until their blackness swallowed Harry whole—
And now Harry was hurrying along a dark corridor in stout little Gregorovitch’s wake as he held a lantern aloft: Gregorovitch burst into the room
at the end of the passage and his lantern illuminated what looked like a workshop; wood shavings and gold gleamed in the swinging pool of light, and there
on the window ledge sat perched, like a giant bird, a young man with golden
hair. In the split second that the lantern’s light illuminated him, Harry saw
the delight upon his handsome face, then the intruder shot a Stunning Spell
243
from his wand and jumped neatly backwards out of the window with a crow of
laughter.
And Harry was hurtling back out of those wide, tunnel-like pupils and Gregorovitch’s face was stricken with terror.
“Who was the thief, Gregorovitch?” said the high cold voice.
“I do not know, I never know, a young man—no—please—PLEASE!”
A scream that went on and on and then a burst of green light—
“Harry!”
He opened his eyes, panting, his forehead throbbing. He had passed out
against the side of the tent, had slid sideways down the canvas, and was
sprawled on the ground. He looked up at Hermione, whose bushy hair obscured
the tiny patch of sky visible through the dark branches high above them.
“Dream,” he said, sitting up quickly and attempting to meet Hermione’s
glower with a look of innocence. ‘Must’ve dozed off, sorry.”
“I know it was your scar! I can tell by the look on your face! You were
looking into Vol—”
“Don’t say his name!” came Ron’s angry voice from the depths of the tent.
“Fine,” retorted Hermione. “You-Know-Who’s mind, then!”
“I didn’t mean it to happen!” Harry said. “It was a dream! Can you control
what you dream about, Hermione?”
“If you just learned to apply Occlumency.
But Harry was not interested in being told off; he wanted to discuss what
he had just seen.
“He’s found Gregorovitch, Hermione, and I think he’s killed him, but before
he killed him he read Gregorovitch’s mind and I saw—”
“I think I’d better take over the watch if you’re so tired you’re falling asleep,”
said Hermione coldly.
“I can finish the watch!”
“No, you’re obviously exhausted. Go and lie down.”
She dropped down in the mouth of the tent, looking stubborn. Angry, but
wishing to avoid a row, Harry ducked back inside.
244 CHAPTER 14. THE THIEF
Ron’s still-pale face was poking out from the lower bunk; Harry climbed
into the one above him, lay down, and looked up at the dark canvas ceiling.
After several minutes, Ron spoke in a voice so low that it would not carry to
Hermione, huddled in the entrance.
“What’s You-Know-Who doing?”
Harry screwed up his eyes in the effort to remember every detail, then whispered into the darkness.
“He found Gregorovitch. He had him tied up, he was torturing him.”
“How’s Gregorovitch supposed to make him a new wand if he’s tied up?”
“I dunno. . . . I’ts weird, isn’t it?”
Harry closed his eyes, thinking of all he had seen and heard. The more he
recalled, the less sense it made. . . . Voldemort had said nothing about Harry’s
wand, nothing about the twin cores, nothing about Gregorovitch making a new
and more powerful wand to beat Harry’s. . . .
“He wanted something from Gregorovitch,” Harry said, eyes still closed
tight. “He asked him to hand it over, but Gregorovitch said it had been stolen
from him . . . and then . . . then . . . ”
He remembered how he, as Voldemort, had seemed to hustle through Gregorovitch’s eyes, into his memories. . . .
“He read Gregorovitch’s mind, and I saw this young bloke perched on a
windowsill, and he fired a curse at Gregorovitch and jumped out of sight. He
stole it, he stole whatever You-Know-Who’s after. And I . . . I think I’ve seen
him somewhere. . . .”
Harry wished he could have another glimpse of the laughing boy’s face. The
theft had happened many years ago, according to Gregorovitch. Why did the
young thief look so familiar?
The noises of the surrounding woods were muffled inside the tent; all Harry
could hear was Ron’s breathing. After a while, Ron whispered, “Couldn’t you
see what the thief was holding?”
“No . . . it must’ve been something small.”
“Harry?”
245
The wooden slats of Ron’s bunk creaked as he repositioned himself in bed.
“Harry, you don’t reckon You-Know-Who’s after something else to turn into
a Horcrux?”
“I don’t know,” said Harry slowly, “Maybe. But wouldn’t it be dangerous for
him to make another one? didn’t Hermione say he had pushed his soul to the
limit already?”
“Yeah, but maybe he doesn’t know that.”
“Yeah . . . maybe,” said Harry.
He had been sure that Voldemort had been looking for a way around the
problem of the twin cores, sure that Voldemort sought a solution from the old
wandmaker . . . and yet he had killed him, apparently without asking him a
single question about wandlore.
What was Voldemort trying to find? Why, with the Ministry of Magic and
the Wizarding world at his feet, was he far away, intent on the pursuit of an
object that Gregorovitch had once owned, and which had been stolen by the
unknown thief?
Harry could still see the blond-haired youth’s face; it was merry, it was wild;
there was a Fred and George-ish air of triumphant trickery about him. He had
soared from the windowsill like a bird, and Harry had seen him before, but he
could not think where. . . .
With Gregorovitch dead, it was the merry-faced thief who was in danger
now, and it was on him that Harry’s thoughts dwelled, as Ron’s snores began
to rumble from the lower bunk and as he himself drifted slowly into sleep once
more.
246 CHAPTER 14. THE THIEF
Chapter 15
The Goblin’s Revenge
E
arly next morning, before the other two were awake, Harry left the
tent to search the woods around them for the oldest, most gnarled,
and resilient—looking tree he could find. There in its shadow he
buried Mad-Eye Moody’s eye and marked the spot by gouging a small cross in
the bark with his wand. It was not much, but Harry felt that Mad-Eye would
have much preferred this to being stuck on Dolores Umbridge’s door. Then he
returned to the tent to wait for the others to wake, and discuss what they were
going to do next.
Harry and Hermione felt that it was best not to stay anywhere too long, and
Ron agreed, with the sole proviso that their next move took them within reach
of a bacon sandwich. Hermione therefore removed the enchantments she had
placed around the clearing, while Harry and Ron obliterated all the marks and
impressions on the ground that might show that they had camped there. Then
they Disapparated to the outskirts of a small market town.
Once they had pitched the tent in the shelter of a small copse of trees and
surrounded it with freshly cast defensive enchantments, Harry ventured out
under the Invisibility Cloak to find sustenance. This, however, did not go as
planned. He had barely entered the town when an unnatural chill, a descending mist, and a sudden darkening of the skies made him freeze where he stood.
247
248 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
“But you can make a brilliant Patronus!” protested Ron, when Harry arrived back at the tent empty-handed, out of breath, and mouthing the single
word, dementors.
“I couldn’t . . . make one,” he panted, clutching the stitch in his side. “Wouldn’t
come.”
Their expressions of consternation and disappointment made Harry feel
ashamed. It had been a nightmarish experience, seeing the dementors gliding
out of the mist in the distance and realizing, as the paralyzing cold choked his
lungs and a distant screaming filled his ears, that he was not going to be able
to protect himself. It had taken all Harry’s will power to uproot himself from
the spot and run, leaving the eyeless dementors to glide amongst the Muggles
who might not be able to see them, but would assuredly feel the despair they
cast wherever they went.
“so we still haven’t got any food.”
“Shut up, Ron,” snapped Hermione. “Harry, what happened? Why do you
think you couldn’t make your Patronus? You managed perfectly yesterday ”
“I don’t know.”
He sat low in one of Perkins’s old armchairs, feeling more humiliated by the
moment. He was afraid that something had gone wrong inside him. Yesterday
seemed a long time ago. Today he might have been thirteen years old again,
the only one who collapsed on the Hogwarts Express.
Ron kicked a chair leg.
“What?” he snarled at Hermione. “I’m starving! All I’ve had since I bled
half to death is a couple of toadstools!”
“You go and fight your way through the dementors, then,” said Harry, stung.
“I would, but my arm’s in a sling, in case you hadn’t noticed!”
“That’s convenient.”
“And what’s that supposed to—?”
“Of course!” cried Hermione, clapping a hand to her forehead and startling
both of them into silence. “Harry, give me the locket! Come on,” she said
impatiently, clicking her fingers at him, when he did not react, “the Horcrux,
249
Harry, you’re still wearing it!”
She held out her hands, and Harry lifted the golden chain over his head.
The moment it parted contact with Harry’s skin he felt free and oddly light. He
had not even realized that he was clammy or that there was a heavy weight
pressing on his stomach until both sensations lifted.
“Better?” asked Hermione.
“Yeah, loads better!”
“Harry,” she said, crouching down in front of him and using the kind of
voice he associated with visiting the very sick, “you don’t think you’ve been
possessed, do you?”
“What? No!” he said defensively. “I remember everything we’ve done while
I’ve been wearing it. I wouldn’t know what I’d done if I’d been possessed, would
I? Ginny told me there were times when she couldn’t remember anything.’
“Hmm,” said Hermione, looking down at the heavy gold locket.
“Well, maybe we ought not to wear it. We can just keep it at the tent.”
“We are not leaving that Horcrux lying around,” Harry stated firmly. “If we
lose it, if it gets stolen—”
“Oh, all right, all right,” said Hermione, and she placed it around her own
neck and tucked it out of sight down the front of her shirt. “But we’ll take turns
wearing it, so nobody keeps it on for too long.”
“Great,” said Ron irritably, “and now we’ve sorted that out, can we please
get some food?”
“Fine, but we’ll go somewhere else to find it,” said Hermione with half a
glance at Harry. “There’s no point staying where we know dementors are
swooping around.”
In the end they settled down for the night in a far flung field belonging to a
lonely farm, from which they had managed to obtain eggs and bread.
“It’s not stealing, is it?” asked Hermione in a troubled voice, as they devoured scrambled eggs on toast. “Not if I left some money under the chicken
coop?”
Ron rolled his eyes and said, with his cheeks bulging, “’Er—my—nee, ’oo
250 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
worry ’oo much. ‘Elax!”
And, indeed, it was much easier to relax when they were comfortably well
fed. The argument about the dementors was forgotten in the laughter that
night, and Harry felt cheerful, even hopeful as he took the first of the three
night watches.
This was their encounter with the fact that a full stomach meant good spirits; an empty one, bickering and gloom. Harry was least surprised by this,
because he had suffered periods of near starvation at the Dursleys. Hermione
bore up reasonably well on those nights when they managed to scavenge nothing but berries or stale biscuits, her temper perhaps a little shorter than usual
and her silences rather dour. Ron, however, had always been used to three delicious meals a day, courtesy of his mother or of the Hogwarts house-elves, and
hunger made him both unreasonable and irascible. Whenever lack of food coincided with Ron’s turn to wear the Horcrux, he became downright unpleasant.
“So where next?” was his constant refrain. He did not seem to have any
ideas himself, but expected Harry and Hermione to come up with plans while
he sat and brooded over the low food supplies. Accordingly Harry and Hermione
spent fruitless hours trying to decide where they might find the other Horcruxes, and how to destroy the one they had already got, their conversations
becoming increasingly repetitive as they had no new information.
As Dumbledore had told Harry that he believed Voldemort had hidden the
Horcruxes in places important to him, they kept teching, in a sort of dreary
litany, those locations they knew that Voldemort had lived or visited. The orphanage where he had been born and raised; Hogwarts, where he had been
educated; Borgin and Burkes, where he had worked after completing school;
then Albania, where he had spent his years of exile: These formed the basis of
their speculations.
“Yeah, let’s go to Albania. Shouldn’t take more than an afternoon to search
an entire country,” said Ron sarcastically.
“There can’t be anything there. He’d already made five of his Horcruxes
before he went into exile, and Dumbledore was certain the snake is the sixth,”
251
said Hermione. “We know the snake’s not in Albania, it’s usually with Vol—”
“Didn’t I ask you to stop saying that?”
“Fine! The snake is usually with You-Know-Who—happy?”
“Not particularly.”
“I can’t see him hiding anything at Borgin and Burkes,” said Harry, who
made this point many times before, but said it again simply to break the nasty
silence. “Borgin and Burke were experts at Dark objects, they wouldn’t recognized a Horcrux straightaway.”
Ron yawned pointedly. Repressing a strong urge to throw something at him,
Harry plowed on, “I still reckon he might have hidden something at Hogwarts.”
Hermione sighed.
“But Dumbledore would have found it, Harry!”
Harry repeated the argument he kept bringing out in favor of this theory.
“Dumbledore said in front of me that he never assumed he knew all of Hogwarts’s secrets. I’m telling you, if there was one place Vol—”
“oi!”
“YOU-KNOW-WHO, then!” Harry shouted, goaded past endurance. “If
there was one place that was really important to You-Know-Who, it was Hogwarts!”
“Oh, come on,” scoffed Ron. “His school?”
“Yeah, his school! It was his first real home, the place that meant he was
special: it meant everything to him, and even after he left—” inquired Ron. He
was tugging at the chain of the Horcrux around his neck: Harry was visited by
a desire to seize it and throttle him.
“You told us that You-Know-Who asked Dumbledore to give him a job after
he left,” said Hermione.
“That’s right,” said Harry.
“And Dumbledore thought he only wanted to come back to try and find something, probably another founder’s object, to make into another Horcrux?”
“Yeah,” said Harry.
252 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
“But he didn’t get the job, did he?” said Hermione. “So he never got the
chance to find a founder’s object there and hide it in the school!”
“Okay, then,” said Harry, defeated. “Forget Hogwarts.”
Without any other leads, they traveled into London and, hidden beneath
the Invisibility Cloak, searched for the orphanage in which Voldemort had been
raised. Hermione stole into a library and discovered from their records that the
place had been demolished many years before. They visited its site and found
a tower block of offices.
“We could try digging in the foundations?” Hermione suggested halfheartedly.
“He wouldn’t have hidden a Horcrux here,” Harry said. He had known all
along: The orphanage had been the place Voldemort had been determined to
escape; he would never have hidden a part of his soul there. Dumbledore had
shown Harry that Voldemort sought grandeur or mystique in his hiding places;
this dismal gray corner of London was as far removed as you could imagine
from Hogwarts or the Ministry or a building like Gringotts, the Wizarding
bank, with its golden doors and marble floors.
Even without any new ideas, they continued to move through the countryside, pitching the tent in a different place each night for security. Every morning they made sure that they had removed all clues to their presence, then set
off to find another lonely and secluded spot, traveling by Apparition to more
woods, to the shadowy crevices of cliffs, to purple moors, gorse-covered mountainsides, and once a sheltered a pebbly cove. Every twelves hours or so they
passed the Horcrux between them as though they were playing some perverse,
slow-motion game of pass-the-parcel, where they dreaded the music stopping
because the reward was twelve hours of increased fear and anxiety.
Harry’s scar kept prickling. It happened most often, he noticed, when he
was wearing the Hocrux. Sometimes he could not stop himself reacting to the
pain.
“What? What did you see?” demanded Ron, whenever he noticed Harry
wince.
253
“A face,” muttered Harry, every time. “The same face. The thief who stole
from Gregorovitch.”
And Ron would turn away, making no effort to hide his disappointment.
Harry knew that Ron was hoping to hear news of his family or of the rest of
the Order of the Phoenix, but after all, he, Harry, was not a television aerial;
he could only see what Voldemort was thinking at the time, not tune in to
whatever took his fancy. Apparently Voldemort was dwelling endlessly on the
unknown youth with the gleeful face, whose name and whereabouts, Harry felt
sure, Voldemort knew no better than he did. As Harry’s scar continued to burn
and the merry, blond-haired by swam tantalizingly in his memory, he learned
to suppress any sign of pain or discomfort, for the other two showed nothing
but impatience at the mention of the thief. He could not entirely blame them,
when they were so desperate for a lead on the Horcruxes.
As the days stretched into weeks, Harry began to suspect that Ron and
Hermione were having conversations without, and about, him. Several times
they stopped talking abruptly when Harry entered the tent, and twice he came
accidentally upon them, huddled a little distance away, heads together and
talking fast; both times they fell silent when they realized he was approaching
them and hastened to appear busy collecting wood or water.
Harry could not help wondering whether they had only agreed to come on
what now felt like a pointless and rambling journey because they thought he
had some secret plan that they would learn in due course. Ron was making
no effort to hide his bad mood, and Harry was starting to fear that Hermione
too was disappointed by his poor leadership. In desperation he tried to think
of further Horcrux locations, but the only one that continued to occur to him
was Hogwarts, and as neither of the other thought this at all likely, he stopped
suggesting it.
Autumn rolled over the countryside as they moved through it. They were
now pitching the tent on mulches of fallen leaves. Natural mists joined those
cast by the dementors: wind and rain added to their troubles. The fact that
Hermione was getting better at identifying edible fungi could not altogether
254 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
compensate for their continuing isolation, the lack of other people’s company,
or their total ignorance of what was going on in the war against Voldemort.
“My mother,” said Ron one night, as they sat in the tent on a riverbank in
Wales, “can make good fear appear out of thin air.”
He prodded moodily at the lumps of charred gray fish on his plate. Harry
glanced automatically at Ron’s neck and saw, as he had expected, the golden
chain of the Horcrux glinting there. He managed to fight down the impulse to
swear at Ron, whose attitude, he knew, improve slightly when the time came
to take off the locket.
“Your mother can’t produce food out of thin air,” said Hermione. “No one can.
Food is one of the first of five Principal Exceptions to Gamp’s Law of Elemental
Transfigur—’
“Oh, speak English, can’t you?” Ron said, prising a fish bone out from between his teeth.
“It’s impossible to make good food out of nothing! You can Summon it if you
know where it is, you can transform it, you can increase the quantity if you’ve
already got some—”
“Well, don’t bother increasing this, it’s disgusting,” said Ron.
“Harry caught the fish and I did my best with it! I notice I’m always the one
who ends up sorting out the food, because I’m a girl, I suppose!”
“No, it’s because you’re supposed to be the best at magic!” shot back Ron.
Hermione jumped up and bits of roast pike slid off her tin plate onto the
floor.
“You can do the cooking tomorrow, Ron, you can find the ingredients and try
and charm them into something worth eating, and I’ll sit here and pull faces
and moan and you can see how you—”
“Shut up!” said Harry, leaping to his feet and holding up both hands. “Shut
up now!”
Hermione looked outraged.
“How can you side with him, he hardly ever does the cook—”
“Hermione, be quiet, I can hear someone!”
255
He was listening hard, his hands still raised, warning them not to talk.
Then, over the rush and gush of the dark river beside them, he heard voices
again. He looked around at the Sneakoscope. It was not moving.
“You cast the Muffliato charm over us, right?” he whispered to Hermione.
“I did everything,” she whispered back, “Muffliato, Muggle-Repelling and
Disillusionment Charms, all of it. They shouldn’t be able to hear or see us,
whoever they are.”
Heavy scuffling and scraping noises, plus the sound of dislodged stones and
twigs told them that several people were clambering down the steep, wooded
slope that descended to the narrow bank where they had pitched the tent. They
drew their wands, waiting. The enchantments they had cast around themselves ought to be sufficient, ion the near total darkness, to shield them from
the notice of Muggles and normal witches and wizards. If these were Death
Eaters, then perhaps their defenses were about to be tested by Dark Magic for
the first time.
The voices became louder but no more intelligible as the group of men
reached the bank. Harry estimated that their owners were fewer than twenty
feet away, but the cascading river made it impossible to tell for sure. Hermione
snatched up the beaded bag and started to rummage; after a moment she drew
out three Extendable Ears and threw one each to Harry and Ron, who hastily
inserted the ends of the flesh-colored strings into their ears and fed the other
ends out of the tent entrance.
Within second Harry heard a weary male voice.
“There ought to be a few salmon in here, or d’you reckon it’s too early in the
season? Accio Salmon!”
There were several distinct splashes and then the slapping sounds of fish
against flesh. Somebody grunted appreciatively, Harry pressed the Extendable
Ear deeper into his own: Over the murmur of the river he could make out more
voices, bu they were not speaking English or any human language he had ever
heard. It was a rough and unmelodious tongue, a string of rattling, guttural
noises, and there seemed to be two speakers, one with a slightly lower, slower
256 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
voice than the other.
A fire danced into life on the other side of the canvas; large shadows passed
between tent and flames. The delicious smell of baking salmon wafted tantalizingly in their direction. Then came the clinking of cutlery on plates, and the
first man spoke again.
“Here, Griphook, Gornuk.”
Goblins! Hermione mouthed at Harry, who nodded.
“Thank you,” said the goblins together in English.
“So, you three been on the run how long?” asked a new, mellow, and pleasant
voice; it was vaguely familiar to Harry, who pictured a round-bellied, cheerfulfaced man.
“Six weeks . . . seven . . . I forget,” said the tired man. “Met up with Griphook
in the first couple of days and joined forces with Gornuk not long after. Nice
to have a bit of company.” There was a pause, while knives scraped plates and
tin mugs were picked up and replaced on the ground. “What made you leave,
Ted?” continued the man.
“Knew they were coming for me,” replied mellow-voiced Ted, and Harry
suddenly knew who he was: Tonks’s father. “Heard Death Eaters were in the
area last week and decided I’d better run for it. Refused to register as a Muggleborn on principle, see, so I knew it was a matter of time, knew I’d have to leave
in the end. My wife should be okay, she’s pure-blood. And then I meant Dean
where, what, a few days ago, son?”
“Yeah,” said another voice, and Harry, Ron, and Hermione stared at each
other, silent but beside themselves with excitement, sure they recognized the
voice of Dean Thomas, their fellow Gryffindor.
“Muggle-born, eh?” asked the first man.
“Not sure,” said Dean. “My dad left my mum when I was a kid. I’ve got no
proof he was a wizard, though.”
There was silence for a while, except for the sounds of munching; then Ted
spoke again.
I’ve got to say, Dirk, I’m surprised to run into you. Pleased, but surprised.
257
Word was you’d been caught.”
“I was,” said Dirk. “I was halfway to Azkaban when I made a break for it.
Stunned Dawlish, and nicked his broom. It was easier than you’d think; I don’t
think he’s quite at the moment. Might be Confunded. If so, I’d like to shake
the hand of the witch or wizard who did it, probably saved my life.”
There was another pause in which the fire crackled and the river rushed
on. Then Ted said, “And where do you two fit in? I, er, had the impression the
goblins were for You-Know-Who, on the whole.”
“You had a false impression,” said the higher voiced of the goblins. “We take
no sides. This is a wizards’ war.”
“How come you’re in hiding, then?”
‘I deemed it prudent,” said the deeper-voiced goblin. “Having refused what
I considered an impertinent request, I could see that my personal safety was
in jeopardy.”
“What did they ask you to do?” asked Ted.
“Duties ill-befitting the dignity of my race,” replied the goblin, his voice
rougher and less human as he said it. “I am not a house-elf.”
“What about you, Griphook?”
“Similar reasons,” said the higher voiced goblin. “Gringotts is no longer
under the sole control of my race. I recognize no Wizarding master.”
He added something under his breath in Gobbledegook, and Gornuk laughed.
“What’s the joke?” asked Dean.
“He said,” replied Dirk, “that there are things wizards don’t recognize, either.”
There was a short pause.
“I don’t get it,” said Dean.
“I had my small revenge before I left,” said Griphook in English.
“Good man—goblin, I should say,” amended Ted hastily. “Didn’t manage to
lock a Death Eater up in one of the old high-security vaults, I suppose?”
“If I had, the sword would not have helped him break out,” replied Griphook.
Gornuk laughed again and even Dirk gave a dry chuckle.
258 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
“Dean and I are still missing something here,” said Ted.
“So is Severus Snape, though he does not know it,” said Griphook, and the
two goblins roared with malicious laughter. Inside the tent Harry’s breathing
was shallow with excitement: He and Hermione stared at each other, listening
as hard as they could.
“didn’t you hear about that, Ted?” asked Dirk. “About the kid who tried to
steal Gryffindor’s sword out of Snape’s office at Hogwarts?”
And electric current seemed to curse through Harry, jangling his every
nerve as he stood rooted to the spot.
“Never heard a word,” said Ted. “Not in the Prophet, was it?”
“Hardly,” chortled dirk. “Griphook here told me, he heard about it from Bill
Weasley who works for the bank. One of the kids who tried to take the sword
was Bill’s younger sister.”
Harry glanced toward Hermione and Ron, both of whom were clutching the
Extendable Ears as tightly as lifelines.
“She and a couple of friends got into Snape’s office and smashed open the
glass case where he was apparently keeping the sword. Snape caught them as
they were trying to smuggle it down the staircase.”
“Ah, God bless ’em,” said Ted. “What did they think, that they’d be able to
use the sword on You-Know-Who? Or on Snape himself?”
“Well, whatever they thought they were going to do with it, Snape decided
the sword wasn’t safe where it was,” said Dirk. “Couple of days later, once he’d
got the say-so from You-Know-Who, I imagine, he sent it down to London to be
kept in Gringotts instead.”
The goblins started to laugh again.
“I’m still not seeing the joke,” said Ted.
“It’s a fake,” rasped Griphook.
“The sword of Gryffindor!”
“Oh yes. It is a copy-an excellent copy, it is true-but it was Wizard-made.
The original was forged centuries ago by goblins and had certain properties
only goblin-made armor possesses. Wherever the genuine sword of Gryffindor
259
is, it is not in a vault at Gringotts bank.”
“I see,” said Ted. “And I take it you didn’t bother telling the Death Eaters
this?”
“I saw no reason to trouble them with the information,” said Griphook
smugly, and now Ted and Dean joined in Gornuk and Dirk’s laughter.
Inside the tent, Harry closed his eyes, willing someone to ask the question
he needed answered, and after a minute that seemed ten, Dean obliged: he was
(Harry remembered with a jolt) an ex-boyfriend of Ginny’s too.
“What happened to Ginny and the others? The ones who tried to steal it?”
“Oh, they were punished, and cruelly,” said Griphook indifferently.
“They’re okay, though?” asked Ted quickly. “I mean, the Weasley don’t need
any more of their kids injured, do they?”
“They suffered no serious injury, as far as I am aware,” said Griphook.
“Lucky for them,” said Ted. “With Snape’s track record I suppose we should
just be glad they’re still alive.”
“You believe that story, then, do you, Ted?” asked Dirk. “You believe Snape
killed Dumbledore?”
“Course I do,” said Ted. “you’re not going to sit there and tell me you think
Potter had anything to do with it?”
“Hard to know what to believe these days,” muttered Dirk.
“I know Harry Potter,” said Dean. “And I reckon he’s the real thing—The
Chosen One, or whatever you want to call it.”
“Yeah, there’s a lot would like to believe he’s that, son,” said Dirk, me included. But where is he? Run for it, by the looks of things. You’d think if he
knew anything we don’t, or had anything special going for him, he’d be out
there now fighting, rallying resistance, instead of hiding. And you know, the
Prophet made a pretty good case against him—”
“The Prophet?” scoffed Ted. “You deserved to be lied to if you’re still reading
that muck, Dirk. You want the facts, try the Quibbler.”
There was a sudden explosion of choking and retching, plus a good deal
of thumping; by the sound of it, Dirk had swallowed a fish bone. At last he
260 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
spluttered, “The Quibbler? That lunatic rag of Xeno Lovegood’s?”
“It’s not so lunatic these days,” said Ted. “you wan tot give it a look. Xeno is
printing all the stuff the Prophet’s ignoring, not a single mention of CrumpleHorned Snorkacks in the last issue. How long they’ll let you get away with
it, mind, I don’t know. But Xeno says, front page of every issue, that any wizard who’s against You-Know-Who ought to make helping Harry Potter their
number-one priority.”
“Hard to help a boy who’s vanished off the face of the earth,” said Dirk.
“Listen, the fact that they haven’t caught him yet’s one hell of an achievement,” said Ted. “I’d take tip from him gladly; It’s what we’re trying to do, stay
free, isn’t it?”
“Yeah, well, you’ve got a point there,” said Dirk heavily. “With the whole of
the Ministry and all their informers looking for him I’d have expected him to
be caught by now. Mind, who’s to say they haven’t already caught and killed
him without publicizing it?”
“Ah, don’t say that, Dirk,” murmured Ted.
There was a long pause filled with more clattering of knives and forks.
When they spoke again it was to discuss whether they ought to sleep on the
bank or retreat back up the wooded slope. Deciding the trees would give better
cover, they extinguished their fire, then clambered back up the incline, their
voices fading away.
Harry, Ron, and Hermione reeled in the Extendable Ears. Harry, who had
found the need to remain silent increasingly difficult the longer they eavesdropped, now found himself unable to say more than, “Ginny—the sword—”
“I know!” said Hermione.
She lunged for the tiny beaded bag, this time sinking her arm in it right up
to the armpit.
“Here . . . we . . . are . . . ” she said between gritted teeth, and she pulled at
something that was evidently in the depths of the bag. Slowly the edge of an
ornate picture frame came into sight. Harry hurried to help her. As they lifted
the empty portrait of Phineas Nigellus free of Hermione’s bag, she kept her
261
wand pointing at it, ready to cast a spell at any moment.
“If somebody swapped the real sword for the fake while it was in Dumbledore’s office,” she panted, as they propped the painting against the side of the
tent, “Phineas Nigellus would have seen it happen, he hangs right beside the
case!”
“Unless he was asleep,” said Harry, but he still held his breath as Hermione
knelt down in the front of the empty canvas, her wand directed at its center,
cleared her throat, then said:
“Er—Phineas? Phineas Nigellus?”
Nothing happened.
“Phineas Nigellus?” said Hermione again. “Professor Black? Please could
we talk to you? Please?”
“‘Please’ always helps,” said a cold, snide voice, and Phineas Nigellus slid
into his portrait. At once, Hermione cried:
“Obscura!”
A black blindfold appeared over Phineas Nigellus’s clever, dark eyes, causing him to bump into the frame and shriek with pain.
“What—how dare—what are you—?”
“I’m very sorry, Professor Black,” said Hermione, “but it’s a necessary precaution!”
“Remove this foul addition at once! Remove it, I say! You are ruining a
great work of art! Where am I? What is going on?”
“Never mind where we are,” said Harry, and Phineas Nigellus froze, abandoning his attempts to peel off the painted blindfold.
“Can that possibly be the voice of the elusive Mr. Potter?”
“Maybe,” said Harry, knowing that this would keep Phineas Nigellus’s interest. “We’ve got a couple of questions to ask you—about the sword of Gryffindor.”
“Ah,” said Phineas Nigellus, now turning his head this way and that in an
effort to catch sight of Harry, “yes. That silly girl acted most unwisely there—”
“Shut up about my sister,” said Ron roughly. Phineas Nigellus raised supercilious eyebrows.
262 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
“Who else is here?” he asked, turning his head from side to side. “Your
tone displeases me! The girl and her friends were foolhardy in the extreme.
Thieving from the headmaster.”
“They weren’t thieving,” said Harry. “That sword isn’t Snape’s.”
“It belongs to Professor Snape’s school,” said Phineas Nigellus. “Exactly
what claim did the Weasley girl have upon it? She deserved his punishment,
as did the idiot Longbottom and the Lovegood oddity!”
“Neville is not an idiot and Luna is not an oddity!” said Hermione.
“Where am I?” repeated Phineas Nigellus, starting to wrestle with the blindfold again. “Where have you brought me? Why have you removed me from the
house of my forebears?”
“Never mind that! How did Snape punish Ginny, Neville, and Luna?” asked
Harry urgently.
“Professor Snape sent them into the Forbidden Forest, to do some work for
the oaf, Hagrid.”
“Hagrid’s not an oaf!” said Hermione shrilly.
“And Snape might’ve thought that was a punishment,” said Harry, “but
Ginny, Neville, and Luna probably had a good laugh with Hagrid. The Forbidden Forest . . . they’ve faced plenty worse than the Forbidden Forest, big deal!”
He felt relieved: he had been imagining horrors, the Cruciatus Curse at the
very least.
“What we really wanted to know, Professor Black, is whether anyone else
has, um, taken out the sword at all? Maybe it’s been taken away for cleaning
or—or something?”
Phineas Nigellus paused again in his struggles to free his eyes and sniggered.
“Muggle-borns,” he said. “Goblin-made armor does not require cleaning,
simple girl. Goblins’ silver repels mundane dirt, imbibing only that which
strengthens it.”
“Don’t call Hermione simple,” said Harry.
“I grow weary of contradiction,” said Phineas Nigellus. “Perhaps it is time
263
for me to return to the headmaster’s office?”
Still blindfolded, eh began groping the side of his frame, trying to feel a
way out of his picture and back into the one at Hogwarts. Harry had a sudden
inspiration.
“Dumbledore! Can’t you bring us Dumbledore?”
“I beg you pardon?” asked Phineas Nigellus.
“Professor Dumbledore’s portrait—couldn’t you bring him along, here, into
yours?”
Phineas Nigellus turned his face in the direction of Harry’s voice.
“Evidently it is not only Muggle-borns whoa re ignorant, Potter. The portraits of Hogwarts may commune with each other, but they cannot ravel outside
the castle except to visit a painting of themselves hanging elsewhere. Dumbledore cannot come here with me, and after the treatment I have received at
your hands, I can assure you that I shall not be making a return visit!”
Slightly crestfallen, Harry watched Phineas redouble his attempts to leave
his frame.
“Professor Black,” said Hermione, “couldn’t you just tell us, please, when
was the last time the sword was taken out of its case? Before Ginny took it out,
I mean?”
Phineas snorted impatiently.
“I believe the last time I saw the sword of Gryffindor leave its case was when
Professor Dumbledore used it to break open a ring.”
Hermione whipped around to look at Harry. Neither of them dared say more
in front of Phineas Nigellus, who had at last managed to locate the exit.
“Well, good night to you,” he said a little waspishly, and he began to move
out of sight again. Only the edge of his hat brim remained in view when Harry
gave a sudden shout.
“Wait! Have you told Snape you saw this?”
Phineas Nigellus stuck his blindfolded head back into the picture.
“Professor Snape has more important things on his mind than the many
eccentricities of Albus Dumbledore. Good-bye, Potter!”
264 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
And with that;, he vanished completely, leaving behind him nothing but his
murky backdrop.
“Harry!” Hermione cried.
“I know!” Harry shouted. Unable to contain himself, he punched the air:
it was more than he had dared to hope for. He strode up and down the tent,
feeling that he could have run a mile: he did not even feel hungry anymore.
Hermione was squashing Phineas Nigellus’s portrait back into the beaded bag,
when she had fastened their clasp she threw the bag aside and raised a shining
face to Harry.
“The sword can destroy Horcruxes! Goblin-made blades imbibe only that
which can strengthen them—Harry, that sword’s impregnated with basilisk
venom!”
“And Dumbledore didn’t give it to me because he still needed it, he wanted
to use it on the locket—”
“—and he must have realized they wouldn’t let you have it if he put in his
will—”
“—so he made a copy—”
“—and put a fake in the glass case—”
“—and he left the real one—where?”
They gazed at each other: Harry felt the answer was dangling invisibly in
the air above them, tantalizingly close. Why hadn’t Dumbledore told him? Or
had he, in fact, told Harry, but Harry had not realized it at the time?
“Think!” whispered Hermione. “Think! Where would he have left it?”
“Not at Hogwarts,” said Harry, resuming his pacing.
“Somewhere in Hogsmeade?” suggested Hermione.
“The Shrieking Shack?” said Harry. “Nobody ever goes in there.”
But Snape knows how to get in, wouldn’t that be a bit risky?”
Dumbledore trusted Snape,” Harry reminded her.
Not enough to tell him that he had swapped the words,” said Hermione.
“Yeah, you’re right!” said Harry, and he felt even more cheered at the
thought that Dumbledore had some reservations, however faint, about Snape’s
265
trustworthiness. “So, would he have hidden the sword well away from Hogsmeade
then? What d’you reckon, Ron? Ron?”
Harry looked around. For one bewildered moment he thought that Ron had
left the tent, then realized that Ron was lying in the shadow of a lower bunk,
looking stony.
“Oh, remembered me, have you?” he said.
“What?”
Ron snorted as he started up at the underside of the upper bunk.
“You two carry on. Don’t let me spoil your fun.”
Perplexed, Harry looked to Hermione for help, but she shook her head, apparently as nonplussed as he was.
“What’s the problem?” asked Harry.
“Problem? There’s no problem,” said Ron, still refusing to look at Harry.
“Not according to you, anyway.”
There were several plunks on the canvas over their heads. It had started to
rain.
“Well, you’ve obviously got a problem,” said Harry. “Spit it out, will you?”
Ron swung his long legs off the bed and sat up. He looked mean, unlike
himself.
“All right, I’ll spit it out. Don’t expect me to skip up and down the tent
because there’s some other damn thing we’ve got to find. Just add it to the list
of stuff you don’t know.”
“I don’t know?” repeated Harry. “I don’t know?”
Plunk, plunk, plunk. The rain was falling harder and heavier;; it pattered
on the leaf-strewn bank all around them and into the river chattering through
the dark. Dread doused Harry’s jubilation. Ron was saying exactly what he
had suspected and feared him to be thinking.
“It’s not like I’m not having the time of my life here,” said Ron, “you know,
with my arm mangled and nothing to eat and freezing my backside off every
night. I just hoped, you know, after we’d been running round a few weeks, we’d
have achieved something.”
266 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
“Ron,” Hermione said, but in such a quiet voice that Ron could pretend not
to have heard it over the loud tattoo the rain was now beating on the tent.
“I thought you knew what you’d signed up for,” said Harry.
“Yeah, I thought I did too.”
“So what part of it isn’t living up to expectations?” asked Harry. Anger was
coming to his defense now. “Did you think we’d be staying in five-star hotels?
Finding a Horcrux every other day? Did you think you’d be back to Mummy7
by Christmas?”
“We thought you knew what you were doing!” shouted Ron, standing up,
and his words pierced Harry like scalding knives. “We thought Dumbledore
had told you want to do, we thought you had a real plan!”
“Ron!” said Hermione, this time clearly audible over the rain thundering on
the tent roof, but again, he ignored her.
“Well, sorry to let you down,” said Harry, his voice quite calm even though
he felt hollow, inadequate. “I’ve been straight with you from the start, I told
you everything Dumbledore told me. And in case you haven’t noticed, we’ve
found on Horcrux—”
“Yeah, and we’re about as near getting rid of it as we are to finding the rest
of them—nowhere effing near in other words?”
“Take off the locket, Ron,” Hermione said, her voice unusually high. “Please
take it off. You wouldn’t be talking like this if you hadn’t been wearing it all
day.”
“Yeah, he would,” said Harry, who did not want excuses made for Ron.
“D’you think I haven’t noticed the two of you whispering behind my back?
D’you think I didn’t guess you were thinking this stuff?”
“Harry we weren’t—”
“Don’t lie!” Ron hurled at her. “you said it too, you said you were disappointed, you said you’d thought he had a bit more to go on than—”
“I didn’t say it like that—Harry, I didn’t!” she cried.
The rain was pounding the tent, tears were pouring down Hermione’s face,
and the excitement of a few minutes before had vanished as if it had never
267
been, a short-lived firework that had flared and died, leaving everything dark,
wet, and cold. The sword of Gryffindor was hidden they knew not where, and
they were three teenagers in a tent whose only achievement was not, yet, to be
dead.
“So why are you still here?” Harry asked Ron.
“Search me,” said Ron.
“Go home then,” said Harry.
“Yeah, maybe I will!” shouted Ron, and he took several steps toward Harry,
who did not back away. “Didn’t you hear what they said about my sister? But
you don’t give a rat’s fart, do you, it’s only the Forbidden Forest, Harry I’veFaced-Worse Potter doesn’t care what happens to her in there—well, I do, all
right, giant spider and mental stuff—”
“I was only saying—she was with the others, they were with Hagrid—”
“Yeah, I get it, you don’t care! And what about the rest of my family, the
Weasleys don’t need another kid injured, did you hear that?”
“Yeah, I—”
“Not bothered what it meant, though?”
“Ron!” said Hermione, forcing her way between them. “I don’t think it
means anything new has happened, anything we don’t know about: think, Ron,
Bill’s already scarred; plenty of people must have seen that George has lost an
ear by now, and you’re supposed to be on your deathbed with spattergroit, I’m
sure that’s all he meant—”
“Oh, you’re sure, are you? Right then, well, I won’t bother myself about
them. It’s all right for you two, isn’t it, with your parents safely out of the
way—”
“My parents are dead!” Harry bellowed.
“And mine could be going the same way!” yellow Ron.
“Then GO!” roared Harry. “Go back to them, pretend you’ve got over your
spattergroit and Mummy’ll be able to feed you up and—”
Ron made a sudden movement: Harry reacted, but before either wand was
clear of its owner’s pocket, Hermione had raised her own.
268 CHAPTER 15. THE GOBLIN’S REVENGE
“Protego!” she cried, and an invisible shield expanded between her and
Harry on the one side and Ron on the other; all of them were forced backward
a few steps by the strength of the spell, and Harry and Ron glared from either
side of the transparent barrier as though they were seeing each other clearly
for the first time. Harry felt a corrosive hatred toward Ron: Something had
broken between them.
“Leave the Horcrux,” Harry said.
Ron wrenched the chain from over his head and cast the locket into a nearby
chair. He turned to Hermione.
“What are you doing?”
“What do you mean?”
“Are you staying or what?”
“I. . . ” She looked anguished. “Yes—yes, I’m staying, Ron, we said we’d go
with Harry, we said we’d help—”
“I get it. You choose him.”
“Ron, no—please—come back, come back!”
She was impeded by her own Shield charm; by the time she had removed
it he had already stormed into the night. Harry stood quite still and silent,
listening to her sobbing and calling Ron’s name amongst the trees.
After a few minutes she returned, her sopping hair plastered to her face.
“He’s g-g-gone! Disapparated!”
She threw herself into a chair, curled up, and started to cry.
Harry felt dazed. He stooped, picked up the Horcrux, and placed it around
his own neck. He dragged blankets off Ron’s bunk and threw them over Hermione.
Then he climbed onto his own bed and stared up at the dark canvas roof, listening to the pounding of the rain.

Chapter 16
Godric’s Hollow

When Harry woke the following day it was several seconds before he remembered what had happened. Then he hoped, childishly, that it had been a dream, that Ron was still there and
never left. Yet by turning his head on his pillow he could see Ron’s deserted
bunk. It was like a dead body in the way it seemed to draw his eyes. Harry
jumped down from his own bed, keeping his eyes averted from Ron’s. Hermione,
who was already busy in the kitchen, did not wish Harry good morning, but
turned her face away quickly as he went by.
He’s gone. Harry told himself. He’s gone. He had to keep thinking it as he
washed and dressed, as though repetition would dull the shock of it. He’s gone
and he’s not coming back. And that was the simple truth of it. Harry knew,
because their protective enchantments meant that it would be impossible, once
they vacated this spot, for Ron to find them again.
He and Hermione ate breakfast in silence. Hermione’s eyes were puffy and
red; she looked as if she had not slept. They packed up their things, Hermione
dawdling. Harry knew why she wanted to spin out their time on the riverbank;
several times he saw her look up eagerly and he was sure she had deluded
herself into thinking that she heard footsteps through the heavy rain, but no
red-haired figure appeared between the trees. Every time Harry imitated her,
269
270 CHAPTER 16. GODRIC’S HOLLOW
looked around (for he could not help hoping a little, himself) and saw nothing
but rain-swept woods, another little parcel of fury exploded inside him. He
could hear Ron saying, “We thought you knew what you were doing!”, and he
resumed packing with a hard knot in the pit of his stomach.
The muddy river beside them was rising rapidly and would soon spill over
onto their bank. They had lingered a good hour after they would usually have
departed their campsite. Finally having entirely repacked the beaded bag three
times. Hermione seemed unable to find any more reasons to delay: She and
Harry grasped hands and Disapparated, reappearing on a windswept heathercovered hillside.
The instant they arrived, Hermione dropped Harry’s hand and walked away
from him, finally sitting down on a large rock; her face on her knees,shaking
with what he knew were sobs. He watched her, supposing that he ought to go
and comfort her, but something kept him rooted to the spot. Everything inside
him felt cold and tight: Again he saw the contemptuous expression on Ron’s
face. Harry strode off through the heather, walking in a large circle with the
distraught Hermione at its center, casting the spells she usually performed to
ensure their protection.
They did not discuss Ron at all over the next few days. Harry was determined never to mention his name again, and Hermione seemed to know that it
was no use forcing the issue, although sometimes at night when she thought he
was sleeping, he would hear her crying. Meanwhile Harry had started bringing out the Marauder’s Map and examining it by wandlight. He was waiting
for the moment when Ron’s labeled dot would reappear in the corridors of Hogwarts, proving that he had returned to the comfortable castle, protected by his
status of pureblood. However, Ron did not appear on the map, and after a while
Harry found himself taking it out simply to stare at Ginny’s name in the girls’
dormitory, wondering whether the intensity with which he gazed at it might
break into her sleep, that she would somehow know he was thinking about her,
hoping that she was all right.
By day, they devoted themselves to trying to determine the possible loca-
271
tions of Gryffindor’s sword, but the more they talked about the places in which
Dumbledore might have hidden it, the more desperate and far-fetched their
speculation became. Cudgel his brains though he might, Harry could not remember Dumbledore ever mentioning a place in which he might hide something. There were moments when he did not know whether he was angrier
with Ron or with Dumbledore. We thought you knew what you were doing. . . .
We thought Dumbledore had told you what to do. . . . We thought you had a real
plan!
He could not hide it from himself: Ron had been right. Dumbledore had
left him virtually nothing. They had discovered one Horcrux, but they had
no means of destroying it: The others were as unattainable as they had ever
been. Hopelessness threatened to engulf him. He was staggered now to think
of his own presumption in accepting his friends’ offers to accompany him on
this meandering, pointless journey. He knew nothing, he had no ideas, and he
was constantly painfully on the alert for any indication that Hermione too was
about to tell him that she had had enough, that she was leaving.
They were spending many evenings in near silence, and Hermione took to
bringing out Phineas Nigellus’s portrait and propping it up in a chair, as though
he might fill part of the gaping hole left by Ron’s departure. Despite his previous assertion that he would never visit them again, Phineas Nigellus did
not seem able to resist the chance to find out more about what Harry was up
to, and consented to reappear, blindfolded, every few days or so. Harry was
even glad to see him, because he was company, albeit of a snide and taunting kind. They relished any news about what was happening in Hogwarts,
though Phineas Nigellus was not an ideal informer. He venerated Snape, the
first Slytherin headmaster since he himself had controlled the school, and they
had to be careful not to criticize or ask impertinent questions about Snape, or
Phineas Nigellus would instantly leave his painting.
However, he did let drop certain snippets. Snape seemed to be facing a
constant, low level of mutiny from a hard core of students. Ginny had been
banned from going into Hogsmeade. Snape had reinstated Umbridge’s old de-
272 CHAPTER 16. GODRIC’S HOLLOW
cree forbidding gatherings of three or more students or any unofficial student
societies.
From all of these things, Harry deduced that Ginny, and probably Neville
and Luna along with her, had been doing their best to continue Dumbledore’s
Army. This scant news made Harry want to see Ginny so badly it felt like
a stomachache; but it also made him think of Ron again, and of Dumbledore,
and of Hogwarts itself, which he missed nearly as much as his ex-girlfriend. Indeed as Phineas Nigellus talked about Snape’s crackdown, Harry experienced
a split second of madness when he imagined simply going back to school to join
the destabilization of Snape’s regime. Being fed, and having a soft bed, and
other people being in charge, seemed the most wonderful prospect in the world
at that moment. But then he remembered that he was Undesirable Number
One,that there was a ten-thousand-Galleon price on his head, and that to walk
into Hogwarts these days was just as dangerous as walking into the Ministry
of Magic. Indeed, Phineas Nigellus inadvertently emphasized this fact by slipping in leading questions about Harry and Hermione’s whereabouts. Hermione
shoved him back inside the beaded bag every time he did this, and Phineas
Nigellus invariably refused to reappear for several days after these unceremonious good—byes.
The weather grew colder and colder. They did not dare remain in any one
area too long, so rather than staying in the south of England, where a hard
ground frost was the worst of their worries, they continued to meander up and
down the country, braving a mountainside, where sleet pounded the tent; a
wide, flat marsh, where the tent was flooded with chill water: and a tiny island
in the middle of a Scottish loch, where snow buried the tent in the night.
They already spotted Christmas trees twinkling from several sitting room
windows before there came an evening when Harry resolved to suggest, again,
what seemed to him the only unexplored avenue left to them. They had just
eaten an unusually good meal: Hermione had been to a supermarket under
the Invisibility Cloak (scrupulously dropping the money into an open till as
she left), and Harry thought she might be more persuadable than usual on a
273
stomach full of spaghetti Bolognese and tinned pears. He had also had the foresight to suggest that they take a few hours’ break from wearing the Horcrux,
which was hanging over the end of the bank beside him.
“Hermione?”
“Hmm?” She was curled up in one of the sagging armchairs with The Tales
of Beedle the Bard. He could not imagine how much more she could get out
of the book, which was not, after all, very long, but evidently she was still deciphering something in it, because Spellman’s Syllabary lay open on the arm
of the chair. Harry cleared his throat. He felt exactly as he had done on the
occasion, several years previously, when he had asked Professor McGonagall
whether he could go into Hogsmeade, despite the fact that he had not persuaded the Dursleys to sign his permission slip.
“Hermione, I’ve been thinking, and—“
“Harry, could you help me with something?”
Apparently she had not been listening to him. She leaned forward and held
out The Tales of Beedle the Bard.
“Look at the symbol.” She said, pointing to the top of a page. Above what
Harry assumed was the title of the story (being unable to read runes, he could
not be sure), there was a picture of what looked like a triangular eye, its pupil
crossed with a vertical line.
“I never took Ancient Runes, Hermione”
“I know that, but it isn’t a rune and it’s not in the syllabary, either. All along
I thought it was a picture of an eye, but I don’t think it is! It’s been inked in,
look, somebody’s drawn it there, it isn’t really part of the book. Think, have
you ever seen it before?”
“No . . . No, wait a moment.” Harry looked closer. “Isn’t it the same symbol
Luna’s dad was wearing around his neck?”
“Well, that’s what I thought too!”
“Then it’s Grindelwald’s mark”
She stared at him, open mouthed.
“What?”
274 CHAPTER 16. GODRIC’S HOLLOW
“Krum told me . . . “
He recounted the story that Viktor Krum had told him at the wedding.
Hermione looked astonished,
“Grindelwald’s mark?”
She looked from Harry to the weird symbol and back again. “I’ve never
heard that Grindelwald had a mark. There’s no mention of it in anything I’ve
read about him.”
“Well, like I say, Krum reckoned that symbol was carved on a wall at Durmstrang, and Grindelwald put it there.”
She fell back into the old armchair, frowning.
“That’s very o. If it’s a symbol of Dark Magic, what’s it doing in a book of
children’s stories?”
“Yeah it is weird.” Said Harry. “And you’d think Scrimgeour would have
recognized it. He was Minister, he ought to have been expert of Dark stuff ”
“I know . . . Perhaps he thought it was an eye, just like I did. All the other
stories have little pictures over the titles.”
She did not speak, but continued to pore over the strange mark. Harry tried
again.
“Hermione?”
“Hmm?”
“I’ve been thinking. I—I want to go to Godric’s Hollow.”
She looked up at him, but her eyes were unfocused, and he was sure she
was still thinking about the mysterious mark on the book.
“Yes.” She said. “Yes, I’ve been wondering that too. I really think we’ll have
to.”
“Did you hear me right?” he asked.
“Of course I did. You want to go to Godric’s Hollow. I agree, I think we
should. I mean, I can’t think of anywhere else it could be either. It’ll be dangerous, but the more I think about it, the more likely it seems it’s there.”
“Er—what’s there?” asked Harry.
At that, she looked just as bewildered as he felt.
275
“Well, the sword, Harry! Dumbledore must have known you’d want to go
back there, and I mean, Godric’s Hollow is Godric Gryffindor’s birthplace—“
“Really? Gryffindor came from Godric’s Hollow?”
“Harry, did you ever even open A History of Magic?”
“Erm,” he said, smiling for what felt like the first time in months. The
muscles in his face felt oddly stiff. “I might’ve opened you know, when I bought
it . . . just the once . . . “
“Well as the village is named after him I’d have thought you might have
made the connection.” Said Hermione. She sounded much more like her old
self that she had done of late; Harry half expected her to announce that she
was off to the library. “There’s a bit about the village in A History of Magic,
wait . . . “
She opened the beaded bag and rummaged for a while, finally extracting
her copy of the old school textbook. A History of Magic by Bathilda Bagshot,
which she thumbed through until finding the page she wanted.
“Upon the signature of the International Statute of Secrecy in 1689, wizards
went into hiding for good. It was natural, perhaps, that they formed their own
small communities within a community. Many small villages and hamlets attracted several magical families, who banded together for mutual support and
protection. The villages of Tinworthin Cornwald, Upper Flagley in Yorkshire,
and Ottery St. Catchpole on the south coast of England were notable homes to
knots of Wizarding families who lived alongside tolerant and sometimes Confunded Muggles. Most celebrated of these half-magical dwelling places is, perhaps, Godric’s Hollow, the West Country village where the great wizard Godric
Gryffindor was born, and where Bowman Wright, Wizarding smith, forged the
first Golden Snitch. The graveyard is full of the names of ancient magical families, and this accounts, no doubt for the stories of haunting’s that have dogged
the little church beside it for many centuries.”
“You and your parents aren’t mentioned.” Hermione said, closing the book,
“because Professor Bagshot doesn’t cover anything later than the end of the
nineteenth century. But you see? Godric’s Hollow, Godric Gryffindor. Gryffindor’s
276 CHAPTER 16. GODRIC’S HOLLOW
sword: don’t you think Dumbledore would have expected you to make the connection?”
“Oh yeah . . . “
Harry did not want to admit that he had not been thinking about the sword
at all when he suggested they go to Godric’s Hollow. For him, the lure of the
village lay as his parents’ graves, the house where he had narrowly escaped
death, and in the person of Bathilda Bagshot.
“Remember what Muriel said?” he asked eventually.
“Who?”
“You know” he hesitated. He did not want to say Ron’s name. “Ginny’s
great-aunt. At the wedding. The one who said you had skinny ankles.”
“Oh.” Said Hermione. It was a sticky moment: Harry knew that she had
sensed Ron’s name in the offing. He rushed on:
“She said Bathilda Bagshot still lives in Godric’s Hollow.”
“Bathilda Bagshot,” murmured Hermione, running her index finger over
Bathilda’s embossed name on the front cover of A History of Magic. “Well, I
suppose—“
She gasped so dramatically that Harry’s insides turned over, he drew his
wand, looking around at the entrance, half expecting to see a hand forcing it
sway through the entrance flap, but there was nothing there.
“What?” he said, half angry, half relieved. “What did you do that for?
Thought you’d seen a Death Eater unzipping the tent, at least—“
“Harry, what if Bathilda’s got the sword? What if Dumbledore entrusted it
to her?”
Harry considered this possibility. Bathilda would be an extremely old woman
by now, and according to Muriel, she was “gaga.” Was it likely that Dumbledore would have hidden the sword of Gryffindor with her? If so, Harry felt that
Dumbledore had left a great deal to chance: Dumbledore had never revealed
that he had replaced the sword with a fake, nor had he so much mentioned
a friendship with Bathilda. Now, however, was not the moment to cast doubt
on Hermione’s theory, not when she was so surprisingly willing to fall in with
277
Harry’s dearest wish.
“Yeah, he might have done! So, are we going to go to Godric’s Hollow?”
“Yes, but we’ll have to think in through carefully, Harry.” She was sitting
up now, and Harry could tell that the prospect of having a plan again had lifted
her mood as much as his. “We’ll need to practice Disapparating together under
the Invisibility Cloak for a start, and perhaps Disillusionment Charms would
be sensible too, unless you think we should go the whole hog and use Polyjuice
Potion? In that case we’ll need to collect hair from somebody. I actually think
we’d better do that, Harry, the thicker our disguises the better . . . “
Harry let her talk, nodding and agreeing whenever there was a pause,but
his mind had left the conversation. For the first time since he had discovered
that the sword in Gringotts was a fake, he felt excited.
He was about to go home, about to return to the place where he had had
a family. It was in Godric’s Hollow that, but for Voldemort, he would have
grown up and spent every school holiday. He could have invited friends to his
house. . . . He might even have had brothers and sisters. . . . It would have been
his mother who had made his seventeenth birthday cake. The life he had lost
had hardly ever seemed so real to him as at this moment, when he knew he was
about to see the place were it had been taken from him. After Hermione had
gone to bed that night, Harry quietly extracted his rucksack from Hermione’s
beaded bag, and from inside it, the photograph album Hagrid had given him
so long ago. For the first time in months, he pursued the old pictures of his
parents, smiling and waving up at him from the images, which were all he had
left of them now.
Harry would gladly have set out for Godric’s Hollow the following day, but
Hermione had other ideas. Convinced as she was that Voldemort would expect Harry to return to the scene of his parents’ deaths, she was determined
that they would set off only after they had ensured that they had the best
disguises possible. It was therefore a full week later—once they had surreptitiously obtained hairs from innocent Muggles who were Christmas shopping,
and had practiced Apparating and Disapparating while underneath the Invis-
278 CHAPTER 16. GODRIC’S HOLLOW
ibility Cloak together—that Hermione agreed to make the journey.
They were to Apparate to the village under cover of darkness, so it was late
afternoon when they finally swallowed Polyjuice Potion, Harry transforming
into a balding, middle-aged Muggle man, Hermione into his small and rather
mousy wife. The beaded bag containing all of their possessions (apart from the
Horcrux, which Harry was wearing around his neck) was tucked into an inside
pocket of Hermione’s buttoned-up coat. Harry lowered the Invisibility Cloak
over them, then they turned into the suffocating darkness once again.
Heart beating in his throat, Harry opened his eyes. They were standing
hand in hand in a snowy lane under a dark blue sky in which the night’s
first stars were already glimmering feebly. Cottages stood on either side of
the narrow road, Christmas decorations twinkling in their windows. A short
way ahead of them, a glow of golden streetlights indicated the centre of the
village.
“All this snow!” Hermione whispered beneath the cloak. “Why didn’t we
think of snow? After all our precautions, we’ll leave prints! We’ll just have to
get rid of them—you go in front, I’ll do it—”
Harry did not want to enter the village like a pantomime horse, trying to
keep themselves concealed while magically covering their traces.
“Let’s take off the Cloak.” said Harry, and when she looked frightened,“Oh,
come one, we don’t look like us and there’s no one around.”
He stowed the Cloak under his jacket and they made their way forward
unhampered, the icy air stinging their faces as they passed more cottages.
Anyone of them might have been the one in which James and Lily had once
lived or where Bathilda lived now. Harry gazed at the front doors, their snowburdened roofs, and their frost porches, wondering whether he remembered
any of them,knowing deep inside that it was impossible, that he had been little
more than a year old when he had left this place forever. He was not even sure
whether he would be able to see the cottage at all; he did not know what happened when the subjects of a Fidelius Charm died. Then the little lane along
which they were walking curved to the left and the heart of the village, a small
279
square, was revealed to them.
Strung all around with colored lights, there was what looked like a war
memorial in the mile, partly obscured by a windblown Christmas tree. There
were several shops, a post office, a pub and a little church whose stained-glass
windows were glowing jewel-bright across the square.
The snow here had become impacted, It was hard and slippery where people
had trodden on it all day. Villagers were crisscrossing in front of them, their
figures briefly illuminated by streetlamps. They heard a snatch of laughter and
pop music as the pub door opened and closed; then they heard a carol start up
inside the little church.
“Harry, I think it’s Christmas Eve!” said Hermione.
“Is it?”
He had lost track of the date; they had not seen a newspaper for weeks.
“I’m sure it is.” Said Hermione, her eyes upon the church. “They . . . they’ll
be in there, won’t they? Your mum and dad? I can see the graveyard behind
it.”
Harry felt a thrill of something that was beyond excitement, more like fear.
Now that he was so near, he wondered whether he wanted to see after all.
Perhaps Hermione knew how he was feeling, because she reached for his hand
and took the lead for the first time, pulling him forward. Halfway across the
square, however, she stopped dead.
“Harry, look!”
She was pointing at the war memorial. As they had passed it, it had transformed. Instead of an obelisk covered in names, there was a statue of three
people: a man with untidy hair and glasses, a woman with long hair and a
kind,pretty face, and a baby boy sitting in his mother’s arms. Snow lay upon
all their heads, like fluffy white caps.
Harry drew closer, gazing up into his parents’ faces. He had never imagined
that there would be a statue. . . . How strange it was to see himself represented
in stone, a happy baby without a scar on his forehead. . . .
“C’mon” said Harry, when he had looked his fill they turned again toward
280 CHAPTER 16. GODRIC’S HOLLOW
the church. As they crossed the road, he glanced over his shoulder; the statue
had turned back into the war memorial.
The singing grew louder as they approached the church. It made Harry’s
throat constrict. It reminded him so forcefully of Hogwarts, of Peeves bellowing
rude versions of carols from inside suits of armor, of the Great Hall’s twelve
Christmas trees, of Dumbledore wearing a bonnet he had won in a cracker, of
Ron in a hand-knitted sweater . . .
There was a kissing gate at the entrance to the graveyard. Hermione pushed
it open as quietly as possible and they edged through it. On either side of the
slippery path to the church doors, the snow lay deep and untouched. They
moved off through the snow, carving deep trenches behind them as they walked
around the building, keeping to the shadows beneath the brilliant windows.
Behind the church row upon row of snowy tombstones protruded from a
blanket of pale blue that was flecked with dazzling red, gold, and green wherever the reflections from the stained glass hit the snow. Keeping his hand
closed tightly on the wand in his jacket pocket. Harry moved toward the nearest grave.
“Look at this, it’s an Abbott, could be some long-lost relation of Hannah’s!”
“Keep your voice down.” Hermione begged him.
They waded deeper and deeper into the graveyard, gouging dark tracks into
the snow behind them, stooping to peer at the words on old headstones, every
now and then squinting into the surrounding darkness to make absolutely sure
that they were unaccompanied.
“Harry, here!”
Hermione was two rows of tombstones away: he had to wade back to her,his
heart positively banging in his chest.
“Is it—?”
“No, but look!”
She pointed to the dark stone. Harry stooped down and saw, upon the frozen
lichen-spotted granite, the words KENDRA DUMBLEDORE and, a short way
below her dates of birth and death, AND HER DAUGHTER ARIANA. There was
281
also a quotation:
Where you treasure is, there will your heart be also.
So Rita Skeeter and Muriel had got some of their facts right. The Dumbledore family had indeed lived here, and part of it had died here.
Seeing the grave was worse than hearing about it. Harry could not help
thinking that he and Dumbledore both had deep roots in this graveyard, and
that Dumbledore ought to have told him so, yet he had never thought to share
the connection. They could have visited the place together; for a moment Harry
imagined coming here with Dumbledore, of what a bond that would been, of
how much it would have meant to him. But it seemed that to Dumbledore,
the fact that their families lay side by side in the same graveyard had been an
unimportant coincidence, irrelevant, perhaps, to the job he wanted Harry to
do.
Hermione was looking at Harry, and he was glad that his face was hidden
in shadow. He read the words on the tombstone again. Where your treasure is,
there will you heart be also. He did not understand what these words meant.
Surely Dumbledore had chosen them, as the eldest member of the family once
his mother had died.
“re you sure he never mentioned—?” Hermione began.
“No,” said Harry curtly, then, “let’s keep looking,” and he turned away, wishing he had not seen the stone. He did not want his excited trepidation tainted
with resentment.
“Here!” cried Hermione again a few moments later from out of the darkness.
“Oh no, sorry! I thought it said Potter.” She was rubbing at a crumpling, mossy
stone, gazing down at it, a little frown on her face.
“Harry, come back a moment.”
He did not want to be sidetracked again, and only grudgingly made his way
back through the snow toward her.
“What?”
“Look at this!”
282 CHAPTER 16. GODRIC’S HOLLOW
The grave was extremely old, weathered so that Harry could hardly make
out the name. Hermione showed him the symbol beneath it.
“Harry, that’s the mark in the book!”
He peered at the place she indicated: The stone was so worn that it was hard
to make out what was engraved there,though there did seem to be a triangular
mark beneath the nearly illegible name.
“Yeah. . . it could be . . . ”
Hermione lit her wand and pointed it at the name on the headstone.
“It says Ig—Ignotus, I think. . . ”
“I’m going to keep looking for my parents, all right?” Harry told her, a slight
edge to his voice, and he set off again, leaving her crouched beside the old grave.
Every now and then he recognized a surname that, like Abbott,he had met
at Hogwarts. Sometimes there were several generations of the same Wizarding
family represented in the graveyard. Harry could tell from the dates that it had
either died out, or the current members had moved away from Godric’s Hollow.
Deeper and deeper amongst the graves he went,and every time he reached a
new headstone he felt a little lurch of apprehension and anticipation.
The darkness and the silence seemed to become, all of a sudden, much
deeper. Harry looked around, worried, thinking of dementors, then realized
that the carols had finished, that the chatter and flurry of churchgoers were
fading away as they made their way back into the square. Somebody inside the
church had just turned off the lights.
Then Hermione’s voice came out of the blackness for the third time, sharp
and clear from a few yards away.
“Harry, they’re here. . . right here.”
And he knew by her tone that it was his mother and his father this time.
He moved toward her, feeling as if something heavy were pressing on his chest,
the same sensation he had had right after Dumbledore had died, a grief that
had actually weighed on his heart and lungs.
The headstone was only two rooms behind Kendra and Ariana’s. It was
made of white marble, just like Dumbledore’s tomb, and this made it easy to
283
read, as it seemed to shine in the dark. Harry did not need to kneel or even
approach very close to it to make out the words engraved upon it.
JAMES POTTER LILY POTTER
BORN 27 MARCH 1960 BORN 30 JANUARY 1960
DIED 31 OCTOBER 1981 DIED 31 OCTOBER 1981
The last enemy that shall be destroyed is death.
Harry read the words slowly, as though he would have only one chance to
take in their meaning, and he read the last of them aloud.
“‘The last enemy that shall be destroyed is death’ . . . ” A horrible thought
came to him, and with it a kind of panic. “Isn’t that a Death Eater idea? Why
is that here?”
“It doesn’t mean defeating death in the way the Death Eaters mean it,
Harry,” said Hermione, her voice gentle. “It means . . . you know . . . living beyond death. Living after death.”
But they were not living, thought Harry: They were gone. The empty words
could not disguise the fact that his parents’ moldering remains lay beneath
snow and stone, indifferent, unknowing. And tears came before he could stop
them, boiling hot then instantly freezing on his face, and what was the point
in wiping them off or pretending? He let them fall, his lips pressed hard together,looking down at the thick snow hiding from his eyes the place where the
last of Lily and James lay, bones now, surely, or dust, not knowing or caring
that their living son stood so near, his heart still beating, alive because of their
sacrifice and close to wishing, at this moment, that he was sleeping under the
snow with them.
Hermione had taken his hand again and was gripping it tightly. He could
not look at her, but returned the pressure, now taking deep, sharp gulps of the
night air, trying to steady himself, trying to regain control. He should have
brought something to give to them, and he had not thought of it, and every
plant in the graveyard was leafless and frozen. But Hermione raised her wand,
moved it in a circle through the air and a wreath of Christmas roses blossomed
284 CHAPTER 16. GODRIC’S HOLLOW
before them. Harry caught it and laid it on his parents’ grave.
As soon as he stood up he wanted to leave. He did not think he could stand
another moment there. He put his arm around Hermione’s shoulders, and she
put hers around his waist, and they turned in silence and walked away through
the snow, past Dumbledore’s mother and sister, back toward the dark church
and the out-of-sight kissing gate.
Chapter 17
Bathilda’s Secret
H
arry, stop.”
“What’s wrong?”
They had only just reached the grave of the unknown Abbott.
“There’s someone there. Someone’s watching us. I can tell. There; over by
the bushes.”
They stood quite still, holding on to each other, gazing at the dense black
boundary of the graveyard. Harry could not see anything.
“Are you sure?”
“I saw something move, I could have sworn I did. . . ”
She broke from him to free her wand arm.
“We look like Muggles,” Harry pointed out.
“Muggles who’ve just been laying flowers on your parents’ grave! Harry, I’m
sure
there’s someone over there!”
Harry thought of A History of Magic, the graveyard was supposed to be
haunted, what if—? But then he heard a rustle and saw a little eddy of dislodged snow in the bush to which Hermione had pointed. Ghosts could not
move snow.
“It’s a cat,” said Harry, after a second or two, ”or a bird. If it was a Death
285
286 CHAPTER 17. BATHILDA’S SECRET
Eater we’d be dead by now. But let’s get out of here, and we can put the Cloak
back on.”
They glanced back repeatedly as they made their way out of the graveyard.
Harry, who did not feel as sanguine as he had pretended when reassuring
Hermione, was glad to reach the gate and the slippery pavement. They pulled
the Invisibility Cloak back over themselves. The pub was fuller than before:
Many voices inside it were now singing the carol that they had heard as they
approached the church. For a moment Harry considered suggesting they take
refuge inside it, but before he could say anything Hermione murmured, ”Lets
go this way,” and pulled him down the dark street leading out of the village in
the opposite direction from which they had entered. Harry could make out the
point where the cottages ended and the lane turned into open country again.
They walked as quickly as they dared, past more windows sparkling with multicolored light, the outlines of Christmas trees dark through the curtains.
“How are we going to find Bathilda’s house?” asked Hermione, who was
shivering a little and kept glancing back over her shoulder. “Harry? What do
you think? Harry?”
She tugged at his arm, but Harry was not paying attention. He was looking
toward the dark mass that stood at the very end of this row of houses. Next
moment he had sped up, dragging Hermione along with him; she slipped a
little on the ice.
“Harry—”
“Look . . . Look at it Hermione . . . ”
“I don’t . . . oh!”
He could see it; the Fidelius Charm must have died with James and Lily.
The hedge had grown wild in the sixteen years since Hagrid had taken Harry
from the rubble that lay scattered amongst the waist-high grass. Most of the
cottage was still standing, though entirely covered in dark ivy and snow, but
the right side of the top floor had been blown apart; that, Harry was sure, was
where the curse had backfired. He and Hermione stood at the gate, gazing at
the wreck of what must once have been a cottage just like those that flanked it.
287
“I wonder why nobody’s ever rebuilt it?” whispered Hermione.
“Maybe you can’t rebuild it?” Harry replied, ”Maybe it’s like the injuries
from Dark Magic and you can’t repair the damage?”
He slipped a hand from beneath the Cloak and grasped the snowy and
thickly rusted gate, not wishing to open it, but simply to hold some part of
the house.
“You’re not going to go inside? It looks unsafe, it might—oh, Harry, look!”
His touch on the gate seemed to have done it. A sign had risen out of the
ground in front of them, up through the tangles of nettles and weeds, like some
bizarre, fast-growing flower, and in golden letters upon the wood it said:
On this spot, on the night of 31 October 1981,
Lily and James Potter lost their lives.
Their son, Harry, remains the only wizard
ever to have survived the Killing Curse.
This house, invisible to Muggles, has been left
in its ruined state as a monument to the Potters
and as a reminder of the violence
that tore apart their family.
And all around these neatly lettered words, scribbles had been added by
other witches and wizards who had come to see the place where the Boy Who
Lived had escaped. Some had merely signed their names in Everlasting Ink;
others had carved their initials into the wood, still others had left messages.
The most recent of these, shining brightly over sixteen years’ worth of magical
graffiti, all said similar things.
Good luck, Harry wherever you are.
If you read this, Harry, we’re all behind you!
Long live Harry Potter.
“They shouldn’t have written on the sign!” said Hermione, indignant.
But Harry beamed at her.
288 CHAPTER 17. BATHILDA’S SECRET
“It’s brilliant. I’m glad they did. I . . . ”
He broke off. A heavily muffled figure was hobbling up the lane toward
them, silhouetted by the bright lights in the distant square. Harry thought,
though it was hard to judge, that the figure was a woman. She was moving slowly, possibly frightened of slipping on the snowy ground. Her stoop,
her stoutness, her shuffling gait all gave an impression of extreme age. They
watched in silence as she drew nearer. Harry was waiting to see whether she
would turn into any of the cottages she was passing, but he knew instinctively
that she would not. At last she came to a half a few yards from the and simply
stood there in the middle of the frozen road, facing them.
He did not need Hermione’s pinch to his arm. There was next to no chance
this woman was a Muggle: She was standing there gazing at a house that ought
to have been completely invisible to her, if she was not a witch. Even assuming
that she was a witch, however, it was odd behavior to come out on a night this
cold, simply to look at an old ruin. By all the rules of normal magic, meanwhile,
she ought not to be able to see Hermione and him at all. Nevertheless, Harry
had the strangest feeling that she knew that they were there, and also who
they were. Just as he had reached this uneasy conclusion, she raised a gloved
hand and beckoned.
Hermione moved closer to him under the Cloak, her arm pressed against
his.
“How does she know?”
He shook his head. The woman beckoned again, more vigorously. Harry
could think of many reasons not to obey the summons, and yet his suspicions
about her identity were growing stronger every moment that they stood facing
each other in the deserted street.
Was it possible that she had been waiting for them all these long months?
That Dumbledore had told her to wait, and that Harry would come in the end?
Was it not likely that it was she who had moved in the shadows in the graveyard and had followed them to this spot? Even her ability to sense them suggested some Dumbledore-ish power that he had never encountered before.
289
Finally Harry spoke, causing Hermione to gasp and jump.
“Are you Bathilda?”
The muffled figure nodded and beckoned again.
Beneath the Cloak Harry and Hermione looked at each other. Harry raised
his eyebrows; Hermione gave a tiny, nervous nod.
They stepped toward the woman and, at once, she turned and hobbled off
back the way they had come. Leading them past several houses, she turned
in at a gate. They followed her up the front path through a garden nearly as
overgrown as the one they had just left. She fumbled for a moment with a key
at the front door, then opened it and stepped back to let them pass.
She smelled bad, or perhaps it was her house. Harry wrinkled his nose as
they sidled past her and pulled off the Cloak. Now that he was beside her, he
realized how tiny she was; bowed down with age she came barely level with his
chest. She closed the door behind them, her knuckles blue and mottled against
the peeling paint, then turned and peered into Harry’s face. Her eyes were
thick with cataracts and sunken in folds of transparent skin, and her whole
face was dotted with broken veins and liver spots. He wondered whether she
could make him out at all; even if she could, it was the balding Muggle whose
identity he had stolen that she would see.
The odor of old age, of dust, of unwashed clothes and stale food intensified
as she unwound a moth-eaten black shawl, revealing a head of scant white hair
through which the scalp showed clearly.
“Bathilda?” Harry repeated.
She nodded again. Harry became aware of the locket against his skin; the
thing inside it that sometimes ticked or beat had woken; he could feel it pulsing
through the cold gold. Did it know, could it sense, that the thing that would
destroy it was near?
Bathilda shuffled past them, pushing Hermione aside as though she had
not seen her, and vanished into what seemed to be a sitting room.
“Harry, I’m not sure about this,” breathed Hermione.
“Look at the size of her, I think we could overpower her if we had to,” said
290 CHAPTER 17. BATHILDA’S SECRET
Harry, ”Listen, I should have told you, I knew she wasn’t all there. Muriel
called her ’gaga.”’
“Come!” called Bathilda from the next room.
Hermione jumped and clutched Harry’s arm.
“It’s okay,” said Harry reassuringly, and he led the way into the sitting room.
Bathilda was tottering around the place lighting candle, but it was still very
dark, not to mention extremely dirty. Thick dust crunched beneath their feet,
and Harry’s nose detected, underneath the dank and mildewed smell, something worse, like meat gone bad. He wondered when was the last time anyone
had been inside Bathilda’s house to check whether she was coping. She seemed
to have forgotten that she could do magic too, for she lit the candles clumsily
by hand, her trailing lace cuff in constant danger of catching fire.
“Let me do that,” offered Harry and he took the matches from her. She stood
watching him as he finished lighting the candle stubs that stood on saucers
around the room, perched precariously on stack of book and on side tables
crammed with cracked and moldy cups.
The last surface on which Harry spotted a candle was a bow-fronted chest of
drawers on which there stood a large number of photographs. When the flame
danced into life, its reflection wavered on their dusty glass and silver. He saw
a few tiny movements from the pictures. As Bathilda fumbled with logs for
the fire, he muttered ”Tergeo”; the dust vanished from the photographs, and he
was at once that half a down were missing from the largest and most ornate
frames.
He wondered whether Bathilda or somebody else had removed them. Then
the sight of a photograph near the back of the collection caught his eye, and he
snatched it up.
It was the golden-haired, merry-faced thief, the young man who had perched
on Gregorovitch’s windowsill, smiling lazily up at Harry out of the silver frame.
And it came to Harry instantly where he had seen the boy before: in The Life
and Lies of Albus Dumbledore, arm in arm with teenage Dumbledore, and that
must be where all the missing photographs were in Rita’s book.
291
“Mrs.—Miss—Bagshot?” he said, and his voice shook slightly. “Who is this?”
Bathilda was standing in the middle of the room watching Hermione light
the fire for her.
“Miss Bagshot?” Harry repeated, and he advanced with the picture in his
hands as the flames burst into life in the fireplace. Bathilda looked up at his
voice, and the Horcrux heat faster upon his chest.
“Who is this person?” Harry asked her, pushing the picture forward.
She peered at it solemnly, then up at Harry.
“Do you know who this is?” he repeated in a much slower and louder voice
than usual. ”This man? Do you know him? What’s he called?”
Bathilda merely looked vague. Harry felt an awful frustration. How had
Rita Skeeter unlocked Bathilda’s memories?
“Who is this man?” he repeated loudly.
“Harry, what are you doing?” asked Hermione.
“This picture, Hermione, it’s the thief, the thief who stole from Gregorovitch!
Please!” he said to Bathilda. ”Who is this?”
But she only stared at him.
“Why did you ask us to come with you, Mrs.—Miss—Bagshot?” asked Hermione,
raising her own voice. ”Was there something you wanted to tell us?”
Giving no sign that she had heard Hermione, Bathilda now shuffled a few
steps closer to Harry. With a little jerk of her head she looked back into the
hall.
“You want us to leave?” he asked.
She repeated the gesture, this time pointing firstly at him, then at herself,
then at the ceiling.
“Oh, right. . . Hermione, I think she wants me to go upstairs with her.”
“All right,” said Hermione, ”let’s go.”
But when Hermione moved, Bathilda shook her head with surprising vigor,
once more pointing first at Harry, then to herself.
“She wants me to go with her, alone.”
292 CHAPTER 17. BATHILDA’S SECRET
“Why?” asked Hermione, and her voice rang out sharp and clear in the
candlelit room; the old lady shook her head a little at the loud noise.
“Maybe Dumbledore told her to give the sword to me, and only me?”
“Do you really think she knows who you are?”
“Yes,” said Harry, looking down into the milky eyes fixed upon his own, ”I
think she does.”
“Well, okay then, but be quick, Harry.”
“Lead the way,” Harry told Bathilda.
She seemed to understand, because she shuffled around him toward the
door. Harry glanced back at Hermione with a reassuring smile, but he was
not sure she had seen it; she stood hugged herself in the midst of the candlelit
squalor, looking toward the bookcase. As Harry walked out of the room, unseen
by both Hermione and Bathilda, he slipped the silver-framed photograph of the
unknown thief inside his jacket.
The stairs were steep and narrow; Harry was half tempted to place his
hands on stout Bathilda’s backside to ensure that she did not topple over backward on top of him, which seemed only too likely. Slowly, wheezing a little,
she climbed to the upper landing, turned immediately right, and led him into
a low-ceilinged bedroom.
It was pitch-black and smelled horrible. Harry had just made out a chamber
pot protruding from under the bed before Bathilda closed the door and even
that was swallowed by the darkness.
“Lumos,” said Harry, and his wand ignited. He gave a start; Bathilda had
moved close to him in those few seconds of darkness, and he had not heard her
approach.
“You are Potter?” she whispered.
“Yes, I am.”
She nodded slowly, solemnly. Harry felt the Horcrux beating fast, faster
than his own heart. It was an unpleasant, agitating sensation.
“Have you got anything for me?” Harry asked, but she seemed distracted
by his lit wand-tip.
293
“Have you got anything for me?” he repeated.
Then she closed her eyes and several things happened at once: Harry’s
scar prickled painfully; the Horcrux twitched so that the front of his sweater
actually moves; the dark, fetid room dissolved momentarily. He felt a leap of
joy and spoke in a high, cold voice:
Hold him!
Harry swayed where he stood: The dark, foul-smelling room seemed to close
around him again; he did not know what had just happened.
“Have you got anything for me?” he asked for a third time, much louder.
“Over here,” she whispered, pointing to the corner. Harry raised his wand
and saw the outline of a cluttered dressing table beneath the curtained window.
This time she did not lead him. Harry edged between her and the unmade
bed, his wand raised. He did not want to look away from her.
“What is it?” he asked as he reached the dressing table, which was heaped
high with what looked and smelled like dirty laundry.
“There,” she said, pointing at the shapeless mass.
And in the instant that he looked away, his eyes raking the tangled mess
for a sword hilt, a ruby, she moved weirdly: He was it out of the corner of his
eye; panic made him turn and horror paralyzed him and he saw the old body
collapsing and the great snake pouring from the place where he neck had been.
The snake struck as he raised his wand. The force of the bite to his forearm
sent the wand spinning up toward the ceiling; its light swung dizzyingly around
the room and was extinguished. Then a powerful blow from the tail to his
midriff knocked the breath out of him. He fell backward onto the dressing
table, into the mound of filthy clothing—
He rolled sideways, narrowly avoiding the snake’s tail, which thrashed down
upon the table where he had been a second earlier. Fragments of the glass surface rained upon him as he hit the floor. From below he heard Hermione call,
”Harry?”
He could not get enough breath into his lungs to call back. Then a heavy
smooth mass smashed him into the floor and he felt it slide over him, powerful,
294 CHAPTER 17. BATHILDA’S SECRET
muscular.
“No!” he gasped, pinned to the floor.
“Yes,” whispered the voice. ”Yesss . . . hold you . . . hold you . . .”
“Accio . . . Accio Wand . . .”
But nothing happened and he needed his hands to try to force the snake
from him as it coiled itself around his torso, squeezing the air from him, pressing the Horcrux hard into his chest, a circle of ice that throbbed with life, inches
from his own frantic heart, and his brain was flooding with cold, white light,
all thought obliterated, his own breath drowned, distant footsteps, everything
going. . .
A metal heart was banging outside his chest, and now he was flying, flying
with triumph in his heart, without need of broomstick or thestral . . . .
He was abruptly awake in the sour-smelling darkness; Nagini had released
him. He scrambled up and saw the snake outlined against the landing light.
It struck, and Hermione dived aside with a shriek; her deflected curse hit the
curtained window, which shattered. Frozen air filled the room as Harry ducked
to avoid another shower of broken glass and his foot slipped on a pencil-like
something-his wandHe bent and snatched it up, but now the room was full of the snake, its tail
thrashing; Hermione was nowhere to be seen and for a moment Harry thought
the worst, but then there was a loud bang and a flash of red light, and the
snake flew into the air, smacking Harry hard in the face as it went, coil after
heavy coil rising up to the ceiling. Harry raised his wand, but as he did so his
scar seared more painfully, more powerfully than it had done in years.
“He’s coming! Hermione, he’s coming!”
As he yelled the snake fell, hissing wildly. Everything was chaos; It smashed
shelves from the wall, and splintered china flew everywhere as Harry jumped
over the bed and seized the dark shape he knew to be Hermione.
She shrieked with pain as he pulled her back across the bed. The snake
reared again, but Harry knew that worse than the snake was coming, was
perhaps already at the gate, his head was going to split open with pain from
295
his scar.
The snake lunged as he took a running leap, dragging Hermione with him;
as it struck, Hermione scream, ”Confringo!” and her spell flew around the
room, exploding the wardrobe mirror and ricocheting back at them, bouncing
from floor to ceiling; Harry felt the heat of it sear the back of his hand. Glass
cut his cheek as, pulling Hermione one with him, he leapt from bed to broken
dressing table and then straight out of the smashed window into nothingness,
her scream reverberating through the night as they twisted in midair.
And then his sear burst open and he was Voldemort and he was running
across the fetid bedroom, his long white hands clutching at the windowsill as he
glimpsed the bald man and the little woman twist and vanish, and he screamed
with rage, a scream that mingled with the girl’s, that echoed across the dark
gardens over the church bells ringing in Christmas Day.
And his scream was Harry’s scream, his pain was Harry pain . . . that it
could happen here, where it had happened before . . . here, within sight of that
house where he had come so close to knowing what it was to die . . . to die . . . .
The pain was so terrible . . . ripped from his body . . . . But if he had no body,
why did his head hurt so badly; if he was dead, how could he feel so unbearably,
didn’t pain cease with death, didn’t it go—
The night wet and windy, two children dressed as pumpkins waddling across
the square, and the shop window covered in paper spiders, all the tawdry Muggle trapping of a world in which they did not believe . . . . And he was gliding
along, that sense of purpose and power and rightness in him that he always
knew on these occasions . . . . Not anger . . . . that was for weaker souls than he
. . . but triumph, yes . . . . He had waited for this, he had hoped for it. . . .
“Nice costume, mister!”
He saw the small boy’s smile falter as he ran near enough to see beneath the
hood of the cloak, saw the fear cloud his painted face. Then the child turned and
ran away. . . . Beneath the robe be fingered the hand of his wand. . . One simple
movement and the child would never reach his mother. . . but unnecessary, quite
unnecessary. . . .
296 CHAPTER 17. BATHILDA’S SECRET
And along a new and darker street he moved, and now his destination was
in sight at last, the Fidelius Charm broken, though they did not know it yet. . . .
And he made less noise than the dead leaves slithering along the pavement as he
drew level with the dark hedge, and peered over it. . . . They had not drawn the
curtains; he saw them quite clearly in their little sitting room, the tall black—
haired man in his glasses, making puffs of colored smoke erupt from his wand
for the amusement of the small black-haired boy in his blue pajamas. The child
was laughing and trying to catch the smoke, to grab it in his small fist. . . .
A door opened and the mother entered, saying words he could not hear, her
long dark-red hair falling over her face. Now the father scooped up the son
and handed him to the mother. He threw his wand down upon the sofa and
stretched, yawning. . . .
The gate creaked a little as he pushed it open, but James Potter did no hear.
His white hand pulled out the wand beneath his cloak and pointed it at the
door, which burst open.
He was over the threshold as James came sprinting into the hall. It was
easy, too easy, he had not even picked up his wand. . .
“Lily, take Harry and go! It’s him! Go! Run! I’ll hold him off!”
Hold him off, without a wand in his hand? . . . . He laughed before casting
the curse. . . .
“Avada Kedavra!”
The green light filled the cramped hallway, it lit the pram pushed against
the wall, it made the banisters glare like lightning rods, and James Potter fell
like a marionette whose strings were cut. . . .
He could hear her screaming from the upper floor, trapped, but as long as
she was sensible, she, at least, had nothing to fear. . . . He climbed the steps,
listening with faint amusement to her attempts to barricade herself in. . . . She
had no wand either. . . . How stupid they were, and how trusting, thinking that
their safety lay in friends, that weapons could be discarded even for moments. . . .
He forced the door open, cast aside the chair and boxes hastily piled against
it with one lazy wave of his wand. . . and there she stood, the child in her arms.
297
At the last sight of him, she dropped her son into the crib behind her and threw
her arms wide, as if this would help, as if in shielding him from sight she hoped
to be chosen instead. . . .
“Not Harry, not Harry, please not Harry!”
“Stand aside, you silly girl. . . stand aside now.”
“Not Harry, please no, take me, kill me instead—”
“This is my last warning—”
“Not Harry! Please . . . have mercy. . . have mercy. . . . Not Harry! Not Harry!
Please—I’ll do anything—”
“Stand aside. Stand aside, girl!”
He could have forced her away from the crib, but it seemed more prudent to
finish them all. . . .
The green light flashed around the room and she dropped like her husband.
The child had not cried all this time. He could stand, clutching the bars of
his crib and he looked up into the intruder’s face with a kind of bright interest,
perhaps thinking that it was his father who hid beneath the cloak, making more
pretty light, and his mother would pop up any moment, laughing—
He pointed the wand very carefully into the boy’s face. He wanted to see it
happen, the destruction of this one, inexplicable danger. The child began to cry.
It had seen that he was not James. He did not like it crying, he had never been
able to stomach the small ones whining in the orphanage—
“Avada Kedavra!”
And then he broke; He was nothing, nothing but pain and terror, and he
must hide himself, not here in the rubble of the ruined house, where the child
was trapped and screaming, but far away. . . far away. . .
“No,” he moaned.
The snake rustled on the filthy, cluttered floor, and he had killed the boy, and
yet he was the boy. . .
“No. . . ”
And now he stood at the broken window of Bathilda’s house, immersed in
memories of his greatest loss, and at his feet the great snake slithered over bro-
298 CHAPTER 17. BATHILDA’S SECRET
ken china and glass. . . He looked down and saw something. . . something incredible. . .
“No. . . ”
“Harry, it’s all right, you’re all right.”
He stooped down and picked up the smashed photograph. There he was, the
unknown thief he was seeking. . . .
“No. . . I dropped it. . . I dropped it. . . ”
“Harry, it’s okay, wake up, wake up!”
He was Harry. . . Harry, not Voldemort. . . and the thing that was rustling
was not a snake. . . He opened his eyes.
“Harry,” Hermione whispered. ”Do you feel all—all right?”
“Yes,” he lied.
He was in the tent, lying on one of the lower bunks beneath a heap of blankets. He could tell that it was almost dawn by the stillness and the quality of
the cold, flat light beyond the canvas ceiling. He was drenched in sweat; he
could feel it on the sheets and blankets.
“We got away.”
“Yes,” said Hermione, ”I had to use a Hover Charm to get you into your
bunk, I couldn’t lift you. You’ve been. . . Well, you haven’t been quite. . . ”
There were purple shadows under her brown eyes and he noticed a small
sponge in her hand. She had been wiping his face.
“You’ve been ill,” she finished, ”Quite ill.”
“How long ago did we leave?”
“Hours ago. It’s nearly morning.”
“And I’ve been. . . what, unconscious?”
“Not exactly,” said Hermione uncomfortable, ”You’ve been shouting and moaning and. . . things,” she added in a tone that made Harry feel uneasy. What had
he done? Screamed curses like Voldemort, cried like the baby in the crib?
“I couldn’t get the Horcrux off you,” Hermione said, and he knew she wanted
to change the subject. ”It was stuck, stuck to your chest. You’ve got a mark;
I’m sorry, I had to use a Severing Charm to get it away. The snake bit you too,
299
but I’ve cleaned the wound and put some dittany on it.
He pulled the sweaty T-shirt he was wearing away from himself and looked
down. There was a scarlet oval over his heart where the locket had burned
him. He could also see the half-healed puncture marks to his forearm.
“Where’ve you put the Horcrux?”
“In my bag. I think we should keep it off for a while.”
He lay back on his pillow and looked into her pinched gray face.
“We shouldn’t have gone to Godric’s Hollow. It’s my fault, it’s all my fault,
Hermione, I’m sorry.”
“It’s not your fault, I wanted to go too, I really thought Dumbledore might
have left the sword there for you.”
“Yeah, well. . . . we got that wrong, didn’t we?”
“What happened, Harry? What happened when she took you upstairs? Was
the snake hiding somewhere? Did it just come out and kill her and attack you?”
“No,” he said. ”She was the snake. . . or the snake was her. . . all along.”
“W—what?”
He closed his eyes. He could still smell Bathilda’s house on him. It made
the whole thing horribly vivid.
“Bathilda must’ve been dead a while. The snake was. . . was inside her. YouKnow-Who put it there in Godric’s Hollow, to wait. You were right. He knew
I’d go back.”
“The snake was inside her?”
He opened his eyes again. Hermione looked revolted, nauseated. “Lupin
said there would be magic we’d never imagined,” Harry said, ”She didn’t want
to talk in front of you, because it was Parseltongue, all Parseltongue, and I
didn’t realize, but of course I could understand her. One we were up in the
room, the snake sent a message to You-Know-Who. I heard it happen inside
my head, I felt him get excited, he said to keep me there. . . and then. . . .”
He remembered the snake coming out of Bathilda’s neck; Hermione did not
need to know the details.
“. . . she changed, changed into the snake, and attacked.”
300 CHAPTER 17. BATHILDA’S SECRET
He looked down at the puncture marks.
“It wasn’t supposed to kill me, just keep me there till You-Know-Who came.”
If he had only managed to kill the snake, it would have been worth it, all of
it. . . Sick at heart, he sat up threw back the covers.
“Harry, no, I’m sure you ought to rest!”
“You’re the one who needs sleep. No offense, but you look terrible. I’m fine.
I’ll keep watch for a while. Where’s my wand?”
She did not answer, she merely looked at him.
“Where’s my wand, Hermione?”
She was biting her lip, and tears swam in her eyes.
“Harry. . . ”
“Where’s my wand?”
She reached down beside the bed and held it out to him.
The holly and phoenix wand was nearly severed in two. One fragile strand
of phoenix feather kept both pieces hanging together. The wood had splintered
apart completely. Harry took it into his hands as though it was a living thing
that had suffered a terrible injury. He could not think properly. Everything
was a blur of panic and fear. Then he held out the wand to Hermione.
“Mend it. Please.”
“Harry, I don’t think, when its broken like this—”
“Please, Hermione, try!”
“R-Reparo.”
The handling half of the wand resealed itself. Harry held it up.
“Lumos!”
The wand sparked feebly, then went out. Harry pointed it at Hermione.
“Expelliarmus!”
Hermione’s wand gave a little jerk, but did not leave her hand. The feeble
attempt at magic was too much for Harry’s wand, which split into two again.
He stared at it, aghast, unable to take in what he was seeing. . . the wand that
had survived so much. . .
“Harry,” Hermione whispered so quietly he could hardly hear her. “I’m so, so
301
sorry. I think it was me. As we were leaving, you know, the snake was coming
for us, and so I cast a Blasting Curse, and it rebounded everywhere, and it
must have—must have hit—”
“It was an accident,” said Harry mechanically. He felt empty, stunned.
”We’ll—we’ll find a way to repair it.”
“Harry, I don’t think we’re going to be able to,” said Hermione, the tears
trickling down her face. ”Remember. . . remember Ron? When he broke his
want, crashing the car? It was never the same again, he had to get a new one.”
Harry thought of Ollivander, kidnapped and held hostage by Voldemort; of
Gregorovitch, who was dead. How was he supposed to find himself a new wand?
“Well,” he said, in a falsely matter-of-fact voice, ”well, I’ll just borrow yours
for now, then. While I keep watch.”
Her face glazed with tears, Hermione handed over her wand, and he left her
sitting beside his bed, desiring nothing more than to get away from her.
302 CHAPTER 17. BATHILDA’S SECRET
Chapter 18
The Life and Lies of Albus
Dumbledore
T
he sun was coming up: The pure, colorless vastness of the sky
stretched over him, indifferent to him and his suffering. Harry sat
down in the tent entrance and took a deep breath of clean air. Simply to be alive to watch the sun rise over the sparkling snowy hillside ought to
have been the greatest treasure on earth, yet he could not appreciate it: His
senses had been spiked by the calamity of losing his wand. He looked out over
a valley blanketed in snow, distant church bells chiming through the glittering
silence.
Without realizing it, he was digging his fingers into his arms as if he were
trying to resist physical pain. He had spilled his own blood more times than
he could count; he had lost all the bones in his right arm once; this journey
had already given him scars to his chest and forearm to join those on his hand
and forehead, but never, until this moment, had he felt himself to be fatally
weakened, vulnerable, and naked, as though the best part of his magical power
had been torn from him. He knew exactly what Hermione would say if he
expressed any of this: The wand is only as good as the wizard. But she was
wrong, his case was different. She had not felt the wand spin like the needle of
303
304 CHAPTER 18. THE LIFE AND LIES OF ALBUS DUMBLEDORE
a compass and shoot golden flames at his enemy. He had lost the protection of
the twin cores, and only now that it was gone did he realize how much he had
been counting upon it.
He pulled the pieces of the broken wand out of his pocket and, without
looking at them, tucked them away in Hagrid’s pouch around his neck. The
pouch was now too full of broken and useless objects to take any more. Harry’s
hand brushed the old Snitch through the moleskin and for a moment he had to
fight the temptation to pull it out and throw it away. Impenetrable, unhelpful,
useless, like everything else Dumbledore had left behind—
And his fury at Dumbledore broke over him now like lava, scorching him inside, wiping out every other feeling. Out of sheer desperation they had talked
themselves into believing that Godric’s Hollow held answers, convinced themselves that they were supposed to go back, that it was all part of some secret
path laid out for them by Dumbledore; but there was no map, no plan. Dumbledore had left them to grope in the darkness, to wrestle with unknown and
undreamed-of terrors, alone and unaided. Nothing was explained, nothing was
given freely, they had no sword, and now, Harry had no wand. And he had
dropped the photograph of the thief, and it would surely be easy now for Voldemort to find out who he was. . . . Voldemort had all the information now. . . .
“Harry?”
Hermione looked frightened that he might curse her with her own wand.
Her face streaked with tears, she crouched down beside him, two cups of tea
trembling in her hands and something bulky under her arm.
“Thanks,” he said, taking one of the cups.
“Do you mind if I talk to you?”
“No,” he said because he did not want to hurt her feelings.
“Harry, you wanted to know who that man in the picture was. Well . . . I’ve
got the book.”
Timidly she pushed it onto his lap, a pristine copy of The Life and Lies of
Albus Dumbledore.
“Where—how—?”
305
“It was in Bathilda’s sitting room, just lying there. . . . This note was sticking
out of the top of it.”
Hermione read the few lines of spiky, acid-green writing aloud,
“Dear Batty, Thanks for the help. Here’s a copy of the book, hope you like it.
You said everything, even if you don’t remember it, Rita. I think it must have
arrived while the real Bathilda was alive, but perhaps she wasn’t in any fit
state to read it?”
“No, she probably wasn’t.”
Harry looked down upon Dumbledore’s face and experienced a surge of savage pleasure: Now he would know all the things that Dumbledore had never
thought it was worth telling him, whether Dumbledore wanted him to or not.
“You’re still really angry at me, aren’t you?” said Hermione; he looked up
to see fresh tears leaking out of her eyes, and knew that his anger must have
shown in his face.
“No,” he said quietly. “No, Hermione, I know it was an accident. You were
trying to get us out of there, and you were incredible. I’d be dead if you hadn’t
been there to help me.”
He tried to return her watery smile, then turned his attention to the book.
Its spine was stiff; it had clearly never been opened before. He riffled through
the pages, looking for photographs. He came across the one he sought almost
at once, the young Dumbledore and his handsome companion, roaring with
laughter at some long-forgotten joke. Harry dropped his eyes to the caption:
Albus Dumbledore, shortly after his mother’s death
with his friend Gellert Grindelwald.
Harry gasped at the last word for several long moments. Grindelwald. His
friend Grindelwald. he looked sideways at Hermione, who was still contemplating the name as though she could not believe her eyes. Slowly she looked
up at Harry.
“Grindelwald?”
Ignoring the remainder of the photographs, Harry searched the pages around
306 CHAPTER 18. THE LIFE AND LIES OF ALBUS DUMBLEDORE
them for a recurrence of that fatal name. He soon discovered it and read greedily, but became lost: It was necessary to go farther back to make sense of it all,
and eventually he found himself at the start of a chapter entitled “The Greater
Good.” Together, he and Hermione started to read:
Now approaching his eighteenth birthday, Dumbledore left Hogwarts in a blaze of glory—Head Boy, Prefect, Winner of the Barnabus
Finkley Prize for Exceptional Spell-Casting, British Youth Representative to the Wizengamot, Gold Medal-Winner for Ground-Breaking
Contribution to the International Alchemical Conference in Cairo.
Dumbledore intended, next, to take a Grand Tour with Elphias “Dogbreath” Doge, the dim-witted but devoted sidekick he had picked up
at school.
The two young men were staying at the Leaky Cauldron in London, preparing to depart for Greece the following morning, when an
owl arrived bearing news of Dumbledore’s mother’s death. “Dogbreath” Doge, who refused to be interviewed for this book, has given
the public his own sentimental version of what happened next. He
represents Kendra’s death as a tragic blow, and Dumbledore’s decision to give up his expedition as an act of noble self-sacrifice.
Certainly Dumbledore returned to Godric’s Hollow at once, supposedly to “care” for his younger brother and sister. But how much
care did he actually give them?
“he were a head case, that Aberforth,” said Enid Smeek, whose
family lived on the outskirts of Godric’s Hollow at that time. “Rand
wild, ’Course, with his mum and dad gone you’d have felt sorry for
him, only he kept chucking goat dung at my head. I don’t think
Albus was fussed about him, I never saw them together, anyway.”
So what was Albus doing, if not comforting his wild young brother?
The answer, it seems, is ensuring the continued imprisonment of his
sister. For, though her first jailer had died, there was no change in
307
the pitiful condition of Ariana Dumbledore. Her very existence continued to be known only to those few outsiders who, like “Dogbreath”
Doge could be counted upon to believe in the story of her “ill health.”
Another such easily satisfied friend of the family was Bathilda
Bagshot, the celebrated magical historian who has lived in Godric’s
Hollow for many years. Kendra, of course, had rebuffed Bathilda
when she first attempted to welcome the family to the village. Several years later, however, the author sent an owl to Albus at Hogwarts, having been favorably impressed by his paper on trans-species
transformation in Transfiguration Today. This initial contact led to
acquaintance with the entire Dumbledore family. At the time of
Kendra’s death, Bathilda was the only person in Godric’s Hollow
who was on speaking terms with Dumbledore’s mother.
Unfortunately, the brilliance that Bathilda exhibited earlier in
her life has now dimmed. “The fire’s lit, but the cauldron’s empty,”
as Ivor Dillonsby put it to me, or, in Enid Smeek’s slightly earthier
phrase, “She’s nutty as squirrel poo.” Nevertheless, a combination of
tried-and-tested reporting techniques enabled me to extract enough
nuggets of hard fact to string together the whole scandalous story.
Like the rest of the Wizarding world, Bathilda puts Kendra’s premature death down to a backfiring charm, a story repeated by Albus
and Aberforth in later years. Bathilda also parrots the family line on
Ariana, calling her “frail” and “delicate.” On one subject, however,
Bathilda is well worth the effort I put in procuring Veritaserum, for
she, and she alone, knows the full story of the best-kept story of Albus Dumbledore’s life. Now revealed for the first time, it calls into
question everything that his admirers believed of of Dumbledore:
his supposed hatred of the Dark Arts, his opposition to the oppression of Muggles, even his devotion to his own family.
The very same summer that Dumbledore went home to Godric’s
Hollow, now an orphan and head of the family, Bathilda Bagshot
308 CHAPTER 18. THE LIFE AND LIES OF ALBUS DUMBLEDORE
agreed to accept into her home her great-nephew, Gellert Grindelwald.
The name of Grindelwald is justly famous: In a list of Most Dangerous Dark Wizards of All Time, he would miss out on the top spot
only because You-Know-Who arrived, a generation later, to steal
his crown. As Grindelwald never extended his campaign of terror
to Britain, however, the details of his rise to power are not widely
known here.
Educated at Durmstrang, a school famous even then for its unfortunate tolerance of the Dark Arts, Grindelwald showed himself
quite as precociously brilliant as Dumbledore. Rather than channel his abilities into the attainment of awards and prizes, however,
Gellert Grindelwald devoted himself to other pursuits. At sixteen
years old, even Durmstrang felt it could no longer turn a blind eye
to the twisted experiments of Gellert Grindelwald, and he was expelled.
Hitherto, all that has been known of Grindelwald’s next movements is that he “traveled abroad for some months.” It can now be
revealed that Grindelwald chose to visit his great-aunt in Godric’s
Hollow, and that there, intensely shocking though it will be for many
to hear it, he struck up a close friendship with none other than Albus Dumbledore.
“He seemed a charming boy to me,” babbles Bathilda, “whatever
he became later. Naturally I introduced him to poor Albus, who was
missing the company of lads his own age. The boys took to each
other at once.”
They certainly did. Bathilda shows me a letter, kept by her, that
Albus Dumbledore send Gellert Grindelwald in the dead of night.
“Yes, even after they’d spent all day in discussion—both such
brilliant young boys, they got on like a cauldron on fire—I’d sometimes hear an owl tapping at Gellert’s bedroom window, delivering a
309
letter from Albus! An idea would have struck him, and then he had
to let Gellert know immediately!”
And what ideas they were. Profoundly shocking though Albus
Dumbledore’s fans will find it, here are the thoughts of their seventeenyear-old hero, as relayed to his new best friend. (A copy of the original letter may be seen on page 463.)
Gellert—
Your point about Wizard dominance being FOR THE
MUGGLES’ OWN GOOD—this, I think is the crucial point.
Yes, we have been given power and yes, that power gives up
the right to rule, but it also gives us responsibilities over
the ruled. We must stress this point, it will be the foundation stone upon which we build. Where we are opposed, as
we surely will be, this must be the basis of all our counterarguments. We seize control FOR THE GREATER GOOD.
And from this it follows that where we meet resistance, we
must use only the force that is necessary and no more. (This
was your mistake at Durmstrang! But I do not complain,
because if you had not been expelled, we would never have
met.)
Albus
Astonished and appalled though his many admirers will be, this
letter constitutes proof that Albus Dumbledore once dreamed of overthrowing the Statute of Secrecy and establishing Wizard rule over
Muggles. What a blow for those who have always portrayed Dumbledore as the Muggle-borns’ greatest champion! How hollow those
speeches promoting Muggle rights seem in the light of this damning
new evidence! How despicable does Albus Dumbledore appear, busy
plotting his rise to power when he should have been mourning his
mother and caring for his sister!
310 CHAPTER 18. THE LIFE AND LIES OF ALBUS DUMBLEDORE
No doubt those determined to keep Dumbledore on his crumbling
pedestal will bleat that he did not, after all, put his plans into action,
that he must have suffered a change of heart, that he came to his
senses. However, the truth seems altogether more shocking.
Barely two months into their great new friendship. Dumbledore
and Grindelwald parted, never to see each other again until they
met for their legendary dual (for more, see chapter 22). What caused
this abrupt rupture? Had Dumbledore come to his senses? Had he
told Grindelwald he wanted no more part in his plans? Alas, no.
“It was poor little Ariana dying, I think, that did it,” says Bathilda.
“It came as an awful shock. Gellert was there in the house when it
happened, and he came back to my house all of a dither, told me he
wanted to go home the next day. Terribly distressed, you know. So I
arranged a Portkey and that was the last I saw of him.
“Albus was beside himself at Ariana’s death. It was so dreadful
for those two brothers. They had lost everybody except each other.
No wonder tempers ran a little high. Aberforth blamed Albus, you
know, as people will under these dreadful circumstances. But Aberforth always talked a little madly, poor boy. All the same, breaking
Albus’s nose t the funeral was not decent. It would have destroyed
Kendra to see her sons fighting like that, across her daughter’s body.
A shame Gellert could not have stayed for the funeral. . . . He would
have been a comfort to Albus, at least. . . . ”
This dreadful coffin-side brawl, known only to those few who attended Ariana Dumbledore’s funeral, raises several questions. Why
exactly did Aberforth Dumbledore blame Albus for his sister’s death?
Was it, as “Batty” pretends, a mere effusion of grief? Or could there
have been some more concrete reason for his fury? Grindelwald, expelled from Durmstrang for near-fatal attacks upon fellow students,
fled the country hours after the girl’s death, and Albus (out of shame
or fear?) never saw him again, not until forced to do so by the pleas
311
of the Wizarding world.
Neither Dumbledore nor Grindelwald ever seem to have referred
to this brief boyhood friendship in later life. However, there can be
no doubt that Dumbledore delayed, for some five years of turmoil,
fatalities, and disappearances, his attack upon Grindelwald. Was
it a lingering affection for the man or fear of exposure as his once
best friend that caused Dumbledore to hesitate? Was it only reluctantly that Dumbledore set out to capture the man he was once so
delighted he had met?
And how did the mysterious Ariana die? Was she the inadvertent
victim of some Dark rite? Did she stumble across something she
ought not to have done, as the two young men sat practicing for
their attempt at glory and domination? Is it possible that Ariana
Dumbledore was the first person to die “for the greater good”?
The chapter ended here and Harry looked up. Hermione had reached the
bottom of the page before him. She tugged the book out of Harry’s hands,
looking a little alarmed by his expression, and closed it without looking at it,
as though hiding something indecent.
“Harry—”
But he shook his head. Some inner certainty had crashed down inside him;
it was exactly as he had felt after Ron left. He had trusted Dumbledore, believed him the embodiment of goodness and wisdom. All was ashes: How
much more could he lose? Ron, Dumbledore, the phoenix wand . . . “Harry.”
She seemed to have heard his thoughts. “Listen to me. It—it doesn’t make
very nice reading—”
“Yeah, you could say that—”
“—but don’t forget, Harry this is Rita Skeeter writing.”
“You did read that letter to Grindelwald, didn’t you?”
“Yes, I—I did.” She hesitated, looking upset, cradling her tea in her cold
hands. “I think that’s the worst bit. I know Bathilda thought it was all just talk,
312 CHAPTER 18. THE LIFE AND LIES OF ALBUS DUMBLEDORE
bur ’For the Greater Godd’ became Grindelwald’s slogan, his justification for all
the atrocities he committed later. And . . . from that . . . it looks like Dumbledore
gave him the idea. They say ’For the Greater Godd’ was even carved over the
entrance to Nurmengard.”
“What’s Nurmengard?”
“The prison Grindelwald had built to hold his opponents. He ended up in
there himself, once Dumbledore had caught him. Anyway, it’s—it’s an awful
though that Dumbledore’s ideas helped Grindelwald rise to power But on the
other hand, even Rita can’t pretend that they knew each other for more than a
few months one summer when they were both really young, and—”
“I thought you’d say that,” said Harry. He did not want to let his anger spill
out at her, but it was hard to keep his voice steady. “I thought you ’d say ’They
were young.’ They were the same age as we are now. And here we are, risking
our lives to fight the Dark Arts, and there he was, in a huddle with his new
best friend, plotting their rise to power over the Muggles.”
His temper would not remain in check much longer: He stood up and walked
around, trying to work some of it off.
“I’m not truing to defend what Dumbledore wrote,” said Hermione. “All that
’right to rule’ rubbish, it’s ’Magic Is Might’ all over again. But Harry, his mother
had just died, he was stuck alone in the house—”
“Alone? He wasn’t alone! He had his brother and sister for company, his
Squib sister he was keeping locked up—”
“I don’t believe it,” said Hermione. She stood up too. “Whatever was wrong
with that girl, I don’t think she was a Squib. The Dumbledore we know would
never, ever have allowed—”
“The Dumbledore we thought we knew didn’t want to conquer Muggles by
force!” Harry shouted, his voice echoing across the empty hilltop, and several
blackbirds rose into the air, squawking and spiraling against the pearly sky.
“He changed, Harry, he changed! It’s as simple as that! Maybe he did
believe those things when he was seventeen, but the whole of the rest of his life
was devoted to fighting the Dark Arts! Dumbledore was the one who stopped
313
Grindelwald, the one who always voted for Muggle protection and Muggle born
rights, who fought You-Know-Who from the start, and who died trying to bring
him down!”
Rita’s book lay on the ground between them, so that the face of Albus Dumbledore smiled dolefully at both.
“Harry, I’m sorry, but I think the real reason you’re so angry is that Dumbledore never told you any of this himself.”
“Maybe I am!” Harry bellowed, and he flung his arms over his head, hardly
knowing whether he was trying to hold in his anger or protect himself from the
weight of his own disillusionment. “Look what he asked from me, Hermione!
Risk your life, Harry! And again! And again! And don’t expect me to explain
everything, just trust me blindly, trust that I know what I’m doing, trust me
even though I don’t trust you! Never the whole truth! Never!”
his voice cracked with the strain, and they stood looking at each other in
the whiteness and the emptiness, and Harry felt they were as insignificant s
insects beneath that wide sky.
“He loved you,” Hermione whispered. “I know he loved you.”
Harry dropped his arms.
“I don’t know who he loved, Hermione, but it was never me. This isn’t love,
the mess he’s left me in. He shared a damn sight more of what he was really
thinking with Gellert Grindelwald than he ever shared with me.”
Harry picked up Hermione’s wand, which he dropped in the snow, and sat
back down in the entrance to the tent.
“Thanks for the tea. I’ll finish the watch. You get back in the warm.”
She hesitated, but recognized the dismissal. She picked up the book and
then walked back past him into the tent, but as she did so, she brushed the top
of his head lightly with her hand. He closed his eyes at her touch, and hated
himself for wishing that what she said was true: that Dumbledore had really
cared.
314 CHAPTER 18. THE LIFE AND LIES OF ALBUS DUMBLEDORE
Chapter 19
The Silver Doe
I
t was snowing by the time Hermione took over the watch at midnight.
Harry’s dreams were confused and disturbing: Nagini wove in and out
of them, first through a gigantic, cracked ring, then through a wreath of
Christmas roses. He woke repeatedly, panicky, convinced that somebody had
called out to him in the distance, imagining that the wind whipping arund the
tent was footsteps or voices.
Finally he got up in the darkness and joined Hermione, who was huddled
in the entrance to the tent reading A History of Magic by the light of the wand.
The snow was still falling thickly, and she greeted with relief his suggestion of
packing up early and moving on.
“We’ll go somewhere more sheltered,” she agreed, shivering as she pulled
on a sweatshirt over her pajamas. “I kept thinking I could hear people moving
outside, I even thought I saw somebody once or twice.”
Harry paused in the act of pulling on a jumper and glanced at the silent,
motionless Sneakoscope on the table.
“I’m sure I imagined it,” said Hermione, looking nervous. “The snow in
the dark, it plays tricks on your eyes. . . . But perhaps we ought to Diapparate
under the Invisibility Cloak, just in case?”
Half an hour later, with the tent packed, Harry was wearing the Horcrux,
315
316 CHAPTER 19. THE SILVER DOE
and Hermione clutching the beaded bag, they Diapparated. The usual tightness engulfed them; Harry’s feet parted company with the snowy ground, then
slammed hard onto what felt like frozen earth covered with leaves.
“Where are we?” he asked, peering around at a fresh mass of trees as
Hermione opened the beaded bag and began tugging at tent poles.
“The Forest of Dean,” she said. “‘I camp camping here once with my mum
and dad.”
Here too snow lay on the trees all around and it was bitterly cold, but they
were at least protected from the wind. They spent most of the day inside the
tent, huddled for warmth around the useful bright blue flames that Hermione
was so adept at producing, and which could be scooped up and carried around
in a jar. Harry felt as though he was recuperating from some brief but severe
illness; an impression reinforced by Hermione’s solicitousless. That afternnon
fresh flakes drifted down upon then, so that even their sheltered clearing had
a fresh dusting of powdery snow.
After two nights of little sleep, Harry’s senses seemed more alert than usual.
Their escape from Godric’s Hollow had been so narrow that Voldemort seemed
somehow closer than before, more threatening. As darkness drew in again
Harry refused Hermione’s offer to keep watch and told her to go to bed.
Harry moved an old cushion into the tent mouth and sat down, wearing all
the sweaters he owned but even so, still shivery. The darkness deepened with
the passing hours until it was virtually impenetrable. he was on the point of
taking out the Marauder’s Map, so as to watch Ginny’s dot for a while, before
he remembered that it was the Chrostmas holidays and that she would be back
at the Burrow.
Every tiny movement seemed magnified in the vastness of the forest. Harry
knew that it must be full of living creatures, but he wished they would all remain stil and silent so that he could sparate their innocent scurryings and
prowlings from noises that might proclaim other, sinister movements. He remembered the sound of a cloak slithering ove rdead leaves many years ago,
and at once thought he heard it again before mentally shaking himself. Their
317
protective enchantments had worked for weeks; why should they break now?
And yet he could not throw off the feeling that something was different tonight.
Several time he jerked upright, he neck aching because he had fallen asleep,
slumped at an awkward angle against the side of the tent. The night reached
such a depth of velvety blackness that he might have been suspended in limbo
between Disapparition and Apparition. He had just held up a hand in front of
his face to see whether he could make out his fingers when it happened.
A bright silver light appeared right ahead of him, moving through the trees.
Whatever the source, it was moving soundlessly. The light seemed simply to
drift toward him.
He jumped to his feet, his voice frozen in his throat, and raised Hermione’s
wand. He screwed up his eyes as the light became blinding, the trees in front
of it pitch-black in silhouette, and still the thing came closer. . . .
And then the source of the light stepped out from behind an oak. It was a
silver-white doe, moon-bright and dazzling, picking her way over the ground,
still silent, and leaving no hoofprints in the fine powdering of snow. She stepped
toward him, her beautiful head with its wide, long-lashed eyes held high.
Harry stared at the creature, filled with wonder, not at her strangeness, but
at her inexplicable familiarity. He felt that he had been waiting for her to come,
but that he had forgotten, until that moment, that they had arranged to meet.
His impules to shout for Hermione, which had been so string a moment ago,
had gone. He knew, he would have staked his life on it, that she had come for
him, and him alone.
They gazed at each other for several long moments and then she turned an
walked away.
“No,” he said, and his voice was cracked with lack of use. “Come back!”
She continued to step deliberately through the trees, and soon her brightness was striped by their think black trunks. For one trembling second he
hesitated. Caution murmured it could be a trick, a lure, a trap. But instinct,
overwhelming instinct, told him that this was not Dark Magic. He set off in
pursuit.
318 CHAPTER 19. THE SILVER DOE
Snow crunched beneath his feet, but the doe made no noise as she passed
through the trees, for she was nothing but light. Deeper and deeper into the
forest she led him , and Harry walked quickly, sure that when she stopped, she
would allow him to approach her properly. And then she would speak and the
voice would tell him what he needed to know.
At last, she came to a halt. She turned her beautiful head toward him once
more, and he broke into a run, a question burning in him, but as he opened his
lips to ask it, she vanished.
Though the darkness had swallowed her whole, her burnished image was
still imprinted on his retinas; it obscured his vision, brightening when he lowered his eyelids, disorienting him. Now fear came; Her presence had meant
safety.
“Lumos!” he whispered, and the wand-tip ignited.
The imprint of the doe faded away with every blink of his eyes as he stood
there, listening to the sounds of the forest, to distant crackles of twigs, soft
swishes of snow. Was he about to be attacked? Had she enticed him into an
ambush? Was he imagining that somebody stood beyond the reach of the wandlight, watching him?
He held the wand higher. Nobody ran out him, no flash of green light burst
from behind a tree. Why, then, had she led him to this spot?
Something gleamed in the light of the wand, and Harry spun about, but all
that was there was a small, frozen pool, its cracked black surface glittereing as
he raised the wand higher to examine it.
He moved forward rather cautiously and looked down. The ice reflected his
distorted shadow and the beam of wandlight, but deep below the thick, misty
gray carapace, something else glinted. A great silver cross . . .
His heart skipped into his mouth: He dropped to his knees at the pool’s edge
and angled the wand so as to flood the bottom of the pool with as much light
as possible. A glint of deep red . . . It was a sword with glittering rubies in its
hilt. . . . The sword of Gryffindor was lying at the bottom of the forest pool.
Barely breathing, he stared down at it. How was this possible? How could
319
it have come to be lying in a forest pool, this close to the place where they
were camping? Had some unknown magic drawn Hermione to this spot, or was
the doe, which he had taken to be a Patronus, some kind of guardian of the
pool? Or had the sword been put into the pool after they had arrived, precisely
because they were here? In which case, where was the person who had wanted
to pass it to Harry? Again he directed the wand at the surrounding trees and
bushes, searching for a human outline, for the glint of an eye, but he could not
see anyone there. All the same, a little more fear leavened his exhileration as
he returned his attention to the sword reposing upon the bottom of the frozen
pool.
He pointed the want at the silvery shape and murmured, “Accio Sword.”
It did not stir. He had not expected it to. IF it had been that easy, the sword
would have lain on the ground for him to pick up, not in the depths of a frozen
pool. He set off around the circle of ice, thinking hard about the last time the
sword had delivered itself to him. He had been in terrible danger then, and
had asked for help.
“Help,” he murmured, but the sword remained upon the pool bottom, indifferent, motionless.
What was it, Harry asked himself (walking again), that Dumbledore had
told him the last time he had retrieved the sword? Only a true Gryffindor
could have pulled that out of the hat. And what were the qualities that defined
a Gryffindor? A small voice inside Harry’s head answered him: Their daring,
nerve, and chivalry set Gryffindors apart.
Harry stopped walking and let out a long sigh, his smoky breath dispersing
rapidly upon the frozen air. He knew what he had to do. If he was honest with
himself, he had thought it might come to this from the moment he had spotted
the sword through the ice.
He glanced at the surrounding trees again, but was convinced that noobdy
was going to attack him. They had had their chance as he walked alone through
the forest, had had plenty of opportunity as he examined the pool. The only
reason to delay at this point was because the immediate prospect was so deeply
320 CHAPTER 19. THE SILVER DOE
uninviting.
With fumbling fingeres Harry started to remove his many layers of clothing.
Where “chivalry” entered this, he thought ruefully, he was not entirely sure,
unless it counted as chivalrous that he was not calling for Hermione to do it in
his stead.
An owl hooted somewhere as he stripped off, and he thought with a pang
of Hedwig. He was shivering now, his teeth chattering horribly, and yet he
continued to strip of until at last he stood there in is underwear, bearfooted
in the snow. He placed the pouch containing his wand, his mother’s letter, the
shard of Sirius’s mirror, and the old Snitch on top of his clothes, then he pointed
Hermione’s wand at the ice.
“Diffindo.”
It cracked with a sound like a bullet in the silence. The surface of the pool
broke and chunks of dark ice rocked on the ruffled water. As far as Harry could
judge, it was not deep, but to retrieve the sword he would have to submerge
himself completely.
Contemplating the task ahead would not make it easier or the water warmer.
He stepped to the pool’s edge and placed Hermione’s wand on the ground, still
lit. Then, trying not to imagine how much coulder he was about to become or
how violently he would soon be shivering, he jumped.
Every pore of his body screamed in protest; The very air in his lungs seems
to freeze solid as he was submerged to his shoulders in the frozen water. He
could hardly breathe; trembling so violently, the water lapped over the edges of
the pool, he felt for the blad with his numb feet. He only wanted to dive once.
Harry put off the moment of total submersion from second to second, gasping and shaking, until he told himself that it must be done, gathered all his
courage, and dived.
The cold was agony: It attacked him like fire. His brain itself seemed to
have frozen as he pushed through the dark water to the bottom and reached
out, groping for the sword. His fingers closed around the hilt; he pulled it
upward.
321
Then something closed tight around his neck. He though of water weeds,
though nothing had brushed him as he dived, and raised his empty hand to
free himself. It was not weed: The chain of the Horcrux had tightened and was
slowly constricting his windpipe.
Harry kicked out wildly, trying to push humself back to the surface, but
merely propelled himself into the rocky side of the pool. Thrashing, suffocating,
he scrabbled at the strangling chain, his frozen fingers unable to loosen it, and
now little lights were popping inside his head, and he was going to drown,
there was nothing left, nothing he could do, and the arms that closed around
his chest were surely Death’s. . . .
Choking and retching, soaking and colder than he had ever been in his life,
he came to facedown in the snow. Somewhere close by, another person was
panting and coughing and staggering around. Hermione had come again, as
she had come when the snake attacked. . . . Yet it did not sound like her, not
with those deep coughs, not judging by the weight of the footsteps. . . .
Harry had no strength to lift his head and see his savior’s identity. All he
could do was raise a shaking hand to his throat and feel the place where the
locket had cut tightly into his flesh. It was gone. Someone had cut him free.
Then a panting voice spoke from over his head,
“Are—you—mental?”
Nothing but the shock of hearning that voice could have given Harry the
strength to get up. Shivering violently, he staggered to his feet. There before
him stood Ron, fully dressed bud drenched to the skin, his hair plastered to his
face, the sword of Gryffindor in one hand and the Horcrux dangling from its
broken chain in the other.
“What the hell,” panted Ron, holding up the Horcrux, which swung backward and forward on its shortened chain in some parody of hypnosis, “didn’t
you take this thing off before you dived?”
Harry could not answer. The silver doe was nothing, nothing compared with
Ron’s reappearance: he could not believe it. Shuddering with cold, he caught
up the pile of clothes still lying at the water’s edge and began to pull them on.
322 CHAPTER 19. THE SILVER DOE
As he dragged sweater after sweater over his head, Harry stared at Ron, half
expecting him to have disappeared every time he lost sight of him, and yet he
had to be real: He had just dived into the pool; he had saved Harry’s life.
“It was y—you?” Harry said at last, his teeth chattering, his voice weaker
than usual due to his near-strangulation.
“Well, yeah,” said Ron, looking slightly confused.
“Y—you cast that doe?”
“What? No, of course not! I thought it was you doing it!”
“My Patronus is a stag.”
“Oh yeah. I thought it looked different. No antlers.”
Harry put Hagrid’s pouch back around his neck, pulled on a final sweater,
stooped to pick up Hermione’s wand, and faced Ron again.
“How come you’re here?”
Apparently Ron had hoped that this point would come up later, if at all.
“Well, I’ve—you know—I’ve come back. If—” He cleared his throat. “You
know. You still want me.”
There was a pause, in which the subject of Ron’s departure seemed to rise
like a wall between them. Yet he was here. He had returned. He had just saved
Harry’s life.
Ron lookded down at his hands. He seemed momentarily surprised to see
the things he was holding.
“Oh yeah, I got it out,” he said, rather unnecessarily, holding up the sword
for Harry’s inspection. “That’s why you jumped in, right?”
“Yeah,” said Harry. “But I don’t understand. How did you get here? How
did you find us?”
“Long story,” said Ron. “I’ve been looking for you for hours, it’s a big forest,
isn’t it? And I was just thinking I’d have to kip under a tree and wait for
morning when I saw that deer coming and you following.”
“You didn’t see anyone else?”
“No,” said Ron, “I—”
323
But he hesitated, glancing at two trees growing close together some yards
away.
“I did think I saw something move over there, but I was running to the pool
at the time, because you’d gone in and you hadn’t come up, so I wasn’t going to
make a detour to—hey!”
Harry was already hurrying to the place Ron had indicated. The two oaks
grew together: there was a gap of only a few inches between the trunks at
eye level, and ideal place to see but not be seen. The ground around the roots,
however, was free of snow, and Harry could see no sign of footprints. He walked
back to where Ron stood waiting, still holding the sword and the Horcrux.
“Anything there?” Ron asked.
“No,” said Harry.
“So how did the sword ever get into that pool?”
“Whoever cast the Patronus must have put it there.”
They both looked at the ornate silver sword, its rubied hilt glinting a little
in the light from Hermione’s wand.
“You reckon this is the real one?” asked Ron.
“One way to find out, isn’t there?” said Harry.
The Horcrux was still swinging from Ron’s hand. The locket was twitching
slightly. Harry knew that the ting inside it was agitated again. It had sensed
the presence of the sword and had tried to kill Harry rather than let him possess it. Now was not the time for long discussions; now was the moment to
desktroy the locket once and for all. Harry looked around, holding Hermione’s
wand high, and saw the place: a flattish rock lying in the shadow of a sycamore
tree.
“Come here,” he said, and he led the way, brushed snow from the rock’s
surface, and held out his hand for the Horcrux. When Ron offered the sword,
however, Harry shook his head.
“No, you should do it.”
“Me?” said Ron, looking shocked. “Why?”
“Because you got the sword out of the pool. I think it’s supposed to be you.”
324 CHAPTER 19. THE SILVER DOE
He was not being kind or generous. As certainly as he had known that
the doe was benign, he knew that Ron had to be the one to wield the sword.
Dumbledore had at least taught Harry something about certain kinds of magic,
of the incalculabe power of certain acts.
“I’m going to open it,” said Harry, “and you stab it. Straightaway, okay?
Because whatever’s in there will put up a fight. The bit of Riddle in the diary
tried to kill me.”
“Hou are you going to open it?” asked Ron. He looked terrified.
“I’m going to ask it to open, using Parseltongue,” said Harry. The answer
came so readily to his lips that he thought he had always known it deep down:
Perhaps it had taken his recent encounter with Nagini to make him realize it.
He looked at the serpentine S inlaid with glittering green stones: It was easy
to visualize it as a miniscule snake, curled upon the cold rock.
“No!” said Ron. “No, don’t open it! I’m serious!”
“Why not?” asked Harry. “Let’s get rid of the damn thing, it’s been months—
”
“Because that thing’s bad for me!” said Ron, backing away from the locket
on the rock. “I can’t handle it! I’m not making excuses, Harry, for what I was
like, but it affects me worse than it affected you and Hermione, it made me
think stuff—stuff I was thinking anyway, but it made everything worse. I can’t
explain it, and then I’d take it off and I’d get my head on straight again, and
then I’d have to put the effing thing back on—I can’t do it, Harry!”
He had bakced away, the sword dragging at his side, shaking his head.
“You can do it,” said Harry. “you can! You’ve just got the sword, I know it’s
supposed to be you who uses it. Please, just get rid of it, Ron.”
The sound of his name seemed to act like a stimulant. Ron swallowed, then,
still breathing hard through his long nose, moved back toward the rock.
“Tell me when,” he croaked.
“On three,” said Harry, looking back down at the locket and narrowing his
eyes, concentrating on the letter S, imagining a serpent, while the contents of
the locket rattled like a trapped cockmatch. It would have been easy to pity it,
325
except that the cut around Harry’s neck still burned.
“One . . . two . . . three . . . open.”
The last word came as a hiss and a snarl and the golden doors of the locket
swung wide with a little click.
Behind both of the glass windows within blinked a living eye, dark and
handsome as Tom Riddle’s eyes had been before he turned them scarlet and
slitp—pupiled.
“Stab,” said Harry, holding the locket steady on the rock.
Ron raised the sword in his shaking hands: The point dangled over the
frantically swiveling eyes, and Harry gripped the locket tightly, bracing himself, already imagining blood pouring from the empty windows.
Then avoice hissed out from the Horcrux.
“I have seen your heart, and it is mine.”
“Don’t listen to it!” Harry said harshly. “Stab it!”
“I have seen your dreams, Ronald Weasley, and I have seen your fears. All
you desire is possible, but all that you dread is also possible. . . . ”
“Stab!” shouted Harry; his voice echoed off the surrounding trees, the sword
point trembled, and Ron gazed down into Riddle’s eyes.
“Least loved, always, by the mother who craved a daughter . . . Least loved,
now, by the girl who prefers your friend . . . Secont best, always, eternally overshadowed . . .”
“Ron, stab it now!” Harry bellowed; He could feel the locket quivering in his
grip an dwas scared of what was coming. Ron raised the sword still higher, and
as he did so, Riddle’s eyes gleamed scarlet.
Out of the locket’s two windows, out of the eyes, there bloomed, like two
grotesque bubbles, the heads of Harry and Hermione, weirdly distorted.
Ron yelled in shock and backed away as the figures blossomed out of hte
locket, first chests, then waists, then legs, until they stood in the locket, side by
side like trees with a common root, swaying over Ron and the real Harry, who
had snatched his fingers away from the locket as it burned, suddenly, whitehot.
326 CHAPTER 19. THE SILVER DOE
“Ron!” he shouted, but the Riddle-Harry was now speaking with Voldemort’s voice and Ron was gazing, mesmerized, into his face.
“Why return? We were better without you, happier without you, glad of your
absence. . . . We laughed at your stupidity, your cowardice, your presumption—”
“Presumption!” echoed the Riddle-Hermione, who was more beautiful and
yet more terrible than the real Hermione. She swayed, cackling, before Ron,
who looked horrified yet transfixed, the sword hanging pointlessly at his side.
“Who could look at you, who would ever look at you, beside Harry Potter? What
have you ever done, compared with the Chosen Oe? What are you, compared
with the Boy Who Lived?”
“Ron, stab it, STAB IT!” Harry yelled, but Ron did not move. His eyes were
wide, and the Riddle-Harry and the Riddle-Hermione were reflected in them,
their hair swirling like flames, their eyes shining red, their voices lifted in an
evil duet.
“You mother confessed,” sneered Riddle-Harry, while Riddle-Hermione jeered,
“that she would have preferred me as a son, would be glad to exchange . . .”
“Who wouldn’t prefer him, what woman would take you, you are nothing,
nothing, nothing to him,” crooned Riddle-Hermione, and she stretched like a
snake and engulfed herself around Riddle-Harry, wrapping him in a close embrace: Their lips met.
On the ground in front of them, Ron’s face filled with anguish. He raised
the sword high, his arms shaking.
“Do it, Ron!” Harry yelled.
Ron looked toward him, and Harry thought he saw a trace of scarlet in his
eyes.
“Ron—?”
The sword flashed, plunged; Harry threw hilsemf out of the way, there was
a clang of metal and a long, drawn-out scream. Harry whirled around, slipping
in the snow, wand held ready to defend himself: but there was nothing to fight.
The monstrous version of himself and Hermione were gone; There was only
Ron, standing there with the sword held slackly in his hand, looking down at
327
the shattered remains of the locket on the flat rock.
Slowly, Harry walked back to him, hardly knowing what to say or do. Ron
was breathing heavily: His eyes were no longer red at all, but their normal
blue; they were also wet.
Harry stopped, pretending he had not seen, and picked up the broken Horcrux. Ron had pierced the glass in both windows: Riddle’s eyes were gone, and
the stained silk lining of the locket was smoking slightly. The thing that had
lived in the Horcrux had vanished; torturing Ron had been its final act.
The sword clanged as Ron dropped it. He had sunk to his knees, his head in
his arms. He was shaking, but not, Harry realized, from cold. Harry crammed
the broken locket into his pocket, knelt down beside Ron, and placed a hand
cautiously on his shoulder. He took it as a good sign that Ron did not throw it
off.
“After you left,” he said in a low voice, grateful for the fact that Ron’s face
was hidden, “she cried for a week. Probably longer, only she didn’t want me to
see. There were loads of nights when we never even spoke toeach other. With
you gone . . . ”
He could not finish; it was only now that Ron was here again that Harry
fully realized how much his absense had cost them.
“She’s like my sister,” he went on. “I love her like a sister and I reckon she
feels the same way about me. It’s always been like that, I thought you knew.”
Ron did not respond, but turned his face away from Harry and wiped his
nose on his sleeve. Harry got to his feet again and walked to where Ron’s
enormous rucksack lay yards away, discarded as Ron had run toward the pool
to save Harry from drowning. He hoisted it onto his own back and walked back
to Ron, who clambered to his feet as Harry approached, eyes bloodshot but
otherwise composed.
“I’m sorry,” he said in a thick voice. “I’m sorry I left. I know I ws a—a—”
He looked around at the darkness, as if hoping a bad enough world would
swoop down upon him and claim him.
“You’ve sort of made up for it tonight,” said Harry. “Getting the sword.
328 CHAPTER 19. THE SILVER DOE
Finishing of the Horcrux. Saving my life.”
“That makes me sound a lot cooler than I was,” Ron mumbled.
“Stuff like that always sounds cooler than it really was,” said Harry. “I’ve
been trying to tell you that for years.”
Simultaneously they walked forward and hugged, Harry gripping the stillsopping back of Ron’s jacket.
“And now,” said Harry as they broke apart, “all we’ve got to do is find the
tent again.”
But it ws not difficult. Though the walk through the dark forest with the
doe had seemed lengthy, with Ron my his side the journey back seemed to take
a surprisingly short time. Harry could not wait to wake Hermione, and it was
with a quickening exitement that he entered the tent. Ron lagging a little
behind him.
It was gloriously warm after the pool and the forest, the only illumination
through the bluebell flames still shimmering in a bowl on the floor. Hermione
was fast asleep, curled up under her blankets, and did not move until Harry
had said her name several times.
“Hermione!”
She stirred, then sat up quickly, pushing her hair out of her face.
“What’s wrong? Harry? Are you all right?”
“It’s okay, everything’s fine. More than fine. I’m great. There’s someone
here.”
“What do you mean? Who—?”
She saw Ron, who stoop there holding the sword and dripping onto the
threadbare carpet. Harry backed into a shadowy corner, slipped off Ron’s rucksack, and attempted to blend in with the canvas.
Hermione slipped out of her bunk and moved like a sleepwalker toward
Ron, her eyes upon his pale face. She stopped right in front of him, her lips
slightly parted, her eyes wide. Ron gave a weak, hopeful smile and half raised
his arms.
Hermione launched herself forward and started punching every inch of him
329
that she could reach.
“Ouch—ow—gerroff! What the—? Hermione—OW!”
“You—complete—arse—Ronald—Weasley!”
She punctuated every word with a blow: Ron backed away, shielding his
head as Hermione advanced.
“You—crawl—back—here—after—weeks—and—weeks—oh, where’s my wand?”
She looked as though ready to wrestle it out of Harry’s hands and he reacted
instinctively.
“Protego!!”
The invisible shield erupted between Ron and Hermione. The force of it
knocked her backward onto the floor. Spitting hair out of her mouth, she leapt
up again.
“Hermione!” said Harry. “Calm—”
“I will not calm down!” she screamed. Never before had he seen her lose
control like this; she looked quite demented. “Give me back my wand! Give it
back to me!”
“Hermione, will you please—”
“Don’t you tell me what to do, Harry Potter!” she screeched. “Don’t you
dare! Give it back now! And YOU!”
She was pointing at Ron in dire accusation: It was like a malediction, and
Harry could not blame Ron for retreating several steps.
“I came running after you! I called you! I begged you to come back!”
“I know,” Ron said. “Hermione, I’m sorry, I’m really—”
“Oh you’re sorry!”
She laughed, a high-pitched, out-of-control sound; Ron looked at Harry for
help, but Harry merely grimaced his helplessness.
“You come back after weeks—weeks—and you think it’s all going to be all
right if you just say sorry?”
“Well, what else can I say?” Ron shouted, and Harry was glad that Ron was
fighting back.
330 CHAPTER 19. THE SILVER DOE
“Oh, I don’t know!” yelled Hermione with awful sarcasm. “Rack your brains,
Ron, that should only take a couple of seconds—”
“Hermione,” interjected Harry who considered this a low blow, “he just
saved my—”
“I don’t care!” she screamed. “I don’t care what he’s done! Weeks and weeks,
we could have been dead for all he knew—”
“I knew you weren’t dead!” bellowed Ron, drowning her voice for the first
time, and approaching as close as he could with the Shield Charm between
them. “Harry’s all over the Prophet, all over the radio, they’re looking for you
everywhere, all these rumors and mental stories, I knew I’d hear straight off if
you were dead, you don’t know what it’s been like—”
“What it’s been like for you?”
Her voice was now so shirll only bats would be able to hear it soon, but she
had reached a new level of indignation that rendered her temporarily speechless, and Ron seized his opportunity.
“I wanted to come back the minute I’d Disapparated, but I walked straight
into a gang of Snatchers, Hermione, and I couldn’t go anywhere!”
“A gang of what?” asked Harry, as Hermione thew herself down into a chair
with her arms and legs crossed so rightly it seemd unlikely that she would
unravel them for several years.
“Snatchers,” said Ron. “They’re everywhere—gangs trying to earn gold by
rounding up Muggle-borns and blood traiter,s, there’s a reward from the Ministry for everyone captured. I was on my own and I look like I might be school
age; they got really excited, thought I was a Muggle-born in hiding. I had to
talk fast to get out of being dragged to the Ministry.”
“What did you say to them?”
“Told them I was Stan Shunpike. First person I could think of.”
“And they believed that?”
“They weren’t the brightest. One of them was definitely part-troll, the smell
off him. . . . ”
Ron glanced at Hermione. clearly hopeful she might soften at this small
331
instance of humor, but her expression remained stony above her tightly knotted
limbs.
“Anyway, they had a row about whether I was Stan or not. It was a bit
pathetic to be honest, but there were still five of them and only one of me and
they’d taken my wand. then two of them got into a fight and while the others
were distracted I managed to hit the one holding me in the stomach, grabbed
his wand, Disarmed the bloke holding mine, and Diapparated. I didn’t do it so
well, Splinched myself again”—Ron held up his right hand to show two missing
fingernails; Hermione raised her eyebrows coldly—“and I came out miles from
where you were. By the time I got back to that bit of riverbank where we’d
been . . . you’d gone.”
“Gosh, what a gripping story,” Hermione said in the lofty voice she adopted
when wishing to wound. “You must have been sipmly terrified. Meanwhile
we went to Godric’s Hollow and, let’s think what happened there, Harry? Oh
yes, You-Know-Who’s snake turned up, it nearly killed both of us, and then
You-Know-Who himself arrived and missed us by about a second.”
“What?” Ron said, gaping from her to Harry, but Hermione ignored him.
“Imaging losing fingernails, Harry! That really puts our suffereings into
perspective doesn’t it?”
“Hermione,” said Harry quietly. “Ron just saved my life.”
She appeared not to have heard him.
“one thing I would like to know, though,” she said, fixing her eyes on a spot
a foot over Ron’s head. “How exactly did you find us tonight? That’s important.
Once we know, we’ll be able to make sure we’re not visited by anyone else we
don’t want to see.”
Ron glared at her, then pulled a small silver object from his jeans pocket.
“This.”
She had to look at Ron to see what he was showing them.
“The Deluminator?” she asked, so surprised she forgot to look cold and
fierce.
“It doesn’t just turn the lights on and off,” said Ron. “I don’t know how
332 CHAPTER 19. THE SILVER DOE
it works or why it happened then and not any other time, because I’ve been
wanting to come back ever since I left. But I was listening to the radio really
early on Christmas morning and I heard . . . I heard you.”
He was looking at Hermione.
“You heard me on the radio?” she asked incredulously.
“No. I heard you coming out of my pocket. Your voice,” he held up the
Deluminator again, “came out of this.”
“And what exactly did I say?” asked Hermione, her tone somewhere between skepticism and curiosity.
“My name. ’Ron.’ And you said . . . sometihng about a wand. . . . ”
Hermione turned a fiery shade of scarlet. Harry remembered. It had been
the first time Ron’s name had been said aloud by either of them since the day
he had left; Hermione had mentions it when talking about repairing Harry’s
wand.
“So I took it out,” Ron went on, looking at the Deluminator, “and it didn’t
seem different or anything, but I was sure I’d heard you. So I clicked it. And
the light went out in my room, but another light appeared right outside my
window.”
Ron raised his empty hand and pointed in front of him, his eyes focused on
something neither Harry nor Hermione could see.
“It was a ball of light, kind of pulsing, and bluis, like that like you get around
a Portkey, you know?”
“Yeah,” said Harry and Hermione together automatically.
“I knew this was it,” said Ron. “I grabbed my stuff and packed it then I put
on my rucksack and wnet out into the garden.
“The little ball of light was hovering there, waiting for me, and when I came
out it bobbed along a bit and I followed it behind the shed and then it . . . well,
it went inside me.”
“Sorry?” said Harry, sure he had not heard correctly.
“It sort of floated toward me,” said Ron, illustrating the movement with his
free index finger, “right into my chest, and then—it just went straight through.
333
It was here,” he touched a point close to his heart. “I could feel it, it was hot.
And once it was inside me I knew where I was supposed to do, I knew it would
take me where I needed to go. So I Disapparated and came out on the side of a
hill. There was snow everywhere. . . . ”
“We were there,” said Harry. “We spend two nights there, and the second
night I kept thinking I could hear someone moving around in the dark and
calling out!”
“Yeah, well, that would’ve been me,” said Ron. “Your protective spells work,
anyway, because I couldn’t see you and I couldn’t hear you. I was sure you were
around, though, so in the end I got in my sleeping bag and waited for one of
you to appear. I thought you’d have to show yourselves when you packed up
the tent.”
“No, actually, said Hermione. “We’ve been Disapparating under the Invisibility Cloak as an extra precaution. And we left really early, because as Harry
says, we’d heard somebody blundering around.”
“Well, I stayed on that hill all day,” said Ron. “I kept hoping you’d appear.
But when it started to get dark I knew I must have missed you, so I clicked
the Deluminator again, the blue light came out and went inside me, and I
Disapparated and arrived here in these woods. I still couldn’t see you, so I just
had to hope one of you would show yourselves in the end—and Harry did. Well,
I saw the doe first, obviously.”
“You saw the what?” said Hermione sharply.
They explained what had happened, and as the story of the silver doe nad
the sword in the pool unfolded, Hermione frowned from one to the other of
them, concentrating so hard she forgot to keep her limbs locked together.
“But it must have been a Patronus!” she said. “Couldn’t you see who was
casting it? Didn’t you see anyone? And it led you to the sword! I can’t believe
this! Then what happened?”
Ron explained how he had watched Harry jump into the pool and had waited
for him to resurface; how he had realized that sometihng was wrong, dived in,
and saved Harry, then returned for the sword. He got as far as the opening of
334 CHAPTER 19. THE SILVER DOE
the locket, then hesitated, and Harry cut in.
“—and Ron stabbed it with the sword.”
“And . . . it went? Just like that?” she whispered.
“Well, it—screamed,” said Harry with half a glance at Ron. “Here.”
He threw the locket into her lap; gingerly she picked it up and examined its
punctured windows.
Deciding that it ws at last safe to do so, Harry removed the Shield Charm
with a wave of Hermione’s wand and turned to Ron.
“Did you just say you got away from the Snatchers with a spare wand?”
“What?” said Ron, who had been watching Hermione examining the locket.
“Oh—oh yeah.”
He tugged open a buckle on his rucksack and pulled a short, dark wand out
of its pocket. “Here. I figured it’s always handy to have a backup.”
“You were right,” said Harry, holding out his hand. “Mine’s broken.”
“You’re kidding?” Ron said, but at that moment Hermione got to her feet,
and he looked apprehensive again.
Hermione put the vanquished Horcrux into the beaded bag, then climbed
back into her bed and settled down without another word.
Ron passed Harry the new wand.
“About the best you could hope four, I think,” murmured Harry.
“Yeah,” said Ron. “Could’ve been worse. Remember those birds she set on
me?”
“I still haven’t ruled it out,” came Hermione’s muffled voice from beneath
her blankets, but Harry saw Ron smiling slightly as he pulled his maroon pajamas out of his rucksack.
Chapter 20
Xenophilius Lovegood
H
arry had not expected Hermione’s anger to abate overnight, and
was therefore unsurprised that she communicated mainly by dirty
looks and pointed silences the next morning. Ron responded by
maintaining an unnaturally somber demeanor in her presence as an outward
sign of continuing remorse. In fact, when all three of them were together Harry
felt like the only non-mourner at a poorly attended funeral. During those few
moments he spent alone with Harry, however (collecting water and searching
the undergrowth for mushrooms), Ron became shamelessly cheery.
“Someone helped us.” he kept saying. “Someone sent that doe. Someone’s
on our side. One Horcrux down, mate!”
Bolstered by the destruction of the locket, they set to debating the possible locations of the other Horcruxes, and even though they had discussed the
matter so often before, Harry felt optimistic, certain that more breakthroughs
would succeed the first. Hermione’s sulkiness could not mar his buoyant spirits; The sudden upswing in their fortunes, they appearance of the mysterious
doe, the recovery of Gryffindor’s sword, and above all, Ron’s return, made Harry
so happy that it was quite difficult to maintain a straight face.
Late in the afternoon he and Ron escaped Hermione’s baleful presence again,
and under the pretense of scouting the bare hedges for nonexistent blackber335
336 CHAPTER 20. XENOPHILIUS LOVEGOOD
ries, they continued their ongoing exchange of news. Harry had finally managed to tell Ron the whole story of his and Hermione’s various wanderings,
right up to the full story of what had happened at Godric’s Hollow; Ron was
now filling Harry in on everything he had discovered about the wider Wizarding world during his weeks away.
“ . . . and how did you find out about the Taboo?” he asked Harry after explaining the many desperate attempts of Muggle-borns to evade the Ministry.
“The what?”
“You and Hermione have stopped saying You-Know-Who’s name!”
“Oh, yeah. Well, it’s just a bad habit we’ve slipped into,” said Harry. “But I
haven’t got a problem calling him V—”
“NO!” roared Ron, causing Harry to jump into the hedge and Hermione
(nose buried in a boot at the tent entrance) to scowl over at them. “Sorry.”
said Ron, wrenching Harry back out of hte brambles, “but the name’s been
jinxed. Harry, that’s how they track people! Using his name breaks protective
enchantments, it causes some kind of magical disturbance—it’s how they found
us in Totenham Court Road!”
“Because we used his name?”
“Exactly! You’ve got to give htem credit, it makes sense. It was only people
who were serious about standing up to him like Dumbledore, who ever dared
use it. Now they’ve put a Taboo on it, anyone who says it is trackable—quickand-easy way to find they Order members! They nearly got Kingsley—”
“You’re kidding?”
“Yeah, a bunch of Death Eaters cornered him, Bill said, but he fought his
way out. He’s on the run now, just like us.” Ron scratched his chin thoughfully
with the end of his wand. “You don’t reckon Kingsley could have sent that doe?”
“His Patronus is a lynx, we saw it at the wedding, remember?”
“Oh yeah . . . ”
They moved farther along the hedge, away from the tent and Hermione.
“Harry . . . you don’t reckon it could’ve been Dumbledore?”
“Dumbledore what?”
337
Ron looked a little embarrassed, but said in a low voice, “Dumbledore . . . the
doe? I mean,” Ron was watching Harry out of the corners of his eyes, “he had
the real sword last, didn’t he?”
Harry did not laugh at Ron, because he understood too well the longing behind the question. The idea that Dumbledore had managed to come back to
them, that he was watching over them, would have been inexpressibly comforting. He shook his head.
“Dumbledore’s dead,” he said. “I saw it happen, I saw the body. He’s definitely gone. Anyway, his Patronus was a phoenix, not a doe.”
“Patronuses can change, though, can’t they?” said Ron. “Tonks’s changed,
didn’t it?”
“Yeah, but if Dumbledore was alive, why wouldn’t he show himself? Why
wouldn’t he just hand us the sword?”
“Search me,” said Ron. “Same reason he didn’t give it to you while he was
alive? Same reason he left you an old Snitch and Hermione a book of kids’
stories?”
“Which is what?” asked Harry, turning to look Ron full in the face, desperate
for the answer.
‘I dunno,” said Ron. “Sometimes I’ve thought, when I’ve been a bit hacked
off, he was having a laugh or—or he just wanted to make it more difficult. But
I don’t think so, not anymore. He knew what he was doing when he gave me
the Deluminator, didn’t he? He—well,” Ron’s ears turned bright red and he
became engrossed in a tuft of grass at his feet, which he prodded with his toe,
“he must’ve known I’d run out on you.”
“No,” Harry corrected him. “He must’ve know you’d always want to come
back.”
Ron looked grateful, but still awkward. Partly to change the subject, Harry
said, “Speaking of Dumbledore, have you heard what Skeeter wrote about
him?”
“Oh yeah,” said Ron at once. “people are talking about it quite a lot. ’Course,
if things were different, it’d be huge news. Dumbledore being pals with Grindel-
338 CHAPTER 20. XENOPHILIUS LOVEGOOD
wald, but now it’s just something to laugh about for people who didn’t like
Dumbledore, and a bit of a slap in the face for everyone who though he was
such a good bloke. I don’t know that it’s such a big deal, though. He was really
young when they—”
“Our age,” said Harry, just as he had retorted to Hermione, and something
in his face seemed to decide Ron against persuing the subject.
A large spider sat in the middle of a frosted web in the brambles. Harry
took aim at it with the wand Ron had given him the previous night, which
Hermione had since condescended to examine, and had decided was made of
blackthorn.
“Engorgio.”
The spider game a little shiver, bouncing slightly in the web. Harry tried
again. This time the spider grew slightly larger.
“Stop that,” said Ron sharply. “I’m sorry I said Dumbledore was young,
okay?”
Harry had forgotten Ron’s hatred of spiders.
“Sorry—Reducio.”
The spider did not shrink. Harry looked down at the blackthorn wand. Every minor spell he had cast with it so far tha day had seemed less powerful
than those he had produced with his phoenix wand. The new one felt intrusively unfamiliar, like having sombody else’s hand sown to the end of his arm.
“You just need to practice,” said Hermione, who had approached them noiselessly from behind and had stood watching anxiously as Harry tried to enlarge
and reduce the spider. “It’s all a matter of confidence, Harry.”
He knew why she wanted to be right: She still felt guilty about breaking
his wand. He bit back the retort that sprang to his lips, that she could take the
blackthorn wand if she thought it made no difference, and he would have hers
instead. Keen for them all to be friends again, however, he agreed; but when
Ron gave Hermione a tentative smile, she stalked off and vanished behind her
book once more.
All three of them returned to the tent when darkness fell, and Harry took
339
first watch. Sitting in the entrance, he tried to make the blackthorn wand
levitate small stones at his feet; but his magic still seemed clumsier and less
powerful than it had done before. Hermione was lying on her bunk reading,
while Ron, after many nervous glances up at her, had taken a small wooden
wireless out of his rucksack and started to try and tune it.
“There’s this one program,” he told Harry in a low voice, “that tells the news
like it really is. All the others are on You-Know-Who’s side and are following
the Ministry line, but this one . . . you wait till you hear it, it’s great. Only they
can’t do it every night, they have to keep changing locations in case they’re
raided, and you need a password to tune in. . . . Trouble is, I missed the lsat
one. . . . ”
He drummed lightly on top of the radio with his wand, muttering random
words under his breath. He threw Hermione many covert glances, plainly fearing an angry outburst, but for all the notice she took of him he might not have
been there. For ten minutes or so Ron tapped and muttered. Hermione turned
the pages of her book, and Harry continued to practice with the blackthorn
wand.
Finally Hermione climbed down from her bunk. Ron ceased his tapping at
once.
“If it’s annoying you, I’ll stop!” he told Hermione nervously.
Hermione did not deign to respond, but approached Harry.
“We need to talk,” she said.
He looked at the book still clutched in her hand. It was The Life and Lies of
Albus Dumbledore.
“What?” he said apprehensively. It flew through his mind that there was a
chapter on him in there; he was not sure he felt up to hearing Rita’s verison of
his relationship with Dumbledore. Hermione’s answer, however, was completedly unexpected.
“I want to go and see Xenophilius Lovegood.”
He stared at her.
“Sorry?”
340 CHAPTER 20. XENOPHILIUS LOVEGOOD
“Xenophilius Lovegood, Luna’s father. I want to go and talk to him!”
“Er—why?”
She took a deep breath, as though bracing herself, and said, “It’s that mark,
the mark in Beedle the Bard. Look at this!”
She thrust The Life and Lies of Albus Dumbledore under Harry’s unwilling
eyes as he saw a photograph of the original letter than Dumbledore had written
Grindelwald, with Dumbledore’s familiar thin, slanting handwriting. He hated
seeing absolute proof that Dumbledore really had writen those words, that they
had not been Rita’s invention.
“The signature,” said Hermione. “Look at the signature, Harry!”
He obeyed. For a moment he had no idea what she was talking about,
but, looking more closely with the aid of his lit wang, he saw that Dumbledore
had replaced the A of Albus with a tiny version of the same triangular mark
inscribed upon The Tales of Beedle the Bard.
“Er—what are you—?” said Ron tentatively, but Hermione quelled him with
a look and turned back to Harry.
“It keeps cropping up, doesn’t it?” she said. “I know Viktor said it was
Grindelwald’s mark, but it was definitely on that old grave in Godric’s Hollow,
and the dates on the headstone were long before Grindelwald came along! And
now this! Well, we can’t ask Dumbledore or Grindelwald what it means—I
don’t even know if Grindelwald’s stil alive—but we can ask Mr. Lovegood. he
was wearing the symbol at the wedding. I’m sure this is important, Harry!”
Harry did not answer immediately. He looked into her intense, eager face
and then out into the surrounding darkness, thinking. After a long pause he
said, “Hermione, we don’t need another Godric’s Hollow. We talked ourselves
into going there, and—”
“But it keeps appearing, Harry! Dumbledore’s left he The Tales of Beedle
the Bard, how do you know we’re not supposed to find out about the sign?”
“Here we go again!” Harry felt slightly exaperated. “We keep trying to
convince ourselves Dumbledore left us secret signs and clues—”
“The Deluminator turned out to be pretty useful,” piped up Ron. “I think
341
Hermione’s right, I think we ought to go and see Lovegood.”
Harry threw him a dark look. He was quite sure that Ron’s support of
Hermione had little to do with a desire to know the meaning of the triangular
rune.
“It won’t be like Godric’s Hollow,” Ron added, “Lovegood’s on your side,
Harry, The Quibbler’s been for you all along, it keeps telling everyone they’ve
got to help you!”
“I’m sure this is important!” said Hermione earnestly.
“But don’t you think if it was, Dumbledore would have told me about it
before he died?”
“Maybe . . . maybe it’s something you need to find out for yourself,” said
Hermione with a faint air of clutching at straws.
“Yea,” said Ron syncophantically, “that makes sense.”
“No, it doesn’t,” snapped Hermione, “but I still think we ought to talke to
Mr. Lovegood. A symbol that links Dumbledore, Grindelwald, and Godric’s
Hollow? Harry, I’m sure we ought to know about this!”
“I think we should vote on it,” said Ron. “Those in favor of going to see
Lovegood—”
His hand flew into the air before Hermione’s. Her lips quivered suspiciously
as she raised her own.
“Outvoted, Harry, sorry,” said Ron, clapping him on the back.
“Fine,” said Harry, half amused, half irritated. “Only, once we’ve seen Lovegood, let’s try and look for some more Horcruxes, shall we? where do the Lovegoods live, anyway? Do either of you know?”
“Yeah, they’re not far from my place,” said Ron.. “I dunno exactly where,
but Mum and Dad always point toward the hills whenever they mention the,.
Shouldn’t be hard to find.”
When Hermione had returned to her bunk, Harry lowered his voice.
“You only agreed to try and get back in her good books.”
“All’s fair in love and war,” said Ron brightly, “and this is a bit of both. Cheer
up, it’s the Christmas holidays, Luna’ll be home!”
342 CHAPTER 20. XENOPHILIUS LOVEGOOD
They had an excellent view of the village of Ottery St. Cachpole from the
breezy hillside to which they Disapparated next morning. From their high vantage point the village looked like a collection of toy houses in the great slanting
shafts of sunlight stretching to earth in the breaks between clouds. They stood
for a minute or two looking toward the Burrow their hands shadowing their
eyes, but all they could make out were the high hedges and tree of the orchard,
which afforded the crooked little house protection from Muggle eyes.
“It’s weird, being this near, but not going to visit,” said Ron.
“Well, it’s not like you haven’t just seen them. You were there for Christmas,” said Hermione coldly.
“I wasn’t at the Burrow!” said Ron with and incredulous laugh. “Do you
think I was going to go back there and tell them all I’d walked out on you?
Yeah, and Fred and George woud’ve been great about it. And ginny, she’d have
been really understanding.”
“VBut where have you been, then?” asked Hermione, surprised.
“Bill and Fleur’s new place. Shell Cottage. Bill’s always been decent to
me. He—he wasn’t impressed when he heard what I’d done, but he didn’t go
on about it. He knew I was really sorry. None of the rest of the family knew
I was there. Bill told Mum he and Fleur weren’t going home for Christmas
because they wanted to spend it alonge. You know, first holiday after they were
married. I don’t think Fleur minded. You know how much she hates Celestina
Warbeck.”
Ron turned his back on the Burrow.
“Let’s try up here,” he said, leading the way over the top of the hill.
They walked for a few hours, Harry, at Hermione’s insistence, hidden beneath the Invisibility Cloak. The cluster of low hills appeared to be uninhabited apart from one small cotttage, which seemed deserted.
“Do you think it’s theirs, and they’ve gone away for Christmas?” said Hermione,
peering thorugh the window at a neat little kitchen with geraniums on the windowsill. Ron snorted.
“Listen, I’ve got a feeling you’d be able to tell who lived there if you looked
343
through the Lovegood’s window. Let’s try the next lot of hills.
So the Disapparated a few miles farther north.
“Aha!” shouted Ron, as the wind whippped their hair and clothes. Ron
was pointing upward, toward the top of the hill on which they had appeared,
where a most strange-looking house rose vertically against the sky, a great
black cylinder with a ghostly moon hanging behind it in the afternoon sky.
“That’s got to be Luna’s house, who else would live in a place like that? It looks
like a giant rook!”
“It’s nothing like a bird,” said Hermione, frowning at the tower.
“I was talking about a chess rook,” said Ron. “A castle to you.”
Ron’s legs were the longest and he reached the top of the hill first. When
Harry and Hermione caught up with him, panting and clutching stitches in
their sides, they foun dhim grinning broadly.
“It’s theirs,” said Ron. “Look.”
Three hand-painted signs had been tacked to a broken-down gate. The first
read,
THE QUIBBLER, EDITOR: X. LOVEGOOD
the second,
PICK YOUR OWN MISTLETOE
the third,
KEEP OFF THE DIRIGIBLE PLUMS
The gate creaked as they opened it. The zigzagging path leading to the front
door was overgrown with a variety of odd plants, including a bush covered in
the orange radishlike fruit Luna sometimes wore as earrings. Harry though
he recognized a Snargaluff and gave the wizened stump a wide berth. Two
aged crab apple trees, beat with the wind, stripped of leaves but still heavery
with berry-sized red fruits and bushy crowns of white-beaded mistletoe, stood
sentinel on either side of the front door. A little owl with a slightly flattened,
hawklike head peered down at them from one of the branches.
344 CHAPTER 20. XENOPHILIUS LOVEGOOD
“You’d better take off the Invisibility Cloak, Harry,” said Hermione. “It’s you
Mr. Lovegood wants to help, not us.”
He did as she suggested, handing her the Cloak to stow in the beaded bag.
She the rapped three times on th ethick black door, which was studded with
iron nails and bore a knocker shaped like an eagle.
Barely ten seconds passed, then the door was flung open and there stood
Xenophilius Lovegood, barefoot and wearing what appeared to be a stained
nightshirt. His long white candyfloss hair was dirty and unkempt. Xenophilius
had been positively dapper at Bill and Fleur’s wedding by comparision.
“What? What is it? Who are you? What do you want?” he cried in a highpitched, querulous voice, looking first at Hermione, then at Ron, and finally at
Harry, upon which his mouth fell open in a perfect comical O.
“Hello, Mr. Lovegood,” said Harry, holding out his hand. “I’m Harry, Harry
Potter.”
Xenophilius did not take Harry’s hand, although the eye that was not pointing inward at his nose slid straight to the scar on Harry’s forehead.
“Would it be okay if we came in?” asked Harry. “There’s sometihng we’d like
to ask you.”
“I . . . I’m not sure that’s advisable,” whispered Xenophilius. He swallowed
and cast a quick look around the garden. “Rather a shock . . . My word . . . I
. . . I’m afraid I don’t really think I ought to—”
“It won’t take long,” said Harry, slightly disappointed by this less than
warming welcome.
“I—oh, all right then. Come in, quickly. Quickly!”
they were barely over the threshold when Xenophilius slammed the door
shut behind then. They were standing in the most peculiar kitchen Harry had
ever seen. The room was perfectly circular, so that it felt like being inside a
giant pepper pot. Everything was curved to fit the walls—the stove, the sink,
and the cupboards—and all of it had been painted with flowers, insects, and
birds in bright primary colors. Harry though he recognized Luna’s style: The
effect in such an enclosed space, was slightly overwhelming.
345
In the middle of the floor, a wrought-iron spiral staircase led to the upper
levels. There was a great deal of clattering and banging coming from overhead:
Harry wondered what Luna could be doing.
“You’d better come up,” said Xenophilius, still looking extremely uncomfortable, and he led the way.
The room above seemed to be a combination of living room and workplace,
and as such, was even more cluttered than the kitchen. Though much smaller
and entirely round, the room somewhat resembled the Room of Requirement
on the unforgettable occasion that it had transformed itself into a gigantic
labryinth comprised of centuries of hidden objects. There were piles upon piles
of books and papers on every surface. Delicately made models of creatures
Harry did not recognize, all flapping wings or snapping jaws, hung from the
ceiling.
Luna was not there; The thing that was making such a racket was a wooden
object covered in magically turning cogs and wheels. It looked like the bizarre
offspring of a workbench and a set of old shelves, but after a moment Harry decided it was an old fashioned printing press, due to the fact that it was churning
out Quibblers.
“Excuse me,” said Xenophilius, and he strode over to the machine, seized
a grubbly tablecloth from beneath an immense number of books and papers,
which all tumbled onto the floor, and threw it over the press, somewhat muffling the loud bangs and clatters. He then faced Harry.
“Why have you come here?”
Before Harry could speak, however, Hermione lot out a small cry of shock.
“Mr. Lovegood—what’s that?”
She was pointing at an enormous, gray spiral horn, not unlike that of a
unicorn, which had been mounted on the wall, protruding several feet into the
room.
“It is the horm of a Crumple-Horned Snorkack,” said Xenophilius.
“No it isn’t!” said Hermione.
“Hermione,” muttered Harry, embarrassed, “now’s not the moment—”
346 CHAPTER 20. XENOPHILIUS LOVEGOOD
“But Harry, it’s an Erumpent horn! It’s a Class B Tradeable Material and
it’s an extraordinarily dangerous thing to have in a house!”
“How d’you know it’s an Erumpent horn?” asked Ron, edging away from the
horn as fast as he could, given the extreme clutter of the room.
“There’s a description in Fantastic Beasts and Where to Find Them! Mr.
Lovegood, you need to get rid of it straightaway, don’t you know it can explode
at the slightest touch?”
“The Crumple-Horned Snorkack,” said Xenophilius very clearly, a mullish
look upon his face, “is a shy and highly magical creature, and its horn—”
“Mr. Lovegood, I recognize the grooved markings around the base, that’s
an Erumpent horn and it’s incredibily dangerous—I don’t know where you got
it—”
“I bought it,” said Xenophilius dogmatically, “two weeks ago, from a delightful young wizard who knew of my interest in the exquisite Snorkack. A
Christmas surprise for my Luna. Now,” he said, turning to Harry, “why exactly
have you come here, Mr. Potter?”
“We need some help,” said Harry, before Hermione could start again.
“Ah,” said Xenophilius. “Help. Hmm.”
His good eye moved again to Harry’s scar. He seems simultaneously terrified and mesmerized.
“Yes. The this is . . . helping Harry Potter . . . rather dangerous . . . ”
“Aren’t you the one who keeps telling everyone it’s their first duty to help
Harry?” said Ron. “In that magazine of yours?”
Xenophilius glanced behind him at the concealed printing press, still banging and clattering beneath the tablecloth.
“Er—yes, I have expressed that view. However—” “That’s for everyone else
to do, not you personally?” said Ron.
Xenophilius did not answer. He kept swallowing, his eyes darting between
the three of them. Harry had the impression that he was undergoing some
painful interal struggle.
“Where’s Luna?” asked Hermione, “Let’s see what she thinks.”
347
Xenophilius gulped. He seemed to be steeling himself. Finally he said in a
shaky voice difficult to hear over the noise of the printing press, “Luna is down
at the stream, fishing for Freshwater Plimpies. She . . . she will like to see you.
I’ll go and call her and then—very well. I shall try to help you.”
He disappeared down the spiral staircase and they heard the front door
open and close. They looked at each other.
“Cowardly old wart,” said Ron. “Luna’s got ton times his guts.”
“He’s probably worried about what’ll happen to them if the Death Eaters
find out I was here,” said Harry.
“Well, I agree with Ron,” said Hermione. “Awful old hypocrite, telling everyone else to help you and trying to worm out of it himself. And for heaven’s sake
keep away from that horn.”
Harry crossed to the window of the far sid of the room. He could see a
stream, a thin, glittering rybbon lying far below them at the base of the hill.
They were very high up; a bird fluttered past the window as he stared in the
direction of the Burrow, now invisible beyond another line of hills. Ginny was
over there somewhere. They were closer to each other than they had been since
Bill and Fleur’s wedding, but she could have no idea he was gazing toward her
now, thinking of her. He supposed he ought to be glad of it; anyone he came
into contact with was in danger. Xenophilius’s attitude proved that.
He turned away from the windows and his gaze fell upon another peculiar
object standing upon the cluttered, curved sideboard: a stone bust of a beautiful but austere-looking witch wearing a most bizarre-looking headdress. Two
object that resembled golden ear trumpets curved out form the sides. A tiny
pair of gliterring blue wings was stuck to a leather strap that ran over the top
of her head, while one of the orange radishes had been stuck to a second strap
around her forehead.
“Looking at this,” said Harry.
“Fetching,” said Ron. “Surprised he didn’t wear that to the wedding.”
They heard the front door close, and a moment later Xenophilius had climbed
back up the spiral staircase into the room, his thin legs now encased in Welling-
348 CHAPTER 20. XENOPHILIUS LOVEGOOD
ton boots, bearing a tray of ill-assorted teacups and a steaming teapot.
“Ah, you have spotted my pet invention,” he said, shoving the tray into
Hermione’s arms and joining Harry at the statue’s side. “Modeled, fittingly
enough, upon the head of the beautiful Rowena Ravenclaw. ’Wit beyond measure is a man’s greatest treasure!’”
He indicated the objects like ear trumpets.
“These are the Wrackspurt siphons—to remove all sources of distraction
from the thinker’s immediate area. Here,” he pointed out the tina wings, “a
billywig propeller, to induce an elevated frame of mind. Finally,” he pointed to
the orange radish. “the Dirgible Plum, so as th enhance the ability to accept
the extraordinary.”
Xenophilius strode back to the tea tray, which Hermione had managed to
balance precariously on one of the cluttered side tables.
“May I offer you all an infusion of Gurdyroots?” said Xenophilius. “We make
it ourselves.” As he started to pour out the drink, which was a deep purple as
beetroot juice, he added, “Luna is down beyond Bottom Bridge, she is most
excited that you are here. She ought not be too long, she has caught nearly
enough Plumpies to make soup for all of us. Do sit down and help yourselves
to sugar.
“Now,” he removed a tottering pile of papers from an armchair and sat down,
his Wellingtoned legs crossed, “how may I help you, Mr. Potter?”
“Well,” said Harry, glancing at Hermione, who nodded encouragingly. “it’s
about that symbol you were wearing around you neck at Bill and Fleur’s wedding. Mr. Lovegood. We wondered what it meant.”
Xenophilius raised his eyebrows.
“Are you referring to the sign of the Deathly Hallows?” “Are you referring to
the sign of the Deathly Hallows?” “Are you referring to the sign of the Deathly
Hallows?” “Are you referring to the sign of the Deathly Hallows?”
Chapter 21
The Tale of the Three
Brothers
H
arry turned to look at Ron and Hermione. Neither of them seemed
to have understood what Xenophilius had said either.
“The Deathly Hallows?”
“That’s right,” said Xenophilius. “You haven’t heard of them? I’m not surprised. Very, very few wizards believe. Witness that knuckle-headed young
man at your brother’s wedding,” he nodded at Ron, “who attacked me for sporting the symbol of a well-known Dark wizard! Such ignorance. There is nothing
Dark about the Hallows—at least, not in that crude sense. One simply uses the
symbol to reveal oneself to other believers, in the hope that they might help one
with the Quest.”
He stirred several lumps of sugar into his Gurdyroot infusion and drank
some.
“I’m sorry,” said Harry. “I still don’t really understand.”
“To be polite, he took a sip from his cup too, and almost gagged: The stuff
was quite disgusting, as though someone had liquidized bogey-flavored Every
Flavor beans.
“Well, you see, believers seek the Deathly Hallows,” said Xenophilius, smack349
350 CHAPTER 21. THE TALE OF THE THREE BROTHERS
ing his lips in apparent appreciation of the Gurdyroot infusion.
“But what are the Deathly Hallows?” asked Hermione.
Xenophilius set aside his empty teacup.
“I assume that you are all familiar with the “Tale of the Three Brothers’?”
Harry said, “No,” but Ron and Hermione said, “Yes.” Xenophilius nodded
gravely.
“Well, well, Mr. Potter, the whole thing starts with ‘The Tale of the Three
Brothers’ . . . I have a copy somewhere. . . .”
He glanced vaguely around the room, at the piles of parchment and books,
but Hermione said, “I’ve got a copy, Mr. Lovegood, I’ve got it right here.”
And she pulled out The Tales of Beedle the Bard from the small, beaded bag.
“The original?” inquired Xenophilius sharply, and when she nodded, he
said, “Well then, why don’t you read it out loud? Much the best way to make
sure we all understand.”
“Er. . . all right,” said Hermione nervously. She opened the book, and Harry
saw that the symbol they were investigating headed one top of the page as she
gave a little cough, and began to read.
“‘There were once three brothers who were traveling along a lonely, winding
road at twilight—”’
“Midnight, our mum always told us,” said Ron, who had stretched out, arms
behind his head, to listen. Hermione shot him a look of annoyance.
“Sorry, I just think it’s a bit spookier if it’s midnight!” said Ron.
“Yeah, because we really need a bit more fear in our lives,” said Harry before
he could stop himself. Xenophilius did not seem to be paying much attention,
but was staring out of the window at the sky. “Go on, Hermione.”
“‘In time, the brothers reached a river too deep to wade through and too
dangerous to swim across. However, these brothers were learned in the magical
arts, and so they simply waved their wands and made a bridge appear across
the treacherous water. They were halfway across it when they found their path
blocked by a hooded figure.
“‘And Death spoke to them—”’
351
“Sorry,” interjected Harry, “but Death spoke to them?”
“It’s a fairy tale, Harry!”
“Right, sorry. Go on.”
“‘And Death spoke to them. He was angry that he had been cheated out of
three new victims, for travelers usually drowned in the river. But Death was
cunning. He pretended to congratulate the three brothers upon their magic, and
said that each had earned a prize for having been clever enough to evade him.
“‘So the oldest brother, who was a combative man, asked for a wand more
powerful than any in existence: a wand that must always win duels for its
owner, a wand worthy of a wizard who had conquered Death! So Death crossed
to an elder tree on the banks of the river, fashioned a wand from a branch that
hung there, and gave it to the older brother.
“‘Then the second brother, who was an arrogant man, decided that he wanted
to humiliate Death still further, and asked for the power to recall others from
Death. So Death picked up a stone from the riverbank and gave it to the second
brother, and told him that the stone would have the power to bring back the
dead.
“‘And then Death asked the third and youngest brother what he would like.
The youngest brother was the humblest and also the wisest of the brothers, and
he did not trust Death. So he asked for something that would enable him to
go forth from that place without being followed by Death. And Death, most
unwillingly, handed over his own Cloak of Invisibility.”’
“Death’s got an Invisibility Cloak?” Harry interrupted again.
“So he can sneak up on people,” said Ron. “Sometimes he gets bored of
running at them, flapping his arms and shrieking . . . sorry Hermione.”
“‘Then Death stood aside and allowed thee three brothers to continue on their
way, and they did so, talking with wonder of the adventure they ahd had, and
admiring Death’s gifts.
“‘In due course the brothers separated, each for his own destination.
“‘The first brother traveled on for a week or more, and reaching a distant
village, sought out a fellow wizard with whom he had a quarrel. Naturally, with
352 CHAPTER 21. THE TALE OF THE THREE BROTHERS
the Elder Wand as his weapon, he could not fail to win the duel that followed.
Leaving his enemy dead upon the floor, the oldest brother proceeded to an inn,
where he boasted loudly of the powerful wand he had snatched from Death
himself, and of how it made him invincible.
“‘That very night, another wizard crept upon the older brother as he lay winesodden, upon his bed. The thief took the wand and, for good measure, slit the
oldest brother’s throat.
“‘And so Death took the first brother for his own.
“‘Meanwhile, the second brother journeyed to his own home, where he lived
alone. Here he took out the stone that had the power to recall the dead, and he
turned it thrice i his hand. To his amazement and his delight, the figure of the
girl he had once hoped to marry, before her untimely death, appeared at once
before him.
“‘Yet she was sad and cold, separated from him as by a veil. Though she
had returned to the mortal world, she did not truly belong there and suffered.
Finally the second brother, driven mad with hopeless longing, killed himself so
as truly to join her.
“‘And so Death took the second brother for his own.
“‘But though Death searched for the third brother for many years, he was
never able to find him. It was only when he attained a great age that the
youngest brother finally took off the Cloak of Invisibility and gave it to his son.
And then he greeted Death as an old friend, and went with him gladly, and,
equals, they departed this life.”’
Hermione closed the book. It was a moment or two before Xenophilius
seemed to realize that she had stopped reading, then he withdrew his gaze
from the window and said, “Well, there you are.”
“Sorry?” said Hermione, sounding confused.
“Those are the Deathly Hallows,” said Xenophilius.
He picked up a quill from a packed table at his elbow, and pulled a torn
piece of parchment from between more books.
“The Elder Wand,” he said, and he drew a straight vertical line upon the
353
parchment. “The resurrection Stone,” he said, and he added a circle on top
of the line. “The Cloak of Invisibility,” he finished, enclosing both the line and
circle in a triangle, to make the symbol that so intrigued Hermione. “Together,”
he said, “the Deathly Hallows.”
“But there’s no mention of the words ‘Deathly Hallows‘ in the story,” said
Hermione.
“Well, of course not,” said Xenophilius, maddeningly smug. “That is a children’s tale, told to amuse rather than to instruct. Those of us who understand
these matters, however, recognize that the ancient story refers to three objects,
or Hallows, which, if united, will make the possessor master of Death.”
There was a short silence in which Xenophilius glanced out of the window.
Already the sun was low int he sky.
“Luna ought to have enough Plimpies soon,” he said quietly.
“When you say ‘mast of Death’—” said Ron.
“Master,” said Xenophilius, waving an airy hand. “Conqueror. Vanquisher.
Whichever term you prefer.”
“But then . . . do you mean . . . ” said Hermione slowly, and Harry could tell
that she was trying to keep any trace of skepticism out of her voice, “that you
believe these objects—these Hallows—actually exist?”
Xenophilius raised his eyebrows again.
“Well, of course.”
“But,” said Hermione, and Harry could hear her restraint starting to crack,
“Mr. Lovegood, how can you possibly believe—?”
“Luna has told me all about you, young lady,” said Xenophilius. “You are, I
gather, no unintelligent, but painfully limited. Narrow, Close-minded.”
“Perhaps you ought to try on the hat, Hermione,” said Ron, nodding toward
the ludicrous headdress. His voice shock with the strain of not laughing.
“Mr. Lovegood,” Hermione began again, “We all know that there are such
things as Invisibility Cloaks. They are rare, but they exist. But—”
“Ah, but the Third Hallows is true Cloak of Invisibility, Miss Granger! I
mean to say, it is not a traveling cloak imbued with a Disillusionment Charm,
354 CHAPTER 21. THE TALE OF THE THREE BROTHERS
or carrying a Bedazzling Hex or else woven from Demiguise hair, which will
hide one initially but fade with the years until it turns opaque. We are talking
about a cloak that really and truly renders the wearer completely invisible, and
endures eternally, giving constant and impenetrable concealment, no matter
what spells are cast at it. How many cloaks have you ever seen like that, Miss
Granger?”
Hermione opened her mouth to answer, then closed it again, looking more
confused than ever. She, Harry, and Ron glanced at one another, and Harry
knew that they were all thinking the same thing. It so happened that a cloak
exactly like the one Xenophilius had just described was in the room with them
at that very moment.
“Exactly,” said Xenophilius, as if he had defeated them all in reasoned argument. “None of you have ever seen such a thing. The possessor would be
immeasurably rich, would he not?”
He glanced out of the window again. The sky was now tinged with the
faintest trace of pink.
“All right,” said Hermione, disconcerted. “Say the cloak existed . . . what
about the stone, Mr. Lovegood? The thing you call the Resurrection Stone?”
“What of it?”
“Well, how can that be real?”
“Prove that it is not,” said Xenophilius.
Hermione looked outraged.
“But that’s—I’m sorry, but that’s completely ridiculous! How can I possibly
prove it doesn’t exist? Do you expect me to get hold of—of all the pebbles in the
world and test them? I mean, you could claim that anything’s real if the only
basis for believing in it is that nobody’s proved it doesn’t exist!”
“Yes, you could,” said Xenophilius. “I am glad to see that you are opening
your mind a little.”
“So the Elder Wand,” said Harry quickly, before Hermione could retort, “you
think that exists too?”
“Oh, well, in that case there is endless evidence,” said Xenophilius. “The
355
Elder Wand is the Hallo that s most easily traced, because of the way in which
it passes from hand to hand.”
“Which is what?” asked Harry.
“Which is that the possessor of the wand must capture it from its previous
owner, if he is to be truly a master of it,” said Xenophilius. “Surely you have
heard of the way the wad came to Egbert the Egregious, after his slaughter of
Emeric the Evil? Of how Godelot died in his own cellar after his son, Hereward,
took the wand from him? Of the dreadful Loxias, who took the wand from
Barnabas Deverill, whom he had killed? The bloody trail of the Elder Wand is
splattered across the pages of Wizarding history.”
Harry glanced at Hermione. She was frowning at Xenophilius, but she did
not contradict him.
“So where do you think the Elder Wand is now?” asked Ron.
“Alas, who knows?” said Xenophilius, as he gazed out of the window. “Who
knows where the Elder Wand lies hidden? The trail goes cold with Arcus and
Livius. Who can say which of them really defeated Loxias, and which took the
wand? And who can say who may have defeated them? History, alas, does not
tell us.”
There was a pause. Finally, Hermione asked stiffly, “Mr. Lovegood, does the
Peverell family have anything to do with the Deathly Hallows?”
Xenophilius looked taken aback as something shifted in Harry’s memory,
but he could not locate it. Peverell . . . he had heard that name before. . . .
“But have you been misleading me, young woman!” said Xenophilius, now
sitting up much straighter in his chair and goggling at Hermione. “I thought
you were new to the Hallows Quest! Many of us Questers believe that the
Peverells have everything—everything!—to do with the Hallows!”
“@Who are the Peverellls?” asked Ron.
“That was the name on the grave with the mark on it, in Godric’s Hollow,“
said Hermione, still watching Xenophilius. “Ignorus Peverell.”
“Exactly!” said Xenophilius, his forefinger raised pedantically. “The sign of
the Deathly Hallows on Ignotus’s grave is conclusive proof!”
356 CHAPTER 21. THE TALE OF THE THREE BROTHERS
“Of what?” asked Ron.
“Why, that the three brothers in the story were actually the three Peverell
brothers, Antioch, Cadmus, and Ignotus! That they were the original owners
of the Hallows!”
With another glance at the window he got to his feet, picked up the tray,
and headed for the spiral staircase.
“You will stay for dinner?” he called, as he vanished downstairs again. “Everybody always requests our recipe for Freshwater Plimpy soup.”
“Probably to show the Poisoning Department at St. Mungo’s,” said Ron
under his breath.
Harry waited until they could hear Xenophilius moving about in the kitchen
downstairs before speaking.
“What do you think?” he asked Hermione.
“Oh, Harry,” she said wearily, “it’s a pile of utter rubbish. This can’t be the
what the sign really means. This must be his weird take on it. What a waste
of time.”
“I s’pose this is the man who brought us Crumple-Horned Snorkacks,” said
Ron.
“You don’t believe it either?” Harry asked him.
“Nah, that story’s just one of those things you tell kids to teach them lessons,
isn’t it? ‘Don’t go looking for trouble, don’t pick up fights, don’t go messing
around with stuff that’s best left alone! Just keep your head down, mind your
own business, and you’ll be okay.’ Come to think of it,” Ron added, “maybe that
story’s why elder wands are supposed to be unlucky.”
“What are you talking about?”
“One of those superstitions, isn’t it? ‘May-born witches will marry Muggles.’
’Jinx by twilight, undone by midnight.’ ‘Wand of elder, never prosper.’ You
must’ve heard them. My mum’s full of them.”
“Harry and I were raised by Muggles,” Hermione reminded him. “We were
taught different superstitions.” She sighed deeply as a rather pungent smell
drifted up from the kitchen. The one good thing about her exasperation with
357
Xenophilius was that it seemed to make her forget that she was annoyed with
Ron. “I think you’re right,” she told him. “It’s just a morality tale, it’s obvious
which gift is best, which one you’d choose—”
The three of them spoke at the same time; Hermione said, “the Cloak,” Ron
said, “the wand,” and Harry said, “the stone.”
They looked at each other, half surprised, half amused.
“You’re supposed to say the Cloak,” Ron told Hermione, “but you wouldn’t
need to be invisible if you had the wand. An unbeatable wand, Hermione, come
on!”
“We’ve already got an Invisibility Cloak,” said Harry.
“And it’s helped us rather a lot, in case you hadn’t noticed!” said Hermione.
“Whereas the wand would be bound to attract trouble—”
“Only if you shouted about it,” argued Ron. “Only if you were prat enough
to go dancing around, waving it over your head, and singing, ‘I’ve got an unbeatable wand, come and have a go if you think you’re good enough.’ As you as
you kept your trap shut—”
“Yes, but could you keep your trap shut?” said Hermione, looking skeptical.
“You know, the only true thing he said to us was that there have been stories
about extra-powerful wands for hundreds of years.”
“There have?” asked Harry.
Hermione looked exasperated: The expression was so endearingly familiar
that Harry and Ron grinned at each other.
“The Deathstick, the Wand of Destiny, they crop up under different names
through the centuries, usually in the possession of some Dark wizard who’s
boasting about them. Professor Binns mentioned some of them, but—oh, it’s
all nonsense. Wands are only as powerful as the wizards who use them. Some
wizards just like to boast that theirs are bigger and better than other people’s.”
“But how do you know,” said Harry, “that those wands—the Deathstick and
the Wand of Destiny—aren’t the same wand, surfacing over the centuries under
different names?”
“What, and they’re all really the Elder Wand, made by Death?” said Ron.
358 CHAPTER 21. THE TALE OF THE THREE BROTHERS
Harry laughed: The strange idea that had occurred to him was, after all,
ridiculous. His wand, he reminded himself, had been of holly, not elder, and it
had been made by Ollivander, whatever it had done that night Voldemort had
pursued him across the skies. And if it had been unbeatable, how could it have
been broken?
“So why would you take the stone?” Ron asked him.
“Well, if you could bring people back, we could have Sirius. . . Mad-Eye. . . Dumbledore. . . my
parents. . . .”
“But according to Beedle the Bard, they wouldn’t want to come back, would
they?” said Harry, thinking about the tale they had just heard. “I don’t suppose
there have been loads of other stories about a stone that can raise the dead,
have there?” he asked Hermione.
“No,” she replied sadly. “I don’t think anyone except Mr. Lovegood could kit
themselves that’s possible. Beedle probably took the idea from the Sorceror’s
Stone; you know, instead of a stone to make you immortal, a stone to reverse
death.”
The smell from the kitchen was getting stronger: It was something like
burning underpants. Harry wondered whether it would be possible to eat
enough of whatever Xenophilius was cooking to spare his feelings.
“What about the Cloak, though?” said Ron slowly. “Don’t you realize he’s
right? I’ve got so used to Harry’s Cloak and how good it is, I never stopped to
think. I’ve never heard of one like Harry’s. It’s infallible. We’ve never been
spotted under it—”
“Of course not—we’re invisible when we’re under it, Ron!”
“But all the stuff he said about the other cloaks, and they’re not exactly ten
a Knut, you know, is true! It’s never occurred to me before, but I’ve heard stuff
about charms wearing off cloaks when they get old, or them being ripped apart
by spells so they’ve got holes in them. Harry’s was owned by his dad, so it’s not
exactly new, is it, but it’s just. . . perfect!”
“Yes, all right, but Ron, the stone. . . ”
As they argued in whispered, Harry moved around the room, only half lis-
359
tening. Reaching the spiral stair, he raised his eyes absently to the next level
and was distracted at once. His own face was looking back at him from the
ceiling of the room above.
After a moment’s bewilderment, he realized that it was not a mirror, but a
painting. Curious, he began to climb the stairs.
“Harry, what are you doing? I don’t think you should look around when he’s
not here!”
But Harry had already reached the next level.
Luna had decorated her bedroom ceiling with five beautifully painted faces:
Harry, Ron, Hermione, Ginny, and Neville. They were not moving as the portraits at Hogwarts moved, but there was a certain magic about them all the
same: Harry thought they breathed. What appeared to be fine golden chains
wove around the pictures, linking them together, but after examining them for
a minute or so, Harry realized that the chains were actually one word, repeated
a thousand times in golden ink: friends . . . friends . . . friends. . .
Harry felt a great rush of affection for Luna. He looked around the room.
There was a large photograph beside the bed, of a young Luna and a woman
who looked very like her. They were hugging. Luna looked rather bettergroomed in this picture than Harry had ever seen her in life. The picture was
dusty. This struck Harry as slightly odd. He stared around.
Something was wrong. The pale blue carpet was also thick with dust. There
were no clothes in the wardrobe, whose doors stood ajar. The bed had a cold,
unfriendly look, as though it had not been slept in for weeks. A single cobweb
stretched over the nearest window, across a bloodred sky.
“What’s wrong?” Hermione asked as Harry descended the staircase, but
before he could respond, Xenophilius reached the top of the stairs from the
kitchen, now holding a tray laden with bowls.
“Mr. Lovegood,” said Harry. “Where’s Luna?”
“Excuse me?”
“Where’s Luna?”
Xenophilius halted on the top step.
360 CHAPTER 21. THE TALE OF THE THREE BROTHERS
“I—I’ve already told you. She is down at Bortons Bridge, fishing for Plimpies.”
“So why have you only laid that tray for four?”
Xenophilius tried to speak, but no sound came out. The only noise was the
continued chugging of the printing press, and a slight rattle from the tray as
Xenophilius’s hands shook.
“I don’t think Luna’s been here for weeks,” said Harry. “Her clothes are
gone, her bed hasn’t been slept in. Where is she? And why do you keep looking
out of the window?”
Xenophilius dropped the tray: The bowls bounced and smashed. Harry, Ron,
and Hermione drew their wands. Xenophilius frowned, his hand about to enter
his pocket. At that moment the printing press gave a huge bang and numerous
Quibblers came streaming across the floor from underneath the tablecloth, the
press fell silent at last.
Hermione stooped down and picked up one of the magazines, her wand still
pointing at Mr. Lovegood.
“Harry, look at this.”
He strode to her as quickly as he could through all the clutter. The front of
The Quibbler carried his own picture, emblazoned with the words UNDESIRABLE NUMBER ONE and captioned with the reward money.
“The Quibbler’s going for a new angle, then?” Harry asked coldly, his mind
working very fast. “Is that what you were doing when you went into the garden,
Mr. Lovegood? Sending an owl to the Ministry?”
Xenophilius licked his lips.
“They took my Luna,” he whispered. “Because of what I’ve been writing.
They took my Luna and I don’t know where she is, what they’ve done to her.
But they might give her back to me if I—if I—”
“Hand over Harry?” Hermione finished for him.
“No deal,” said Ron flatly. “Get out of the way, we’re leaving.”
Xenophilius looked ghastly, a century old, his laps drawn back into a dreadful leer.
361
“They will be here at any moment. I must save Luna. I cannot lose Luna.
You must not leave.”
He spread his arms in front of the staircase, and Harry had a sudden vision
of his mother doing the same thing in front of his crib.
“Don’t make us hurt you,” Harry said. “Get out of the way, Mr. Lovegood.”
“HARRY!” Hermione screamed.
Figures on broomsticks were flying past the windows. As the three of them
looked away from him, Xenophilius drew his wand. Harry realized their mistake just in time: He launched himself sideways, shoving Ron and Hermione
out of harm’s way as Xenophilius’s Stunning Spell soared across the room and
hit the Erumpent horn.
There was a colossal explosion. The sound of it seemed to blow the room
apart: Fragments of wood and paper and rubble flew to all directions, along
with an impenetrable cloud of thick white dust. Harry flew through the door,
then crashed to the floor, unable to see as debris rained upon him, his arms
above his head. He heard Hermione’s scream, Ron’s yell, and a series of sickening metallic thuds, which told him that Xenophilius had been blasted off his
feet and fallen backward down the spiral stairs.
Half burried in rubble, Harry tried to raise himself: He could barely breathe
or see for dust. Half o the ceiling had fallen in, and the end of Luna’s bed was
hanging through the hole. The bust of Rowena Ravenclaw lay beside him with
half its face missing, fragments of torn parchment were floating through the
air, and most of the printing press lay on its side, blocking the top of the staircase to the kitchen. Then another whit shape moved close by, and Hermione,
coated in dust like a second statue, pressed her finger to her lips.
the door downstairs crashed open.
“Didn’t I tell you there was no need to hurry, Travers? said a rough voice.
“Didn’t I tell you this nutter was just raving as usual?”
There was a bang and a scream of pain from Xenophilius.
“No. . . no . . . upstairs. . . Potter!”
“I told you last week, Lovegood, we weren’t coming back for anything less
362 CHAPTER 21. THE TALE OF THE THREE BROTHERS
than some solid information! Remember last week? When you wanted to swap
your daughter for that stupid bleeding headdress? And the week before”—
another bang, another squeal—“when you thought we’d give her back if you
offered us proof there are Crumple”—bang—“Headed”—bang—“Snorkacks?”
“No—no—I beg you!” sobbed Xenophilius. “It really is Potter! Really!”
“And now it turns out you only called us here to try and blow us up!” roared
the Death Eater, and there are a volley of bangs interspersed with squeals of
agony from Xenophilius.
“This place looks like it’s about to fall in, Selwyn,” said a cool second voice,
echoing up the mangled staircase. “The stairs are completely blocked. Could
trying clearing it? Might bring the place down.”
“You lying piece of filth,” shouted the wizard named Selwyn. “you’ve never
seen Potter in your life, have you? thought you’d lure us here to kill us, did
you? And you think you’ll get your girl back like this?”
“I swear. . . I swear. . . Potter’s upstairs!”
“Homenum revelio,” said the voice at the foot of the stairs.
Harry heard Hermione gasp, and he had the odd sensation that something
was swooping low over him, immersing his body in its shadow.
“It’s Potter, I tell you ,it’s Potter!” sobbed Xenophilius. “Please. . . please. . . give
me Luna, just let me have Luna. . . .”
“You can have your little girl, Lovegood,” said Selwyn, “if you get up those
stairs and bring me down Harry Potter. but if this is a plot, if it’s a trick, if
you’ve got an accomplice waiting up there to ambush us, we’ll see if we can
spare a bit of your daughter for you to bury.”
Xenophilius gave a wail of fear and despair. There were scurryings and
scrapings: Xenophilius was trying to get though the debris on the stairs.
“Come on,” Harry whispered, “we’ve got to get out of here.”
He stated to dig himself out under cover of all the noise Xenophilius was
making on the staircase. Ron was buried deepest: Harry and Hermione climbed,
as quietly as they could, over all the wreckage to where he lay, trying to prise
a heavy chest of drawers off his legs. While Xenophilius’s banging and scrap-
363
ing drew nearer and nearer, Hermione managed to free Ron with the use of a
Hover Charm.
“All right,” breathed Hermione, as the broken printing press blocking the
top of the stairs began to tremble; Xenophilius was feet away from them. She
was still white with dust. “Do you trust me, Harry?”
Harry nodded.
“Okay then,” Hermione whispered, “give me the Invisibility Cloak. Ron,
you’re going to put it on.”
“Me? But Harry—”
“Please, Ron! Harry, hold on tight to my hand, Ron, grab my shoulder.”
Harry held out his left hand. Ron vanished beneath the Cloak. The printing
press blocking the stairs was vibrating: Xenophilius was trying to shift it using
a Hover Charm. Harry did not know what Hermione was waiting for.
“Hold tight,” she whispered. “Hold tight. . . any second. . . ”
Xenophilius’s paper-white face appeared over the top of the sideboard.
“Obliviate!” cried Hermione, pointing her wand first into his face, and then
at the floor beneath them. “Deprimo!”
She had blasted a hole in the sitting room floor. They fell like boulders,
Harry still holding onto her hand for dear life; there was a scream from below,
and he glimpsed two men trying to get out of the way as vast quantities of
rubble and broken furniture rained all around them from the shattered ceiling.
Hermione twisted in midair and the thundering of the collapsing house rang
in Harry’s ears as she dragged him once more into darkness.
364 CHAPTER 21. THE TALE OF THE THREE BROTHERS
Chapter 22
The Deathly Hallows
H
arry fell, panting, onto grass and scrambled up at once. They
seemed to have landed in the corner of a field at dusk; Hermione
was already running in a circle around them, waving her wand.
“Protego Totalum. . . Salvio Hexia. . .”
“That treacherous old bleeder.” Ron panted, emerging from beneath the
Invisibility Cloak and throwing it to Harry. “Hermione you’re a genius, a total
genius. I can’t believe we got out of that.”
“Cave Inimicum. . . Didn’t I say it was an Erumpent horn, didn’t I tell him?
And now his house has been blown apart!”
“Serves him right,” said Ron, examining his torn jeans and the cuts to his
legs, “What’d you reckon they’ll do to him?”
“Oh I hope they don’t kill him!” groaned Hermione, “That’s why I wanted
the Death Eaters to get a glimpse of Harry before we left, so they knew Xenophilius
hadn’t been lying!”
“Why hide me though?” asked Ron.
“You’re supposed to be in bed with spattergroit, Ron! They’ve kidnapped
Luna because her father supported Harry! What would happen to your family
if they knew you’re with him?”
“But what about your mum and dad?”
365
366 CHAPTER 22. THE DEATHLY HALLOWS
“They’re in Australia,” said Hermione, “They should be all right. They don’t
know anything.”
“You’re a genius,” Ron repeated, looking awed.
Yeah, you are, Hermione,” agreed Harry fervently. “I don’t know what we’d
do without you.”
She beamed, but became solemn at once.
“What about Luna?”
“Well, if they’re telling the truth and she’s still Alive—“ began Ron.
“Don’t say that, don’t say it!” squealed Hermione. “She must be alive, she
must!”
“Then she’ll be in Azkaban, I expect,” said Ron. “Whether she survives the
place, though. . . Loads don’t. . . ”
“She will,” said Harry. He could not bear to contemplate the alternative.
“She’s tough, Luna, much tougher than you’d think. She’s probably teaching
all the inmates about Wrackspurts and Nargles.”
“I hope you’re right,” said Hermione. She passed a hand over her eyes. “I’d
feel so sorry for Xenophilius if—“
“—if he hadn’t just tried to sell us to the Death Eaters, yeah,” said Ron.
They put up the tent and retreated inside it, where Ron made them tea. After their narrow escape, the chilly, musty old place felt like home: safe, familiar,
and friendly.
“Oh, why did we go there?” groaned Hermione after a few minutes’ silence.
“Harry, you were right, it was Godric’s Hollow all over again, a complete waste
of time! The Deathly Hallows. . . such rubbish. . . although actually,” a sudden
thought seemed to have struck her, “he might have made it all up, mightn’t he?
He probably doesn’t believe in the Deathly Hallows at all, he just wanted to
keep us talking until the Death Eaters arrived!”
“I don’t think so,” said Ron. “It’s a damn sight harder making stuff up when
you’re under stress than you’d think. I found that out when the Snatchers
caught me. It was much easier pretending to be Stan, because I knew a bit
about him, than inventing a whole new person. Old Lovegood was under loads
367
of pressure, trying to make sure we stayed put. I reckon he told us the truth,
or what he thinks is the truth, just to keep us talking.”
“Well, I don’t suppose it matters,” sighed Hermione. “Even if he was being
honest, I never heard such a lot of nonsense in all my life.”
“Hang on, though,” said Ron. “The Chamber of Secrets was supposed to be
a myth, wasn’t it?”
“But the Deathly Hallows can’t exist, Ron!”
“You keep saying that, but one of them can,” said Ron. “Harry’s Invisibility
Cloak—“
“The Tale of the Three Brothers’ is a story,” said Hermione firmly. “A story
about how humans are frightened of death. If surviving was as simple as hiding
under the Invisibility Cloak, we’d have everything we need already!”
“I don’t know. We could do with an unbeatable wand,” said Harry, turning
the blackthorn wand he so disliked over in his fingers.
“There’s no such thing, Harry!”
“You said there have been loads of wands—the Deathstick and whatever
they were called—“
“All right, even if you want to kid yourself the Elder Wand’s real, what
about the Resurrection Stone?” Her fingers sketched quotation marks around
the name, and her tone dripped sarcasm. “No magic can raise the dead, and
that’s that!”
“When my wand connected with You-Know-Who’s, it made my mum and
dad appear. . . and Cedric. . . ”
“But they weren’t really back from the dead, were they?” said Hermione.
“Those kind of—of pale imitations aren’t the same as truly bringing someone
back to life.”
“But she, the girl in the tale, didn’t really come back, did she? The story
says that once people are dead, they belong with the dead. But the second
brother still got to see her and talk to her, didn’t he? He even lived with her for
a while. . . ”
He saw concern and something less easily definable in Hermione’s expres-
368 CHAPTER 22. THE DEATHLY HALLOWS
sion. Then, as she glanced at Ron, Harry realized that it was fear: He had
scared her with his talk of living with dead people.
“So that Peverell bloke who’s buried in Godric’s Hollow,” he said hastily,
trying to sound robustly sane, “you don’t know anything about him, then?”
“No,” she replied, looking relieved at the change of subject. “I looked him up
after I saw the mark on his grave; if he’d been anyone famous or done anything
important, I’m sure he’d be in one of our books. The only place I’ve managed
to find the name ’Peverell’ is Nature’s Nobility: A Wizarding Genealogy. I borrowed it from Kreacher,” she explained as Ron raised his eyebrows. “It lists
the pure-blood families that are now extinct in the male line. Apparently the
Peverells were one of the earliest families to vanish.”
“Extinct in the male line?” repeated Ron.
“It means the name died out,” said Hermione, “centuries ago, in the case of
the Peverells. They could still have descendants, though, they’d just be called
something different.”
And then it came to Harry in one shining piece, the memory that had stirred
at the sound of the name “Peverell”: a filthy old man brandishing an ugly ring
in the face of a Ministry official, and he cried aloud, “Marvolo Gaunt!”
“Sorry said Ron and Hermione together.
“Marvolo Gaunt! You-Know-Who’s grandfather! In the Pensieve! With
Dumbledore! Marvolo Gaunt said he was descended from the Peverells!”
Ron and Hermione looked bewildered.
“The ring, the ring that became the Horcrux, Marvolo Gaunt said it had the
Peverell coat of arms on it! I saw him waving it in the bloke from the Ministry’s
face, he nearly shoved it up his nose!”
“The Peverell coat of arms?” said Hermione sharply. “Could you see what it
looked like?”
“Not really,” said Harry, trying to remember. “There was nothing fancy on
there, as far as I could see; maybe a few scratches. I only ever saw it really
close up after it had been cracked open.”
Harry saw Hermione’s comprehension in the sudden widening of her eyes.
369
Ron was looking from one to the other, astonished.
“Blimey. . . You reckon it was this sign again? The sign of the Hallows?
“Why not said Harry excitedly, “Marvolo Gaunt was an ignorant old git who
lived like a pig, all he cared about was his ancestry. If that ring had been
passed down through the centuries, he might not have known what it really
was. There were no books in that house, and trust me, he wasn’t the type to
read fairy tales to his kids. He’d have loved to think the scratches on the stone
were a coat of arms, because as far as he was concerned, having pure blood
made you practically royal.”
“Yes. . . and that’s all very interesting,” said Hermione cautiously, “but Harry,
if you’re thinking what I think you’re think—“
“Well, why not? Why not? said Harry, abandoning caution. “It was a stone,
wasn’t it?” He looked at Ron for support. “What if it was the Resurrection
Stone?”
Ron’s mouth fell open.
“Blimey—but would it still work if Dumbledore broke—?”
“Work? Work? Ron, it never worked! There’s no such thing as a Resurrection
Stone!”
Hermione leapt to her feet, looking exasperated and angry. Harry you’re
trying to fit everything into the Hallows story—“
“Fit everything in?” he repeated. “Hermione, it fits of its own accord! I
know the sign of the Deathly Hallows was on that stone! Gaunt said he was
descended from the Peverells!”
“A minute ago you told us you never saw the mark on the stone properly!”
“Where’d you reckon the ring is now?” Ron asked Harry. “What did Dumbledore do with it after he broke it open?”
“But Harry’s imagination was racing ahead, far beyond Ron and Hermione’s. . .
Three objects, or Hallows, which, if united, will make the possessor master
of Death. . . Master. . . Conqueror. . . Vanquisher. . . The last enemy that shall be
destroyed is death. . . .
And he saw himself, possessor of the Hallows, facing Voldemort, whose Hor-
370 CHAPTER 22. THE DEATHLY HALLOWS
cruxes were no match. . . Neither can live while the other survives. . . Was this the
answer? Hallows versus Horcruxes? Was there a way after all, to ensure that
he was the one who triumphed? If he were the master of the Deathly Hallows,
would he be safe?
“Harry?”
But he scarcely heard Hermione: He had pulled out his Invisibility Cloak
and was running it through his fingers, the cloth supple as water, light as
air. He had never seen anything to equal it in his nearly seven years in the
Wizarding world. The Cloak was exactly what Xenophilius had described: A
cloak that really and truly renders the wearer completely invisible, and endures
eternally, giving constant and impenetrable concealment, no matter what spells
are cast at it. . .
And then, with a gasp, he remembered—
“Dumbledore had my Cloak the night my parents died!”
His voice shook and he could feel the color in his face, but he did not care.
“My mum told Sirius that Dumbledore borrowed the Cloak! This is why!
He wanted to examine it, because he thought it was the third Hallow! Ignotus
Peverell is buried in Godric’s Hollow. . . ” Harry was walking blindly around the
tent, feeling as though great new vistas of truth were opening all around him.
“He’s my ancestor. I’m descended from the third brother! It all makes sense!”
“He felt armed in certainty, in his belief in the Hallows, as if the mere idea
of possessing them was giving him protection, and he felt joyous as he turned
back to the other two.
“Harry,” said Hermione again, but he was busy undoing the pouch around
his neck, his fingers shaking hard.
“Read it,” he told her, pushing his mother’s letter into her hand. “Read it!
Dumbledore had the Cloak, Hermione! Why else would he want it? He didn’t
need a Cloak, he could perform a Disillusionment Charm so powerful that he
made himself completely invisible without one!”
Something fell to the floor and rolled, glittering, under a chair: He had
dislodged the Snitch when he pulled out the letter. He stooped to pick it up,
371
and then the newly tapped spring of fabulous discoveries threw him another
gift, and shock and wonder erupted inside him so that he shouted out.
“IT’S IN HERE! He left me the ring—it’s in the Snitch!”
“You—you reckon?”
He could not understand why Ron looked taken aback. It was so obvious,
so clear to Harry. Everything fit, everything. . . His Cloak was the third Hallow,
and when he discovered how to open the Snitch he would have the second, and
then all he needed to do was find the first Hallow, the Elder Wand, and then—
But it was as though a curtain fell on a lit stage: All his excitement, all his
hope and happiness were extinguished at a stroke, and he stood alone in the
darkness, and the glorious spell was broken.
“That’s what he’s after.”
The change in his voice made Ron and Hermione look even more scared.
“You-Know-Who’s after the Elder Wand.”
He turned his back on their strained, incredulous faces. He knew it was
the truth. It all made sense, Voldemort was not seeking a new wand; he was
seeking an old wand, a very old wand indeed. Harry walked to the entrance of
the tent, forgetting about Ron and Hermione as he looked out into the night,
thinking. . .
Voldemort had been raised in a Muggle orphanage. Nobody could have told
him The Tales of Beedle the Bard when he was a child, any more than Harry
had heard them. Hardly any wizards believed in the Deathly Hallows. Was it
likely that Voldemort knew about them?
Harry gazed into the darkness. . . . If Voldemort had known about the Deathly
Hallows, surely he would have sought them, done anything to possess them:
three objects that made the possessor master of Death? If he had known about
the Deathly Hallows, he might not have needed Horcruxes in the first place.
Didn’t the simple fact that he had taken a Hallow, and turned it into a Horcrux, demonstrate that he did not know this last great Wizarding secret?
Which meant that Voldemort sought the Elder Wand without realizing its
full power, without understanding that it was one of three. . . . for the wand
372 CHAPTER 22. THE DEATHLY HALLOWS
was the Hallow that could not be hidden, whose existence was best known. . . .
The bloody trail of the Elder Wand is splattered across the pages of Wizarding
history. . .
Harry watched the cloudy sky, curves of smoke-gray and silver sliding over
the face of the white moon. He felt lightheaded with amazement at his discoveries.
He turned back into the tent. It was a shock to see Ron and Hermione
standing exactly where he had left them, Hermione still holding Lily’s letter,
Ron at her side looking slightly anxious. Didn’t they realize how far they had
traveled in the last few minutes?
“This is it?” Harry said, trying to bring them inside the glow of his own
astonished certainty, “This explains everything. The Deathly Hallows are real
and I’ve got one—maybe two—“
He held up the Snitch.
“—and You-Know-Who’s chasing the third, but he doesn’t realize. . . he just
thinks it’s a powerful wand—“
“Harry,” said Hermione, moving across to him and handing him back Lily’s
letter, “I’m sorry, but I think you’ve got this wrong, all wrong.”
“But don’t you see? It all fits—“
“Not, it doesn’t,” she said. “It doesn’t. Harry, you’re just getting carried
away. Please,” she said as she started to speak, “please just answer me this: If
the Deathly Hallows really existed, and Dumbledore knew about them, knew
that the person who possessed all of them would be master of Death—Harry,
why wouldn’t he have told you? Why?”
He had his answer ready.
“But you said it, Hermione! You’ve got to find out about them for yourself!
It’s a Quest!”
“But I only said that to try and persuade you to come to the Lovegoods’!”
cried Hermione in exasperation. “I didn’t really believe it!”
Harry took no notice.
“Dumbledore usually let me find out stuff for myself. He let me try my
373
strength, take risks. This feels like the kind of thing he’d do.”
“Harry, this isn’t a game, this isn’t practice! This is the real thing, and Dumbledore left you very clear instructions: Find and destroy the Horcruxes! That
symbol doesn’t mean anything, forget the Deathly Hallows, we can’t afford to
get sidetracked—“
Harry was barely listening to her. He was turning the Snitch over and over
in his hands, half expecting it to break open, to reveal the Resurrection Stone,
to prove to Hermione that he was right, that the Deathly Hallows were real.
She appealed to Ron.
“You don’t believe in this, do you?”
Harry looked up, Ron hesitated.
“I dunno. . . I mean. . . bits of it sort of fit together,” said Ron awkwardly, “But
when you look at the whole thing. . . ” He took a deep breath. “I think we’re
supposed to get rid of Horcruxes, Harry. That’s what Dumbledore told us to do.
Maybe. . . maybe we should forget about this Hallows business.”
“Thank you, Ron,” said Hermione. “I’ll take first watch.”
And she strode past Harry and sat down in the tent entrance bringing the
action to a fierce full stop.
But Harry hardly slept that night. The idea of the Deathly Hallows had
taken possession of him, and he could not rest while agitating thoughts whirled
through his mind: the wand, the stone, and the Cloak, if he could just possess
them all. . . .
I open at the close. . . . But what was the close? Why couldn’t he have the
stone now? If only he had the stone, he could ask Dumbledore these questions
in person. . . and Harry murmured words to the Snitch in the darkness, trying
everything, even Parseltongue, but the golden ball would not open. . . .
And the wand, the Elder Wand, where was that hidden? Where was Voldemort searching now? Harry wished his scar would burn and show him Voldemort’s thoughts, because for the first time ever, he and Voldemort were united
in wanting the very same thing. . . Hermione would not like that idea, of course. . . .
But then, she did not believe. . . .Xenophilius had been right, in a way. . .Limited,
374 CHAPTER 22. THE DEATHLY HALLOWS
Narrow, Close-minded. The truth was that she was scared of the idea of the
Deathly Hallows, especially of the Resurrection Stone. . . and Harry pressed his
mouth again to the Snitch, kissing it, nearly swallowing it, but the cold medal
did not yield. . . .
It was nearly dawn when he remembered Luna, alone in a cell in Azkaban, surrounded by dementors, and he suddenly felt ashamed of himself. He
had forgotten all about her in his feverish contemplation of the Hallows. If
only they could rescue her, but dementors in those numbers would be virtually unassailable. Now he came to think about it, he had not tried casting a
Patronus with the blackthorn wand. . . . He must try that in the morning. . .
If only there was a way of getting a better wand. . .
And desire for the Elder Wand, the Deathstick, unbeatable, invincible, swallowed him once more. . . .
They packed up the tent next morning and moved on through a dreary
shower of rain. The downpour pursued them to the coast, where they pitched
the tent that night, and persisted through the whole week, through sodden
landscapes that Harry found bleak and depressing. He could think only of the
Deathly Hallows. It was as though a flame had been lit inside him that nothing, not Hermione’s flat disbelief nor Ron’s persistent doubts, could extinguish.
And yet the fiercer the longing for the Hallows burned inside him, the less joyful it made him. He blamed Ron and Hermione: Their determined indifference
was as bad as the relentless rain for dampening his spirits, but neither could
erode his certainty, which remained absolute. Harry’s belief in and longing for
the Hallows consumed him so much that he felt isolated from the other two
and their obsession with the Horcruxes.
“Obsession?” said Hermione in a low fierce voice, when Harry was careless
enough to use the word one evening, after Hermione had told him off for his
lack of interest in locating more Horcruxes. “We’re not the one with an obsession, Harry! We’re the ones trying to do what Dumbledore wanted us to do!”
But he was impervious to the veiled criticism. Dumbledore had left the
sign of the Hallows for Hermione to decipher, and he had also, Harry remained
375
convinced of it, left the Resurrection Stone hidden in the golden Snitch. Neither can live while the other survives. . . master of Death. . . Why didn’t Ron and
Hermione understand?
“‘The last enemy shall be destroyed is death,”’ Harry quoted calmly.
“I thought it was You-Know-Who we were supposed to be fighting?” Hermione
retorted, and Harry gave up on her.
Even the mystery of the silver doe, which the other two insisted on discussing, seemed less important to Harry now, a vaguely interesting sideshow.
The only other thing that mattered to him was that his scar had begun to
prickle again, although he did all he could to hide this fact from the other
two. He sought solitude whenever it happened, but was disappointed by what
he saw. The visions he and Voldemort were sharing had changed in quality;
they had become blurred, shifting as though they were moving in and out of
focus. Harry was just able to make out the indistinct features of an object that
looked like a skull, and something like a mountain that was more shadow than
substance. Used to images sharp as reality, Harry was disconcerted by the
change. He was worried that the connection between himself and Voldemort
had been damaged, a connection that he both feared and, whatever he had told
Hermione, prized. Somehow Harry connected these unsatisfying, vague images with the destruction of his wand, as if it was the blackthorn wand’s fault
that he could no longer see into Voldemort’s mind as well as before.
As the weeks crept on, Harry could not help but notice, even through his
new self-absorption, that Ron seemed to be taking charge. Perhaps because he
was determined to make up for having walked out on them, perhaps because
Harry’s descent into listlessness galvanized his dormant leadership qualities,
Ron was the one now encouraging and exhorting the other two into action.
“Three Horcruxes left,” he kept saying. “We need a plan of action, come on!
Where haven’t we looked? Let’s go through it again. The orphanage. . . ”
Diagon Alley, Hogwarts, the Riddle House, Borgin and Burkes, Albania,
every place that they knew Tom Riddle had ever lived or worked, visited or
murdered, Ron and Hermione raked over them again, Harry joining in only to
376 CHAPTER 22. THE DEATHLY HALLOWS
stop Hermione pestering him. He would have been happy to sit alone in silence,
trying to read Voldemort’s thoughts, to find out more about the Elder Wand,
but Ron insisted on journeying to ever more unlikely places simply, Harry was
aware, to keep them moving.
“You never know,” was Ron’s constant refrain. “Upper Flagley is a Wizarding village, he might’ve wanted to live there. Let’s go and have a poke around.”
These frequent forays into Wizarding territory brought them within occasional sight of Snatchers.
“Some of them are supposed to be as bad as Death Eaters,” said Ron. “The
lot that got me were a bit pathetic, but Bill recons some of them are really
dangerous. They said on Potterwatch—“
“On what?” said Harry.
“Potterwatch, didn’t I tell you that’s what it was called? The program I keep
trying to get on the radio, the only one that tells the truth about what’s going
on! Nearly all of the programs are following You-Know-Who’s line, all except
Potterwatch, I really want you to hear it, but it’s tricky tuning in. . . ”
Ron spent evening after evening using his wand to beat out various rhythms
on top of the wireless while the dials whirled. Occasionally they would catch
snatches of advice on how to treat dragonpox, and once a few bars of “A Cauldron Full of Hot, Strong Love.” While he taped, Ron continued to try to hit on
the correct password, muttering strings of random words under his breath.
“They’re normally something to do with the Order,” he told them. “Bill had
a real knack for guessing them. I’m bound to get one in the end. . . ”
“But not until March did luck favor Ron at last. Harry was sitting in the
tent entrance, on guard duty, staring idly at a clump of grape hyacinths that
had forced their way through the chilly ground, when Ron shouted excitedly
from inside the tent.
“I’ve got it, I’ve got it! Password was ’Albus’! Get in here, Harry.”
Roused for the first time in days from his contemplation of the Deathly
Hallows, Harry hurried back inside the tent to find Ron and Hermione kneeling
on the floor beside the little radio. Hermione, who had been polishing the sword
377
of Gryffindor just for something to do, was sitting open-mouthed, staring at the
tiny speaker, from which a most familiar voice was issuing.
“. . . apologize for our temporary absence from the airwaves, which was due
to a number of house calls in our area by those charming Death Eaters.”
“But that’s Lee Jordan!” said Hermione.
“I know!” beamed Ron. “Cool, eh?”
“. . . now found ourselves another secure location,” Lee was saying, and I’m
pleased to tell you that two of our regular contributors have joined me here this
evening. Evening, boys!”
“Hi.”
“Evening, River.”
“‘River”’ that’s Lee,” Ron explained. “They’ve all got code names, but you
can usually tell—“
“Shh!” said Hermione.
“But before we hear from Royal and Romulus,” Lee went on, “let’s take a
moment to report those deaths that the Wizarding Wireless Network News and
Daily Prophet don’t think important enough to mention. It is with great regret
that we inform our listeners of the murders of Ted Tonks and Dirk Cresswell.”
Harry felt a sick, swooping in his belly. He, Ron, and Hermione gazed at
one another in horror.
“A goblin by the name of Gornuk was also killed. It is believed that Muggleborn Dean Thomas and a second goblin, both believed to have been traveling
with Tonks, Cresswell, and Gornuk, may have escaped. If Dean is listening, or
if anyone has any knowledge of his whereabouts, his parents and sisters are
desperate for news.
“Meanwhile, in Gaddley, a Muggle family of five has been found dead in
their home. Muggle authorities are attributing their deaths to a gas leak,
but members of the Order of the Phoenix inform me that it was the Killing
Curse—more evidence, as if it were needed, of the fact that Muggle slaughter
is becoming little more than a recreational sport under the new regime.
“Finally, we regret to inform our listeners that the remains of Bathilda
378 CHAPTER 22. THE DEATHLY HALLOWS
Bagshot have been discovered in Godric’s Hollow. The evidence is that she
died several months ago. The Order of the Phoenix informs us that her body
showed unmistakable signs of injuries inflicted by Dark Magic.
“Listeners, I’d like to invite you now to join us in a minute’s silence in memory of Ted Tonks, Dirk Cresswell, Bathilda Bagshot, Gornuk, and the unnamed,
but no less regretted, Muggles murdered by the Death Eaters.”
Silence fell, and Harry, Ron, and Hermione did not speak. Half of Harry
yearned to hear more, half of him was afraid of what might come next. It was
the first time he had felt fully connected to the outside world for a long time.
“Thank you,” said Lee’s voice. “And now we can return to regular contributor Royal, for an update on how the new Wizarding order is affecting the
Muggle world.”
“Thanks, River,” said an unmistakable voice, deep, measured, reassuring.
“Kingsley!” burst out Ron.
“We know!” said Hermione, hushing him.
“Muggles remain ignorant of the source of their suffering as they continue
to sustain heavy casualties,” said Kingsley. “However, we continue to hear truly
inspirational stories of wizards and witches risking their own safety to protect
Muggle friends and neighbors, often without the Muggles’ knowledge. I’d like
to appeal to all our listeners to emulate their example, perhaps by casting a
protective charm over any Muggle dwellings in your street. Many lives could
be saved if such simple measures are taken.”
“And what would you say, Royal, to those listeners who reply that in these
dangerous times, it should be ’Wizards first’? asked Lee.
“I’d say that it’s one short step from ’Wizards first’ to ’Purebloods first,’ and
then to ’Death Eaters,”’ replied Kingsley. “We’re all human, aren’t we? Every
human life is worth the same, and worth saving.”
“Excellently put, Royal, and you’ve got my vote for Minister of Magic if we
ever get out of this mess,” said Lee. “And now, over to Romulus for our popular
feature ’Pals of Potter.”’
“Thanks, River,” said another very familiar voice. Ron started to speak, but
379
Hermione forestalled him in a whisper.
“We know it’s Lupin!”
“Romulus, do you maintain, as you have every time you’ve appeared on our
program, that Harry Potter is still alive?”
“I do,” said Lupin firmly. “There is no doubt at all in my mind that his
death would be proclaimed as widely as possible by the Death Eaters if it had
happened, because it would strike a deadly blow at the morale of those resisting
the new regime. ’The Boy Who Lived’ remains a symbol of everything for which
we are fighting: the triumph of good, the power of innocence, the need to keep
resisting.”
A mixture of gratitude and shame welled up in Harry. Had Lupin forgiven
him, then, for the terrible things he had said when they had last met?
“And what would you say to Harry if you knew he was listening, Romulus?”
“I’d tell him we’re all with him in spirit,” said Lupin, then hesitated slightly,
“And I’d tell him to follow his instincts, which are good and nearly always right.”
Harry looked at Hermione, whose eyes were full of tears.
“Nearly always right,” she repeated.
“Oh, didn’t I tell you?” said Ron in surprise. “Bill told me Lupin’s living
with Tonks again! And apparently she’s getting pretty big too. . . ”
“. . . and our usual update on those friends of Harry Potter’s who are suffering for their allegiance?” Lee was saying.
“Well, as regular listeners will know, several of the more outspoken supporters of Harry Potter have now been imprisoned, including Xenophilius Lovegood, erstwhile editor of The Quibbler,” said Lupin.
“At least he’s still alive!” muttered Ron.
“We have also heard within the last few hours that Rubeus Hagrid”—all
three of them gasped, and so nearly missed the rest of the sentence—“wellknown gamekeeper at Hogwarts School, has narrowly escaped arrest within
the grounds of Hogwarts, where he is rumored to have hosted a ’Support Harry
Potter’ party in his house. However, Hagrid was not taken into custody, and is,
we believe, on the run.”
380 CHAPTER 22. THE DEATHLY HALLOWS
“I suppose it helps, when escaping from Death Eaters, if you’ve got a sixteenfoot-high half brother?” asked Lee.
“It would tend to give you an edge,” agreed Lupin gravely. “May I just add
that while we here at Potterwatch applaud Hagrid’s spirit, we would urge even
the most devoted of Harry’s supporters against following Hagrid’s lead. ’Support Harry Potter’ parties are unwise in the present climate.”
“Indeed they are, Romulus,” said Lee, “so we suggest that you continue to
show your devotion to the man with the lightning scar by listening to Potterwatch! And now let’s move to news concerning the wizard who is proving just
as elusive as Harry Potter. We like to refer to him as the Chief Death Eater,
and here to give his views on some of the more insane rumors circulating about
him, I’d like to introduce a new correspondent. Rodent?”
“‘Rodent’?” said yet another familiar voice, and Harry, Ron, and Hermione
cried out together:
“Fred!”
“No—is it George?”
“It’s Fred, I think,” said Ron, leaning in closer, as whichever twin it was
said,
“I’m not being ’Rodent,’ no way, I told you I wanted to be ’Rapier’!”
“Oh, all right then, ’Rapier,’ could you please give us your take on the various stories we’ve been hearing about the Chief Death Eater?”
“Yes, River, I can,” said Fred. “As our listeners will know, unless they’ve
taken refuge at the bottom of a garden pond or somewhere similar, You-KnowWho’s strategy of remaining in the shadows is creating a nice little climate of
panic. Mind you, if all the alleged sightings of him are genuine, we must have
a good nineteen You-Know-Whos running around the place.”
“Which suits him, of course,” said Kingsley. “The air of mystery is creating
more terror than actually showing himself.”
“Agreed,” said Fred. “So, people, let’s try and calm down a bit. Things are
bad enough without inventing stuff as well. For instance, this new idea that
You-Know-Who can kill people with a single glance from his eyes. That’s a
381
basilisk, listeners. One simple test: Check whether the thing that’s glaring at
you has got legs. If it has, it’s safe to look into its eyes, although if it really is
You-Know-Who, that’s still likely to be the last thing you ever do.”
For the first time in weeks and weeks, Harry was laughing: He could feel
the weight of tension leaving him.
“And the rumors that he keeps being sighted abroad?” asked Lee.
“Well, who wouldn’t want a nice little holiday after all the hard work he’s
been putting in?” asked Fred. “Point is, people, don’t get lulled into a false
sense of security, thinking he’s out of the country. Maybe he is, maybe he isn’t,
but the fact remains he can move faster than Severus Snape confronted with
shampoo when he wants to, so don’t count on him being a long way away if
you’re planning to take any risks. I never thought I’d hear myself say it, but
safety first!”
“Thank you very much for those wise words, Rapier,” said Lee. ”Listeners,
that brings us to the end of another Potterwatch. We don’t know when it will
be possible to broadcast again, but you can be sure we shall be back. Keep
twiddling those dials: The next password will be ’Mad-Eye.’ Keep each other
safe: Keep faith. Good night.”
The radio’s dial twirled and the lights behind the tuning panel went out.
Harry, Ron, and Hermione were still beaming. Hearing familiar, friendly voices
was an extraordinary tonic; Harry had become so used to their isolation he had
nearly forgotten that other people were resisting Voldemort. It was like waking
from a long sleep.
“Good, eh?” said Ron happily.
“Brilliant,” said Harry.
“It’s so brave of them,” sighed Hermione admiringly. “If they were found
. . . ”
“Well, they keep on the move, don’t they?” said Ron. “Like us.”
“But did you hear what Fred said?” asked Harry excitedly; now the broadcast was over, his thoughts turned around toward his all consuming obsession.
“He’s abroad! He’s still looking for the Wand, I knew it!”
382 CHAPTER 22. THE DEATHLY HALLOWS
“Harry—“
“Come on, Hermione, why are you so determined not to admit it? Vol—“
“HARRY, NO!”
“—demort’s after the Elder Wand!”
“The name’s Taboo!” Ron bellowed, leaping to his feet as a loud crack
sounded outside the tent. “I told you, Harry, I told you, we can’t say it anymore—
we’ve got to put the protection back around us—quickly—it’s how they find—“
But Ron stopped talking, and Harry knew why. The Sneakoscope on the
table had lit up and begun to spin; they could hear voices coming nearer and
nearer: rough, excited voices. Ron pulled the Deluminator out of his pocket
and clicked it: Their lamps went out.
“Come out of there with your hands up!” came a rasping voice through the
darkness. “We know you’re in there! You’ve got half a dozen wands pointing at
you and we don’t care who we curse!”
Chapter 23
Malfoy Manor
H
arry looked around at the other two, now mere outlines in the
darkness. He saw Hermione point her wand, set toward the outside, but into his face; there was a bang, a burst of white light,
and he buckled in agony, unable to see. He could feel his face swelling rapidly
under his hands as heavy footfalls surrounded him.
“Get up, vermin.”
Unknown hands dragged Harry roughly off the ground, before he could stop
them, someone had rummaged through his pockets and removed the blackthorn wand. Harry clutched at his excruciatingly painful face, which felt unrecognizable beneath his fingers, tight, swollen, and puffy as though he had suffered some violent allergic reaction. His eyes had been reduced to slits through
which he could barely see; his glasses fell off as he was bundled out of the tent:
all he could make out were the blurred shapes of four or five people wrestling
Ron and Hermione outside too.
“Get—off—her!” Ron shouted. There was the unmistakable sound of knuckles hitting flesh: Ron grunted in pain and Hermione screamed, “No! Leave him
alone, leave him alone!”
“Your boyfriend’s going to have worse than that done to him if he’s on my
list,” said the horribly familiar, rasping voice. “Delicious girl. . . what a treat
383
384 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
. . . I do enjoy the softness of the skin. . . .”
Harry’s stomach turned over. He knew who this was, Fenrir Greyback, the
werewolf who was permitted to wear Death Eater robes in return for his hired
savagery.
“Search the tent!” said another voice.
Harry was thrown face down onto the ground. A thud told him that Ron
had been cast down beside him. They could hear footsteps and crashes; the
men were pushing over chairs inside the tent as they searched.
“Now, let’s see who we’ve got,” said Greyback’s gloating voice from overhead,
and Harry was rolled over onto his back. A beam of wand light fell onto his face
and Greyback laughed.
“I’ll be needing butterbeer to wash this one down. What happened to you,
ugly?”
Harry did not answer immediately.
“I said,” repeated Greyback, and Harry received a blow to the diaphragm
that made him double over in pain. “what happened to you?”
“Stung.” Harry muttered. “Been Stung.”
“Yeah, looks like it.” said a second voice.
“What’s your name?” snarled Greyback.
“Dudley.” said Harry.
“And your first name?”
“I—Vernon. Vernon Dudley.”
“Check the list, Scabior.” said Greyback, and Harry head him move sideways to look down at Ron, instead. “And what about you, ginger?”
“Stan Shunpike.” said Ron.
“Like ’ell you are.” said the man called Scabior. “We know Stan Shunpike,
’e’s put a bit of work our way.”
There was another thud.
“I’b Bardy,” said Ron, and Harry could tell that his mouth was full of blood.
“Bardy Weasley.”
“A Weasley?” rasped Greyback. “So you’re related to blood traitors even if
385
you’re not a Mudblood. And lastly, your pretty little friend . . . ” The relish in
his voice made Harry’s flesh crawl.
“Easy, Greyback.” said Scabior over the jeering of the others.
”Oh, I’m not going to bite just yet. We’ll see if she’s a bit quicker at remembering her name than Barny. Who are you, girly?
“Penelope Clearwater.” said Hermione. She sounded terrified, but convincing.
“What’s your blood status?”
“Half-Blood.” said Hermione.
“Easy enough to check,” said Scabior. “But the ’ole lot of ’em look like they
could still be ’ogwarts age—”
“We’b lebt,” said Ron.
“Left, ’ave you, ginger?” said Scabior. “And you decided to go camping? And
you thought, just for a laugh, you’d use the Dark Lords name?”
“Nod a laugh,” said Ron. “Aggiden.”
“Accident?” There was more jeering laughter.
“You know who used to like using the Dark Lord’s name, Weasley?” growled
Greyback, “The Order of the Phoenix. Mean anything to you?”
“Doh.”
“Well, they don’t show the Dark Lord proper respect, so the name’s been
Tabooed. A few Order members have been tracked that way. We’ll see. Bind
them up with the other two prisoners!”
Someone yanked Harry up by the hair, dragged him a short way, pushed
him down into a sitting position, then started binding him back-to-back with
other people. Harry was still half blind, barely able to see anything through
his puffed-up eyes. When at last the man tying then had walked away, Harry
whispered to the other prisoners.
“Anyone still got a wand?”
“No.” Said Ron and Hermione from either side of him.
“This is all my fault. I said the name. I’m sorry—”
“Harry?”
386 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
It was a new, but familiar voice. and it came from directly behind Harry,
from the person tied to Hermione’s left.
“Dean?”
“It is you! If they find out who they’ve got—! They’re Snatchers, they’re only
looking for truants to sell for gold—”
“Not a bad little haul for one night.” Greyback was saying, as a pair of
hobnailed boots marched close by Harry and they heard more crashes from
inside the tent. “A Mudblood, a runaway goblin, and these truants. You checked
their names on the list yet, Scabior?” he roared.
“Yeah. There’s no Vernon Dudley un ’ere, Greyback.”
“Interesting,” said Greyback. “That’s interesting.”
He crouched down beside Harry, who saw, through the infinitesimal gap left
between his swollen eyelids, a face covered in matted gray hair and whiskers,
with pointed brown teeth and sores in the corners of his mouth. Greyback
smelled as he had done at the top of the tower where Dumbledore had died: of
dirt, sweat, and blood.
“So you aren’t wanted, then, Vernon? Or are you on that list under a different name? What house were you in at Hogwarts?”
“Slytherin,” said Harry automatically.
“Funny ’ow they all thinks we wants to ’ear that.” leered Scabior out of the
shadows. “But none of ’em can tell us where the common room is.”
“It’s in the dungeons.” said Harry clearly. “You enter through the wall. It’s
full of skulls and stuff and its under the lake, so the light’s all green,”
There was a short pause.
“Well, well, looks like we really ’ave caught a little Slytherin.” said Scabior.
“Good for you, Vernon, ’cause there ain’t a lot of Mudblood Slytherins. Who’s
your father?”
“He works at the Ministry,” Harry lied. He knew that his whole story would
collapse with the smallest investigation, but on the other hand, he only had
until his face regained its usual appearance before the game was up in any
case. “Department of Magical Accidents and Catastrophes.”
387
“You know what, Greyback,” said Scabior. “I think there is a Dudley in
there.”
Harry could barely breathe: Could luck, sheer luck, get them safely out of
this?
“Well, well.” said Greyback, and Harry could hear the tiniest note of trepidation in that callous voice, and knew that Greyback was wondering whether he
had just indeed just attacked and bound the son of a Ministry Official. Harry’s
heart was pounding against the ropes around his ribs; he would not have been
surprised to know that Greyback could see it. “If you’re telling the truth, ugly,
you’ve got nothing to fear from a trip to the Ministry. I expect your father’ll
reward us just for picking you up.”
“But,” said Harry, his mouth bone dry, “if you just let us—”
“Hey!” came a shout from inside the tent. “Look at this. Greyback!”
A dark figure came bustling toward them, and Harry saw a glint of silver to
the light of their wands. They had found Gryffindor’s sword.
“Ve–e–ery nice,” said Greyback appreciatively, taking it from his companion.
“Oh, very nice indeed. Looks goblin-made, that. Where did you get something
like this?”
“It’s my father’s,” Harry lied, hoping against hope that it was too dark for
Greyback to see the name etched just below the hilt. “We borrowed it to cut
firewood—”
“’ang on a minute, Greyback! Look at this, in the Prophet!”
As Scabior said it, Harry’s scar, which was stretched tight across his distended forehead, burned savagely. More clearly than he could make out anything around him, he saw a towering building, a grim fortress, jet-black and
forbidding: Voldemort’s thoughts had suddenly become Razor-Sharp again; he
was gliding toward the gigantic building with a sense of calmly euphoric purpose . . . .
So close . . . So close . . .
With a huge effort of will Harry closed his mind to Voldemort’s thoughts,
pulling himself back to where he sat, tied to Ron, Hermione, Dean, and Griphook
388 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
in the darkness, listening to Greyback and Scabior. “’ermione Granger,”’ Scabior
was saying, “‘the Mudblood who is known to be traveling with ’arry Potter.”’
Harry’s scar burned in the silence, but he made a supreme effort to keep
himself present, nor to slip into Voldemort’s mind. He heard the creak of Greyback’s boots as he crouched down, in front of Hermione.
“you know what, little girly? This picture looks a hell of a lot like you.”
“It isn’t! It isn’t me!”
Hermione’s terrified squeak was as good as a confession.
“. . . known to be traveling with Harry Potter,” repeated Greyback quietly.
A stillness had settled over the scene. Harry’s scar was Exquisitely painful,
but he struggled with all his strength against the pull of Voldemort’s thoughts.
It had never been so important to remain in his own right mind.
“Well, this changed things, doesn’t it?” whispered Greyback. Nobody spoke:
Harry sensed the gang of Snatchers watching, frozen, and felt Hermione’s arm
trembling against his. Greyback got up and took a couple of steps to where
Harry sat, crouching down again to stare closely at his misshapen features.
“What’s that on your forehead, Vernon?” he asked softly, his breath foul in
Harry’s nostrils as he pressed a filthy finger to the taught scar.
”Don’t touch it! Harry yelled; he could not stop himself, he thought he might
be sick from the pain of it.
“I thought you wore glasses, Potter?” breathed Greyback.
“I found glasses!” yelped one of the Snatchers skulking in the background.
“There was glasses in the tent, Greyback, wait—”
And seconds later Harry’s glasses had been rammed back onto his face. The
Snatchers were closing in now, peering at him.
“It is!” rasped Greyback. “We’ve caught Potter!”
They all took several steps backward, stunned by what they had done.
Harry, still fighting to remain present in his own splitting head, could think
of nothing to say. Fragmented visions were breaking across the surface of his
mind—
—He was gliding around the high walls of the black fortress—
389
No, he was Harry, tied up and wandless, in grave danger—
—looking up, up to the topmost window, the highest tower—
He was Harry, and they were discussing his fate in low voices—
—Time to fly . . .
“. . . To the Ministry?”
“To hell with the Ministry.” growled Greyback. “They’ll take the credit, and
we won’t get a look in. I say we take him straight to You-Know-Who.”
“Will you summon ’im? ’ere?” said Scabior, sounding awed, terrified.
“No,” snarled Greyback, “I haven’t got—they say he’s using the Malfoy’s
place as a base. We’ll take the boy there.”
Harry thought he knew why Greyback was not calling Voldemort. The werewolf might be allowed to wear Death Eater robes when they wanted to use him,
but only Voldemort’s inner circle were branded with the Dark Mark: Greyback
had not been granted this highest honor.
Harry’s scar seared again—
—and he rose into the night, flying straight up to the windows at the very
top of the tower—
“. . . completely sure it’s him? ’Cause if it ain’t, Greyback, we’re dead.”
“Who’s in charge here?” roared Greyback, covering his moment of inadequacy. “I say that’s Potter, and him plus his wand, that’s two hundred thousand
Galleons right there! But if you’re too gutless to come along, any of you, it’s all
for me, and with any luck, I’ll get the girl thrown in!”
—The window was the merest slit in the black rock, not big enough for a
man to enter. . . . A skeletal figure was just visible through it, curled beneath a
blanket. . . . Dead, or sleeping . . . ?
“All right!” said Scabior. “All right, we’re in! And what about the rest of ’em,
Greyback, what’ll we do with ’em?”
“Might as well take the lot. We’ve got two Mudbloods, that’s another ten
Galleons. Give me the sword as well. If they’re rubies, that’s another small
fortune right there.”
The prisoners were dragged to their feet. Harry could hear Hermione’s
390 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
breathing, fast and terrified.
“Grab hold and make it tight. I’ll do Potter!” said Greyback, seizing a fistful
of Harry’s hair; Harry could feel his long yellow nails scratching his scalp. “On
three! One—two—three—“
They Disapparated, pulling the prisoners with them. Harry struggled, trying to throw off Greyback’s hand, but it was hopeless: Ron and Hermione
were squeezed tightly against him on either side; he could not separate from
the group, and as the breath was squeezed out of him his scar seared more
painfully still—
—as he forced himself through the slit of a window like a snake and landed,
lightly as vapor inside the cell-like room—
The prisoners lurched into one another as they landed in a country lane.
Harry’s eyes, still puffy, took a moment to acclimatize, then he saw a pair of
wrought-iron gates at the foot of what looked like a long drive. He experienced the tiniest trickle of relief. The worst had not happened yet: Voldemort
was not here. He was, Harry knew, for he was fighting to resist the vision, in
some strange, fortresslike place, at the top of a tower. How long it would take
Voldemort to get to this place, once he knew that Harry was here, was another
matter. . . .
One of the Snatchers strode to the gates and shook them.
“How do we get in? They’re locked, Greyback, I can’t—blimey!”
He whipped his hands away in fright. The iron was contorting, twisting
itself out of the abstract furls and coils into a frightening face, which spoke in
a clanging, echoing voice. “State your purpose!”
“We’ve got Potter!” Greyback roared triumphantly. “We’ve captured Harry
Potter!”
The gates swung open.
“Come on!” said Greyback to his men, and the prisoners were shunted
through the gates and up the drive, between high hedges that muffled their
footsteps. Harry saw a ghostly white shape above him, and realized it was an
albino peacock. He stumbled and was dragged onto his feet by Greyback; now
391
he was staggering along sideways, tied back-to-back to the four other prisoner.
Closing his puffy eyes, he allowed the pain in his scar to overcome him for a
moment, wanting to know what Voldemort was doing, whether he knew yet
that Harry was caught. . . .
The emaciated figure stirred beneath its thin blanket and rolled over toward
him, eyes opening in a skull of a face. . . . The frail man sat up, great sunken
eyes fixed upon him, upon Voldemort, and then he smiled. Most of his teeth
were gone. . . .
“So, you have come. I thought you would . . . one day. But your journey was
pointless. I never had it.”
“You lie!”
As Voldemort’s anger throbbed inside him, Harry’s scar threatened to burst
with pain, and he wrenched his mind back to his own body, fighting to remain
present as the prisoners were pushed over gravel.
Light spilled out over all of them.
“What is this?” said a woman’s cold voice.
“We’re here to see He-Who-Must-Not-Be-Named!” rasped Greyback.
“Who are you?”
“You know me!” There was resentment in the werewolf’s voice. “Fenrir
Greyback! We’ve caught Harry Potter!”
Greyback seized Harry and dragged him around to face the light, forcing
the other prisoners to shuffle around too.
“I know ’es swollen, ma’am, but it’s ’im!” piped up Scabior. “If you look a bit
closer, you’ll see ’is scar. And this ’ere, see the girl? The Mudblood who’s been
traveling around with ’im, ma’am. There’s no doubt it’s ’im, and we’ve got ’is
wand as well! ’Ere, ma’am—“
Through his puffy eyelids Harry saw Narcissa Malfoy scrutinizing his swollen
face. Scabior thrust the blackthorn wand at her. She raised her eyebrows.
“Bring them in,” she said.
Harry and the others were shoved and kicked up broad stone steps into a
hallway lined with portraits.
392 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
“Follow me,” said Narcissa, leading the way across the hall. “My son, Draco,
is home for his Easter holidays. If that is Harry Potter, he will know.”
The drawing room dazzled after the darkness outside; even with his eyes
almost closed Harry could make out the wide proportions of the room. A crystal chandelier hung from the ceiling, more portraits against the dark purple
walls. Two figures rose from chairs in front of an ornate marble fireplace as the
prisoners were forced into the room by the Snatchers.
“What is this?”
The dreadfully familiar, drawling voice of Lucius Malfoy fell on Harry’s ears.
He was panicking now. He could see no way out, and it was easier, as his fear
mounted, to block out Voldemort’s thoughts, though his scar was still burning.
“They say they’ve got Potter,” said Narcissa’s cold voice. “Draco, come here.”
Harry did not dare look directly at Draco, but saw him obliquely; a figure
slightly taller than he was, rising from an armchair, his face a pale and pointed
blur beneath white-blond hair.
Greyback forced the prisoners to turn again so as to place Harry directly
beneath the chandelier.
“Well, boy?” rasped the werewolf.
Harry was facing a mirror over the fireplace, a great gilded thing in an intricately scrolled frame. Through the slits of his eyes he saw his own reflection
for the first time since leaving Grimmauld Place.
His face was huge, shiny, and pink, every feature distorted by Hermione’s
jinx. His black hair reached his shoulders and there was a dark shadow around
his jaw. Had he not known that it was he who stood there, he would have
wondered who was wearing his glasses. He resolved not to speak, for his voice
was sure to give him away; yet he still avoided eye contact with Draco as the
latter approached.
“Well, Draco?” said Lucius Malfoy. He sounded avid. “Is it? Is it Harry
Potter?”
“I can’t—I can’t be sure,” said Draco. He was keeping his distance from
Greyback, and seemed as scared of looking at Harry as Harry was of looking at
393
him.
“But look at him carefully, look! Come closer!”
Harry had never heard Lucius Malfoy so excited.
“Draco, if we are the ones who hand Potter over to the Dark Lord, everything will be forgiv—“
“Now, we won’t be forgetting who actually caught him, I hope Mr. Malfoy?”
said Greyback menacingly.
“Of course not, of course not!” said Lucius impatiently. He approached
Harry himself, came so close that Harry could see the usually languid, pale
face in sharp detail even through his swollen eyes. With his face a puffy mask,
Harry felt as though he was peering out from between the bars of a cage.
“What did you do to him?” Lucius asked Greyback. “How did he get into
this state?”
“That wasn’t us.”
“Looks more like a Stinging Jinx to me,” said Lucius.
His gray eyes raked Harry’s forehead.
“There’s something there,” he whispered. “it could be the scar, stretched
tight. . . .” Draco, come here, look properly! What do you think?”
Harry saw Draco’s face up close now, right beside his father’s. They were
extraordinarily alike, except that while his father looked beside himself with
excitement, Draco’s expression was full of reluctance, even fear.
“I don’t know,” he said, and he walked away toward the fireplace where his
mother stood watching.
“We had better be certain, Lucius,” Narcissa called to her husband in her
cold, clear voice. “Completely sure that it is Potter, before we summon the Dark
Lord . . . They say this is his”—she was looking closely at the blackthorn wand—
“but it does not resemble Ollivander’s description. . . . If we are mistaken, if we
call the Dark Lord here for nothing . . . Remember what he did to Rowle and
Dolohov?”
“What about the Mudblood, then?” growled Greyback. Harry was nearly
thrown off his feet as the Snatchers forced the prisoners to swivel around again,
394 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
so that the light fell on Hermione instead.
“Wait,” said Narcissa sharply. “Yes—yes, she was in Madam Malkin’s with
Potter! I saw her picture in the Prophet! Look, Draco, isn’t it the Granger girl?”
“I . . . maybe . . . yeah.”
“But then, that’s the Weasley boy!” shouted Lucius, striding around the
bound prisoners to face Ron. “It’s them, Potter’s friends—Draco, look at him,
isn’t it Arthur Weasley’s son, what’s his name—?”
“Yeah,” said Draco again, his back to the prisoners. “It could be.”
The drawing room door opened behind Harry. A woman spoke, and the
sound of the voice wound Harry’s fear to an even higher pitch.
“What is this? What’s happened, Cissy?”
Bellatrix Lestrange walked slowly around the prisoners, and stopped on
Harry’s right, staring at Hermione through her heavily lidded eyes,
“But surely,” she said quietly, “this is the Mudblood girl? This is Grander?”
“Yes, yes, it’s Granger!” cried Lucius, “And beside her, we think, Potter!
Potter and his friends, caught at last!”
“Potter?” shrieked Bellatrix, and she backed away, the better to take in
Harry. “Are you sure? Well then, the Dark Lord must be informed at once!”
She dragged back her left sleeve: Harry saw the Dark Mark burned into
the flesh of her arm, and knew that she was about to touch it, to summon her
beloved master—
“I was about to call him!” said Lucius, and his hand actually closed upon
Bellatrix’s wrist, preventing her from touching the Mark. “I shall summon
him, Bella. Potter has been brought to my house, and it is therefore upon my
authority—“
“Your authority!” she sneered, attempting to wrench her hand from his
grasp. “You lost your authority when you lost your wand, Lucius! How dare
you! Take your hands off me!”
“This is nothing to do with you, you did not capture the boy—“
“Begging your pardon, Mr. Malfoy,” interjected Greyback, “but it’s us that
caught Potter, and it’s us that’ll be claiming the gold—“
395
“Gold!” laughed Bellatrix, still attempting to throw off her brother-in-law,
her free hand groping in her pocket for her wand. “Take your gold, filthy scavenger, what do I want with gold? I seek only the honor of his—of—“
She stopped struggling, her dark eyes fixed upon something Harry could not
see. Jubilant at her capitulation, Lucius threw her hand from him and ripped
up his own sleeve—
“STOP!” shrieked Bellatrix, “Do not touch it, we shall all perish if the Dark
Lord comes now!”
Lucius froze, his index finger hovering over his own Mark. Bellatrix strode
out of Harry’s limited line of vision.
“What is that?” he heard her say.
“Sword,” grunted an out-of-sight Snatcher.
“Give it to me.”
“It’s not yours, missus, it’s mine, I reckon I found it.”
There was a bang and a flash of red light; Harry knew that the Snatcher
had been Stunned. There was a roar of anger from his fellows: Scabior drew
his wand.
“What d’you think you’re playing at, woman?”
“Stupefy!” she screamed, ”Stupefy!”
They were no match for her, even thought there were four of them against
one of her: She was a witch, as Harry knew, with prodigious skill and no conscience. They fell where they stood, all except Greyback, who had been forced
into a kneeling position, his arms outstretched. Out of the corners of his eyes
Harry saw Bellatrix bearing down upon the werewolf, the sword of Gryffindor
gripped tightly in her hand, her face waxen.
“Where did you get this sword?” she whispered to Greyback as she pulled
his wand out of his unresisting grip.
“How dare you?” he snarled, his mouth the only thing that could move as he
was forced to gaze up at her. He bared his pointed teeth. “Release me, woman!”
“Where did you find this sword?” she repeated, brandishing it in his face,
“Snape sent it to my vault in Gringotts!”
396 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
“It was in their tent,” rasped Greyback. “Release me, I say!”
She waved her wand, and the werewolf sprang to his feet, but appeared too
wary to approach her. He prowled behind an armchair, his filthy curved nails
clutching its back.
“Draco, move this scum outside,” said Bellatrix, indicating the unconscious
men. “If you haven’t got the guts to finish them, then leave them in the courtyard for me.”
“Don’t you dare speak to Draco like—“ said Narcissa furiously, but Bellatrix
screamed.
“Be quiet! The situation is graver than you can possibly imagine, Cissy! We
have a very serious problem!”
She stood, panting slightly, looking down at the sword, examining its hilt.
Then she turned to look at the silent prisoners.
“If it is indeed Potter, he must not be harmed,” she muttered, more to herself
than to the others. “The Dark Lord wishes to dispose of Potter himself. . . . But
if he finds out . . . I must . . . I must know. . . .”
She turned back to her sister again.
“The prisoners must be placed in the cellar, while I think what to do!”
“This is my house, Bella, you don’t give orders in my—“
“Do it! You have no idea of the danger we’re in!” shrieked Bellatrix. She
looked frightening, mad; a thin stream of fire issued from her wand and burned
a hole in the carpet.
Narcissa hesitated for a moment, then addressed the werewolf.
“Take these prisoners down to the cellar, Greyback.”
“Wait,” said Bellatrix sharply. “All except. . . . except for the Mudblood.”
Greyback gave a grunt of pleasure.
“No!” shouted Ron. “You can have me, keep me!”
Bellatrix hit him across the face: the blow echoed around the room.
“If she dies under questioning, I’ll take you next,” she said. “Blood traitor
is next to Mudblood in my book. Take them downstairs, Greyback, and make
sure they are secure, but do nothing more to them—yet.”
397
She threw Greyback’s wand back to him, then took a short silver knife from
under her robes. She cut Hermione free from the other prisoners, then dragged
her by the hair into the middle of the room, while Greyback forced the rest of
them to shuffle across to another door, into a dark passageway, his wand held
out in front of him, projecting an invisible and irresistible force.
“Reckon she’ll let me have a bit of the girl when she’s finished with her?”
Greyback crooned as he forced them along the corridor. “I’d say I’ll get a bite or
two, wouldn’t you, ginger?”
Harry could feel Ron shaking. They were forced down a steep flight of stairs,
still tied back-to-back and in danger of slipping and breaking their necks at any
moment. At the bottom was a heavy door. Greyback unlocked it with a tap of
his wand, then forced them into a dank and musty room and left them in total
darkness. The echoing bang of the slammed cellar door had not died away
before there was a terrible, drawn out scream from directly above them.
“HERMIONE!” Ron bellowed, and he started to writhe and struggle against
the ropes tying them together, so that Harry staggered. “HERMIONE!”
“Be quiet!” Harry said. “Shut up. Ron, we need to work out a way—“
“HERMIONE! HERMIONE!”
“We need a plan, stop yelling—we need to get these ropes off—“
“Harry?” came a whisper through the darkness. “Ron? Is that you?”
Ron stopped shouting. There was a sound of movement close by them, then
Harry saw a shadow moving closer.
“Harry? Ron?”
“Luna?”
“Yes, it’s me! Oh no, I didn’t want you to be caught!”
“Luna, can you help us get these ropes off?” said Harry.
“Oh yes, I expect so. . . . There’s an old nail we use if we need to break
anything. . . . Just a moment . . . ”
Hermione screamed again from overhead, and they could hear Bellatrix
screaming too, but her words were inaudible, for Ron shouted again, “HERMIONE!
HERMIONE!”
398 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
“Mr. Ollivander?” Harry could hear Luna saying. “Mr. Ollivander, have you
got the nail? If you just move over a little bit . . . I think it was beside the water
jug.”
She was back within seconds.
“You’ll need to stay still,” she said.
Harry could feel her digging at the rope’s tough fibers to work the knots
free. From upstairs they heard Bellatrix’s voice.
“I’m going to ask you again! Where did you get this sword? Where?”
“We found it—we found it—PLEASE!” Hermione screamed again; Ron struggled harder than ever, and the rusty nail slipped onto Harry’s wrist.
“Ron, please stay still!” Luna whispered. “I can’t see what I’m doing—“
“My pocket!” said Ron, “In my pocket, there’s a Deluminator, and it’s full of
light!”
A few seconds later, there was a click, and the luminescent spheres the
Deluminator had sucked from the lamps in the tent flew into the cellar: Unable
to rejoin their sources, they simply hung there, like tiny suns, flooding the
underground room with light. Harry saw Luna, all eyes in her white face, and
the motionless figure of Ollivander the wandmaker, curled up on the floor in
the corner. Craning around, he caught sight of their fellow prisoners: Dean
and Griphook the goblin, who seemed barely conscious, kept standing by the
ropes that bound him to the humans.
“Oh, that’s much easier, thanks, Ron,” said Luna, and she began hacking at
their bindings again. “Hello, Dean!”
From above came Bellatrix’s voice.
“You’re lying, filthy Mudblood, and I know it! You have been inside my vault
at Gringotts! Tell the truth, tell the truth!”
Another terrible scream—
“HERMIONE!”
“What else did you take? What else have you got? Tel me the truth or, I
swear, I shall run you through with this knife!”
“There!”
399
Harry felt the ropes fall away and turned, rubbing his wrists, to see Ron
running around the cellar, looking up at the low ceiling, searching for a trapdoor. Dean, his face bruised and bloody, said “Thanks” to Luna and stood there,
shivering, but Griphook sank onto the cellar floor, looking groggy and disoriented, many welts across his swarthy face.
Ron was now trying to Disapparate without a wand.
“There’s no way out, Ron,” said Luna, watching his fruitless efforts. “The
cellar is completely escape-proof. I tried, at first. Mr. Ollivander has been here
for a long time, he’s tried everything.”
Hermione was screaming again: The sound went through Harry like physical pain. Barely conscious of the fierce prickling of his scar, he too started to
run around the cellar, feeling the walls for he hardly knew what, knowing in
his heart that it was useless.
“What else did you take, what else? ANSWER ME! CRUCIO!”
Hermione’s screams echoed off the walls upstairs, Ron was half sobbing as
he pounded the walls with his fists, and Harry in utter desperation seized Hagrid’s pouch from around his neck and groped inside it: He pulled out Dumbledore’s Snitch and shook it, hoping for he did not know what—nothing happened—
he waved the broken halves of the phoenix wand, but they were lifeless—the
mirror fragment fell sparkling to the floor, and he saw a gleam of brightest
blue—
Dumbledore’s eye was gazing at him out of the mirror.
“Help us!” he yelled at it in mad desperation. “We’re in the cellar of Malfoy
Manor, help us!”
The eye blinked and was gone.
Harry was not even sure that it had really been there. He tilted the shard
of mirror this way and that, and saw nothing reflected there but the walls and
ceiling of their prison, and upstairs Hermione was screaming worse than ever,
and next to him Ron was bellowing, “HERMIONE! HERMIONE!”
“How did you get into my vault?” they heard Bellatrix scream. “Did that
dirty little goblin in the cellar help you?”
400 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
“We only met him tonight!” Hermione sobbed. “We’ve never been inside
your vault. . . . It isn’t the real sword! It’s a copy, just a copy!”
“A copy?” screeched Bellatrix. “Oh, a likely story!”
“But we can find out easily!” came Lucius’s voice. “Draco, fetch the goblin,
he can tell us whether the sword is real or not!”
Harry dashed across the cellar to where Griphook was huddled on the floor.
“Griphook,” he whispered into the goblin’s pointed ear, “you must tell them
that sword’s a fake, they mustn’t know it’s the real one, Griphook, please—“
He could hear someone scuttling own the cellar steps; next moment, Draco’s
shaking voice spoke from behind the door.
“Stand back. Line up against the back wall. Don’t try anything, or I’ll kill
you!”
They did as they were bidden; as the lock turned, Ron clicked the Deluminator and the lights whisked back into his pocket, restoring the cellar’s darkness.
The door flew open; Malfoy marched inside, wand held out in front of him, pale
and determined. He seized the little goblin by the arm and backed out again,
dragging Griphook with him. The door slammed shut and at the same moment
a loud crack echoed inside the cellar.
Ron clicked the Deluminator. Three balls of light flew back into the air from
his pocket, revealing Dobby the house-elf, who had just Apparated into their
midst.
“DOB—!”
Harry hit Ron on the arm to stop him shouting, and Ron looked terrified at
his mistake. Footsteps crossed the ceiling overhead: Draco marching Griphook
to Bellatrix.
Dobby’s enormous, tennis—ball shaped eyes were wide; he was trembling
from his feet to the tips of his ears. He was back in the home of his old masters,
and it was clear that he was petrified.
“Harry Potter,” he squeaked in the tiniest quiver of a voice, “Dobby has come
to rescue you.”
“But how did you—?”
401
An awful scream drowned Harry’s words: Hermione was being tortured
again. He cut to the essentials.
“You can Disapparate out of this cellar?” he asked Dobby, who nodded, his
ears flapping.
“And you can take humans with you?”
Dobby nodded again.
“Right. Dobby, I want you to grab Luna, Dean, and Mr. Ollivander, and take
them—take them to—“
“Bill and Fleur’s,” said Ron. “Shell Cottage on the outskirts of Tinworth!”
The elf nodded for a third time.
“And then come back,” said Harry. “Can you do that, Dobby?”
“Of course, Harry Potter,” whispered the little elf. He hurried over to Mr. Ollivander, who appeared to be barely conscious. He took one of the wandmaker’s
hands in his own, then held out the other to Luna and Dean, neither of whom
moved.
“Harry, we want to help you!” Luna whispered.
“We can’t leave you here,” said Dean.
“Go, both of you! We’ll see you at Bill and Fleur’s.”
As Harry spoke, his scar burned worse than ever, and for a few seconds he
looked down, not upon the wandmaker, but on another man who was just as
old, just as thin, but laughing scornfully.
“Kill me, then. Voldemort, I welcome death! But my death will not bring you
what you seek. . . . There is so much you do not understand. . . . ”
He felt Voldemort’s fury, but as Hermione screamed again he shut it out,
returning to the cellar and the horror of his own present.
“Go!” Harry beseeched to Luna and Dean. “Go! We’ll follow, just go!”
They caught hold of the elf’s outstretched fingers. There was another loud
crack, and Dobby, Luna, Dean, and Ollivander vanished.
“What was that?” shouted Lucius Malfoy from over their heads. “Did you
hear that? What was that noise in the cellar?”
Harry and Ron stared at each other.
402 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
“Draco—no, call Wormtail! Make him go and check!”
Footsteps crossed the room overhead, then there was silence. Harry knew
that the people in the drawing room were listening for more noises from the
cellar.
“We’re going to have to try and tackle him,” he whispered to Ron. They
had no choice: The moment anyone entered the room and saw the absence of
three prisoners, they were lost. “Leave the lights on,” Harry added, and as they
heard someone descending the steps outside the door, they backed against the
wall on either side of it.
“Stand back,” came Wormtail’s voice. “Stand away from the door. I’m coming
in.” The door flew open. For a split second Wormtail gazed into the apparently
empty cellar, ablaze with light from the three miniature suns floating in midair.
Then Harry and Ron launched themselves upon him. Ron seized Wormtail’s
wand arm and forced it upwards. Harry slapped a hand to his mouth, muffling
his voice. Silently they struggled: Wormtail’s wand emitted sparks; his silver
hand closed around Harry’s throat.
“What is it, Wormtail?” called Lucius Malfoy from above.
“Nothing!” Ron called back, in a passable imitation of Wormtail’s wheezy
voice. “All fine!”
Harry could barely breathe.
“You’re going to kill me?” Harry choked, attempting to prise off the metal
fingers. “After I saved your life? You owe me, Wormtail!”
The silver fingers slackened. Harry had not expected it: He wrenched himself free, astonished, keeping his hand over Wormtail’s mouth. He saw the
ratlike man’s small watery eyes widen with fear and surprise: He seemed just
as shocked as Harry at what his hand had done, at the tiny, merciful impulse it
had betrayed, and he continued to struggle more powerfully, as though to undo
that moment of weakness.
“And we’ll have that,” whispered Ron, tugging Wormtail’s wand from his
other hand.
Wandless, helpless, Pettigrew’s pupils dilated in terror. His eyes had slid
403
from Harry’s face to something else. His own silver fingers were moving inexorably toward his own throat.
“No—“
Without pausing to think, Harry tried to drag back the hand, but there was
no stopping it. The silver tool that Voldemort had given his most cowardly servant had turned upon its disarmed and useless owner; Pettigrew was reaping
his reward for his hesitation, his moment of pity; he was being strangled before
their eyes.
“No!”
Ron had released Wormtail too, and together he and Harry tried to pull
the crushing metal fingers from around Wormtail’s throat, but it was no use.
Pettigrew was turning blue.
“Relashio!” said Ron, pointing the wand at the silver hand, but nothing
happened; Pettigrew dropped to his knees, and at the same moment, Hermione
gave a dreadful scream from overhead. Wormtail’s eyes rolled upward in his
purple face; he gave a last twitch, and was still.
Harry and Ron looked at each other, then leaving Wormtail’s body on the
floor behind them, ran up the stairs and back into the shadowy passageway
leading to the drawing room. Cautiously they crept along it until they reached
the drawing room door, which was ajar. Now they had a clear view of Bellatrix
looking down at Griphook, who was holding Gryffindor’s sword in his longfingered hands. Hermione was lying at Bellatrix’s feet. She was barely stirring.
“Well?” Bellatrix said to Griphook. “Is it the true sword?”
Harry waited, holding his breath, fighting against the prickling of his scar.
“No,” said Griphook. “It is a fake.”
“Are you sure?” panted Bellatrix. “Quite sure?”
“Yes,” said the goblin.
Relief broke across her face, all tension drained from it.
“Good,” she said, and with a casual flick of her wand she slashed another
deep cut into the goblin’s face, and he dropped with a yell at her feet. She
kicked him aside. “And now,” she said in a voice that burst with triumph, “we
404 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
call the Dark Lord!”
And she pushed back her sleeve and touched her forefinger to the Dark
Mark.
At once, Harry’s scar felt as though it had split open again. His true surroundings vanished: He was Voldemort, and the skeletal wizard before him
was laughing toothlessly at him; he was enraged at the summons he felt—he
had warned them, he had told them to summon him for nothing less than Potter. If they were mistaken . . .
“Kill me, then!” demanded the old man. “You will not win, you cannot win!
That wand will never, ever be yours—“
And Voldemort’s fury broke: A burst of green light filled the prison room
and the frail old body was lifted from its hard bed and then fell back, lifeless,
and Voldemort returned to the window, his wrath barely controllable. . . . They
would suffer his retribution if they had no good reason for calling him back. . . .
“And I think,” said Bellatrix’s voice, “we can dispose of the Mudblood. Greyback, take her if you want her.”
“NOOOOOOOOOOOO!”
Ron had burst into the drawing room; Bellatrix looked around, shocked; she
turned her wand to face Ron instead—
“Expelliarmus!” he roared, pointing Wormtail’s wand at Bellatrix, and hers
flew into the air and was caught by Harry, who had sprinted after Ron. Lucius,
Narcissa, Draco and Greyback wheeled about; Harry yelled, “Stupefy!” and
Lucius Malfoy collapsed onto the hearth. Jets of light flew from Draco’s, Narcissa’s, and Greyback’s wands; Harry threw himself to the floor, rolling behind
a sofa to avoid them.
“STOP OR SHE DIES!
Panting, Harry peered around the edge of the sofa. Bellatrix was supporting
Hermione, who seemed to be unconscious, and was holding her short silver
knife to Hermione’s throat.
“Drop your wands,” she whispered. “Drop them, or we’ll see exactly how
filthy her blood is!”
405
Ron stood rigid, clutching Wormtail’s wand. Harry straightened up, still
holding Bellatrix’s.
“I said, drop them!” she screeched, pressing the blade into Hermione’s
throat: Harry saw beads of blood appear there.
“All right!” he shouted, and he dropped Bellatrix’s wand onto the floor at his
feet, Ron did the same with Wormtail’s. Both raised their hands to shoulder
height.
“Good!” she leered. “Draco, pick them up! The Dark Lord is coming, Harry
Potter! Your death approaches!”
Harry knew it; his scar was bursting with the pain of it, and he could feel
Voldemort flying through the sky from far away, over a dark and stormy sea,
and soon he would be close enough to Apparate to them, and Harry could see
no way out.
“Now,” said Bellatrix softly, as Draco hurried back to her with the wands.
“Cissy, I think we ought to tie these little heroes up again, while Greyback
takes care of Miss Mudblood. I am sure the Dark Lord will not begrudge you
the girl, Greyback, after what you have done tonight.”
At the last word there was a peculiar grinding noise from above. All of
them looked upward in time to see the crystal chandelier tremble; then, with a
creak and an ominous jingling, it began to fall. Bellatrix was directly beneath
it; dropping Hermione, she threw herself aside with a scream. The chandelier crashed to the floor in an explosion of crystal and chains, falling on top of
Hermione and the goblin, who still clutched the sword of Gryffindor. Glittering
shards of crystal flew in all directions; Draco doubled over, his hands covering
his bloody face.
As Ron ran to pull Hermione out of the wreckage, Harry took the chance: He
leapt over an armchair and wrested the three wands from Draco’s grip, pointed
all of them at Greyback, and yelled, “Stupefy!” The werewolf was lifted off his
feet by the triple spell, flew up to the ceiling and then smashed to the ground.
As Narcissa dragged Draco out of the way of further harm, Bellatrix sprang
to her feet, her hair flying as she brandished the silver knife; but Narcissa had
406 CHAPTER 23. MALFOY MANOR
directed her wand at the doorway.
“Dobby!” she screamed and even Bellatrix froze. “You! You dropped the
chandelier—?”
The tiny elf trotted into the room, his shaking finger pointing at his old
mistress.
“You must not hurt Harry Potter,” he squeaked.
“Kill him, Cissy!” shrieked Bellatrix, but there was another loud crack, and
Narcissa’s wand too flew into the air and landed on the other side of the room.
“You dirty little monkey!” bawled Bellatrix. “How dare you take a witch’s
wand, how dare you defy your masters?”
“Dobby has no master!” squealed the elf. “Dobby is a free elf, and Dobby
has come to save Harry Potter and his friends!”
Harry’s scar was blinding him with pain. Dimly he knew that they had
moments, seconds before Voldemort was with them.
“Ron, catch—and GO!” he yelled, throwing one of the wands to him; then
he bent down to tug Griphook out from under the chandelier. Hoisting the
groaning goblin, who still clung to the sword, over one shoulder, Harry seized
Dobby’s hand and spun on the spot to Disapparate.
As he turned into darkness he caught one last view of the drawing room
of the pale, frozen figures of Narcissa and Draco, of the streak of red that was
Ron’s hair, and a blue of flying silver, as Bellatrix’s knife flew across the room
at the place where he was vanishing—
Bill and Fleur’s . . . Shell Cottage . . . Bill and Fleur’s . . .
He had disappeared into the unknown; all he could do was repeat the name
of the destination and hope that it would suffice to take him there. The pain in
his forehead pierced him, and the weight of the goblin bore down upon him; he
could feel the blade of Gryffindor’s sword bumping against his back: Dobby’s
hand jerked in his; he wondered whether the elf was trying to take charge, to
pull them in the right direction, and tried, by squeezing the fingers, to indicate
that that was fine with them. . . .
And then they hit solid earth and smelled salty air. Harry fell to his knees,
407
relinquished Dobby’s hand, and attempted to lower Griphook gently to the
ground.
“Are you all right?” he said as the goblin stirred, but Griphook merely whimpered.
Harry squinted around through the darkness. There seemed to be a cottage
a short way away under the wide starry sky, and he thought he saw movement
outside it.
“Dobby, is this Shell Cottage?” he whispered, clutching the two wands he
had brought from the Malfoys’, ready to fight if he needed to. “Have we come
to the right place? Dobby?”
He looked around. The little elf stood feet from him.
“DOBBY!”
The elf swayed slightly, stars reflected in his wide, shining eyes. Together,
he and Harry looked down at the silver hilt of the knife protruding from the
elf’s heaving chest.
“Dobby—no—HELP!” Harry bellowed toward the cottage, toward the people
moving there. “HELP!”
He did not know or care whether they were wizards or Muggles, friends or
foes; all he cared about was that a dark stain was spreading across Dobby’s
front, and that he had stretched out his own arms to Harry with a look of
supplication. Harry caught him and laid him sideways on the cool grass.
“Dobby, no, don’t die, don’t die—”
The elf’s eyes found him, and his lips trembled with the effort to form words.
“Harry . . . Potter . . . ”
And then with a little shudder the elf became quite still, and his eyes were
nothing more than great glassy orbs, sprinkled with light from the stars they
could not see.
